[{"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-22-tweedekamer-25.u87", "speech text": "Those are the most essential questions you can ask in this Chamber. We understand that the Minister would come up with a plan, but we were rather surprised that there were also images of what the amount would be. I think, with all the threats out there, it's completely legitimate to invest extra in defense. But what the amounts are, of course, we will not see until spring."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-22-tweedekamer-25.u103", "speech text": "Yes. What you see is that the Netherlands is a very attractive target. We are one of the most digitized countries. We have the Amsterdam Internet Exchange. If Mr \u00d6zt\u00fcrk says: throw out the internet, throw out the Amsterdam Internet Exchange... 'Cause that's what you're actually asking. Then we're not attractive anymore. I am sure Mr \u00d6zt\u00fcrk will say: we are not going to do that, because we simply have to do our job. Mr. Chairman. This cabinet invests $5 billion in defense. That is a first step after decades of austerity. It is a good start, but it is not enough to meet future challenges. I have just spoken to Mr \u00d6zt\u00fcrk: Europe is prosperous, but militaryly weak. Without the Americans, we are barely able to face Russia, or to defend ourselves against China's advance. You can see that after years, geopolitics is back. The velvet glove of diplomacy needs a fist. We can't do that anymore. It is not for nothing that NATO is asking for more power. The urgency is also great. In 2014, the Prime Minister signed in the previous cabinet to spend 2% of GDP on Defence. The Netherlands is now 1.16%. We're dangling at the bottom of the NATO list. If we don't do something, it won't be much better by 2024. This is damaging to the Netherlands, but it is also damaging to our own security. On Christmas, I read a nice interview with the Prime Minister in the Elsevier. I quote him: 'It is an embarrassment that we do not comply with the NATO standard of 2%. President Donald Trump is often wrong, but here he is. The Netherlands should increase the Defence budget more towards 16 billion.\" I'm quitting my quote. The Prime Minister is about to present this plan to NATO. So can the CDA assume that extra money will be made available with the Spring Note, now that the Prime Minister attaches his own soul and salvation to this plan? That will agreement was first a promise, a desire to grow to 2%. In October, NATO's top boss indicated that it had become a requirement. That means 7 billion for the Netherlands. I will be honest: the 7 billion will not be added now. But hopefully we can take a step. Other countries won't make it either. Hence my question, which Mrs Karabulut has also asked. Over the last few weeks, there have been several reports in the newspaper that Trump has said that he has really threatened to leave NATO. What are the chances of this happening? Mr President, I come to a conclusion. Defence Ministers will discuss the submitted national plans on 5 and 6 February 2019. So they're gonna argue about those plans, but when will the official offer take place? Because that letter says the Prime Minister has to offer that plan. What if it turns out that NATO said in that first discussion in February: the Netherlands, that plan is not really enough? Is there going to be a new national plan? Thank you, Mr. Chairman."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-22-tweedekamer-25.u249", "speech text": "Anyway, we have to think long ways. That's what we wrote down in the Defence Note. Look, defense is always something of long-term thinking. In fact, we indicated in the Defence Paper that we would re-evaluate by 2020. And we're starting the process now. We will involve the Chamber, as agreed here in your Chamber, and as we have done in making the Defence Note. And that involves the views of the army, which was also Mr Kerstens' question. That vision is just in line with the Defence Note. The Defence Note was first, then the Army's vision. The ambitions and goals contained therein are also in line with this. So it is actually a further development of the frameworks. We've put the frameworks in the Defence Note, and they're being worked out. Honestly, I'm glad the Army did. You may have been somewhat surprised, but the army has given all sorts of reports about it. You're invited to the trial. And that is what we have to do, because that safety environment is constantly changing; that is what we see. As a DOD, we need to be able to anticipate that again. So the thinking will never stop. This means that we are really going to work out the long lines to the future in the recalibrate. That's the step we're taking. That is a first investment, but we also need to indicate how we are going to make these follow-up investments."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-22-tweedekamer-25.u279", "speech text": "The reason we are also discussing this today is that we are also talking about other important investments. The people have been waiting since 2017, and now since 2018, for those fine words from the Defence Note to be expressed. The Minister says that there was some sort of agreement on 4 October, but apparently it was not, because there is nothing there. I am in favour of a high degree of urgency, the same urgency that has resulted in five priorities for additional equipment being purchased for the staff. I don't know what's wrong with it. That is why I repeat my suggestion: otherwise arrange a mediator, but make it work as soon as possible, because nobody gets happy about this. The minister does all kinds of things to get the armed forces in order, and the defense does all kinds of things, but people end up looking at their paychecks and thinking, \"How can it take so long?\" When will we get the recognition we need? If the Minister does not do it because the people deserve it, then she must do it because otherwise the armed forces will run against the ten thousand vacancies, so that we instantly no longer have a military force at all."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-22-tweedekamer-4.u6", "speech text": "In the first question, Mrs Ploumen put a number of things side by side that cannot actually be put side by side. She says that the fact that a hack has taken place, as announced by the US and the UK, indicates that the 95 million allocated in the Netherlands is not effective. As Mrs Ploumen does not know when which hack has taken place, because the intelligence services must be confidential about it, it is concluded that the 95 million can or cannot play a role in this. Once again, the Chamber can ask any questions it wishes to ask through the Intelligence and Security Services Committee. Then there is the second question: what measures will the cabinet take next? Economic Affairs colleagues have previously informed the Chamber that they are exploring legislation, for example on the protection of telecommunications. There is an extensive cybersecurity centre, as part of the Ministry of Justice and Security, which is also highly appreciated internationally. With the additional investments, not only there but also in a number of ministries in my ministry, additional cyber-diplomats are being adopted and additional training is taking place. We can further improve cyber-defense. I'm afraid that's necessary. Of course, I can't guarantee that you'll get it completely foolproof. This is, of course, generally true in the fight against crime or espionage. I can show that we take the problem very seriously and take action in many places."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-22-tweedekamer-4.u14", "speech text": "The annual report of the AIVD specifically mentions China and the Russian Federation. Mr Koopmans is right that other countries or organisations may also be behind cyber attacks. This also means that defense against cyber attacks, but also awareness, not only with the government but also with companies and the public, is of great importance. That is why the services sometimes come out with information to make everyone aware of the measures you need to take."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-24-tweedekamer-5.u86", "speech text": "Mr President, I thought it was so fair that Mrs Ouwehand also added her image and that the people could then see that that is not true. She and a small group of others in our society feel that animals are so harmed. They do not want, on principle, livestock farming and will use everything to put animals in a bad light. In words, that is so far, but farmers and their families are regularly threatened and farm heirs are illegally entered, or images are made under false pretenses. That while farmers simply try to earn a living in a legal way and with good care for their animals. Meat and dairy and egg products are also simply found in all supermarkets and are bought by the vast majority of our society. So our farmers must also be able to produce these products without being placed as animal executioners. Mr. Chairman. Premeditated: farmers take care of our food, and without food we can't. We still do not live on tubes of seaweed paste with added minerals and flavourings, and if it is up to me that this is never going to happen, not even by a Paris climate agreement, which is now being used as an argument to put everything related to livestock farming in an evil light again. Our farmers are coming up in defense, Mr President, with words. Even the PBL has had to make adjustments to its publications in response. Unlike many animal activists, farmers do something useful for our society. Within the legal frameworks established in this Chamber, they keep animals with great care. Appreciation for our farmers is in order. They do their work with great passion against a often low income to provide us with food. Mr. Chairman. People have been loving animals for thousands of years. Cows in the peat meadow area have been part of the Netherlands for as long as it exists. Of course, animals are kept different now. I can assure you that it is better now than it was a hundred years ago with stables where the climate is regulated and animals have more freedom of movement. In addition, there is continuous work to keep animals healthy and prevent diseases. The sector itself is working hard on this, as we can see from the sector plan for a vital pig farming and the plan for goat farming for a healthy collection of lambs. Farmers therefore deserve appreciation and protection. What we really need to speak about as a Chamber is those who threaten livestock farmers and their families, those who enter the farmyard under false pretenses or in the middle of the night and those who justify it. We have to be tough on that. With that in mind, I will be tabling a motion to obtain a ruling from the Chamber on this matter. In addition, I ask the Minister about her approach to criminal activists. How are the talks with the Minister of Justice to deal with this very hard, I ask the Minister through the President. Can this also be linked to the cooperation between LTO, POV and police that has recently started? Of course, we must continue to look for ways to improve animal keeping. Among other things, it must be ensured that barn fires do not occur. Stalin fires are a tragedy for the animals, but also a great suffering for the keeper and his family. That is why I welcome the plan of action that the Minister has sent to the Chamber, which has agreed that the most common cause, dysfunctional electrification in existing stables, will be dealt with with with periodic checks or inspections. I also notice today that various parties are calling for farmers to be obliged to do all kinds of things without looking at the payback of investments by farmers and the income for farmers' families. Therefore, the CDA focuses on the role of the government in helping entrepreneurs to reduce barn fires. To this end, in the second term, I am considering a motion asking the Cabinet to identify the rapid detection systems available in the technical premises of livestock farms and the costs involved. I also ask the Cabinet to consider how we can support farmers in this with a financial move in the back. I should now like to hear the Minister's response to the proposal that I would like to put in a motion in second place. The government agreement and the agricultural vision state that there must be a better income model for farmers. Let us, as a chamber, take the lead in this and make this possible. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-29-tweedekamer-27.u61", "speech text": "If that's how you treat your defense personnel, I can also imagine a lot of people leaving. But I would first like to read a letter to see if it is really necessary to have a debate."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-29-tweedekamer-30.u56", "speech text": "So that's it at that point. I had stayed with the questions about the ministry's actions when it became clear that it went wrong. At what time was the first notice known to the Ministry that the agreement was broken that Dutch goods were not used in battle? When was that known to the Ministry and why wasn't it immediately decided to stop deliveries? How is it that in the technical briefings the Ministry indicates to the Chamber that everything is being monitored and that nothing is going on, while in the wobbled documents it has long been shown that the equipment was used in the battle? Then I ask questions about the advice that was in the Ministry's possession. What external opinions have been requested and which have not yet been shared with the Chamber? I would then like to ask about the human rights violations, the possible human rights violations by a rebel group supported by the Netherlands, I have to say here officially. Has a Dutch-supported group shot at the Kurdish district of Sheikh Maqsoud in Aleppo or not with so-called dumb Hamim rockets, which make no distinction between civilians and warriors? Did a group supported by the Netherlands use poison gas in that Kurdish district? Can the Minister assure us that the groups supported by the Netherlands were not involved in the attacks on the Kurdish residential area of Aleppo? I'm saying this because Amnesty International reported back in 2016, and also announced to the Ministry, that a number of groups were in the process of attacking that residential neighborhood with those stupid missiles. Amnesty International talks about Jabhat al-Shamiya, the Brigade of Sultan Murad, the Nour al-Din al-Zenki battalions and Brigade 13. Are these groups supported by the Netherlands? If so, Amnesty International said in 2016 that these groups were working on this. Then what was done with it from the Ministry? That Amnesty International report has been dealt with here in the Chamber and Minister Koenders has spoken shamefully of these matters. Finally, on what the Minister himself said and wrote about the documents. The WOB documents on page 59, Part 13, state that the civil character of the above-mentioned equipment is without prejudice to the fact that the use of the equipment does not necessarily have to be of a civil nature. Does the Minister agree with us that this means that you accept that the delivered goods can not be used for civil purposes? And finally, how do you explain the shift of the ministry in the response? In the debate on 2 October, the Minister says, on a question from our group, that the supply agreement states 'no use for war purposes'. But in the answer to the parliamentary questions last week, the Minister says: the delivery conditions allowed for the non-offensive use. So first it was not allowed to be used in battle, but now only not offensive but in defense. Then where's the difference? The Minister says that we have intensified deliveries in connection with the fight against ISIS. ISIS was expelled from Northern Syria in early 2017."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-01-29-tweedekamer-5.u13", "speech text": "I notice there's some sort of cover-up culture in the defense, a cover-up culture. It's about human lives, it's about our soldiers, it's about our own people. What exactly are you going to do to stop this game of words and break away from the culture of cover-up and cover-up?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-02-07-tweedekamer-10.u2", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. Today, we are talking about what we have built up in the Netherlands and the European Union in terms of security and prosperity and how we can maintain and increase it in the future. The world around us is unstable. Brexit, Russia, the Middle East, migration from Africa, and China, which is moving more and more. In this unstable world, we are increasing our prosperity and security in the European Union, because we are a relatively small country with 17 million out of 500 million inhabitants, and we make a lot of money in the European Union with our exports. This leads to economic growth, jobs and tax revenues, from which we can pay our care and pensions. At the same time, support for the EU has increased in the Netherlands. This support is strong, but it is also fragile, as the Social and Cultural Planning Bureau has shown. The Dutch know well that we are benefiting from the European Union. They feel it is a necessity, but it is not the case that they are dragging EU flags through the streets. The VVD shares this realistic view. I'll get to the Brexit. The Brexit shows that nexit is not a good idea. British society has been divided to the bone. The British Parliament does not know exactly how it intends to shape the Brexit. And while Brexit hasn't even taken place, the pound has already fallen in value, British purchasing power has fallen by almost 20% and companies are leaving the UK. So you shouldn't want a nexit as the Netherlands. That is why I would like to ask the next parties in Parliament, as far as they are present, because there is already one missing, how they see next and how exactly they should, because the British do not know that. So I'm gonna draw them out a little bit. The Dutch interest is paramount for the VVD. This means working with EU Member States without seeking a superstate at EU level. As far as we are concerned, the EU should focus on the major cross-border concerns that countries cannot solve themselves. I call it climate, security and migration. I also call it the completion of the internal market. I told you, we export a lot, but there can be a little bit more on top of that, so that we can make more money from it, which we can all benefit from. And keep it practical, too. People have more to gain from the abolition of roaming charges and judicial cooperation than from grand visions. That brings me to the rule of law. The rule of law is under attack in a number of EU countries, including Poland and Hungary. That's what hits us right away. Dutch judges no longer hand over suspects to Poland. And that will compromise our safety. Why? Because Polish judges are no longer independent enough. That's impossible, isn't it? Does the government want to appeal to Poland about this? And then Hungary. It is absurd that the Hungarian Government does not want to participate in a visit by a fellow EU Member State to that country. 'Cause what's going on out there is affecting all of us, and we have to work together, right? We all benefit from that. The Netherlands also pays to the European budget and that money goes back to Hungary. So I'd like a response from the cabinet. It says here, \"Don't pronounce, lead to further escalation.\" I will not, but I see the Hungarian ambassador and he knows exactly what I mean. Then \"a deal is a deal.\" Instead of more European Union, we would like countries to stick to the agreement, for example the Growth and Stability Pact. Countries can easily get away with violating these criteria on a budget deficit. This is not good for the stability of the euro and therefore not good for the Dutch interest. Because this stability of the euro contributes to prosperity and jobs. The Commission must show courage and say something about it. Then you see two things in the European Commission. They have many tasks at the same time, they have to assess and enforce the budget. You can see that in competition too. They make the laws and they have to enforce them; Mrs. Vestager. Is that desirable? Shouldn't you cut that? Here in the Netherlands we also have an independent supervisor, the Competition Authority, now the ACM? Shouldn't that also be at European level? Then we also have the spitzen candidate. The current President, Juncker, from Luxembourg, calls himself 'a political Commission', but is that wise? Are you still the objective, neutral guardian of the treaties? We don't think so. Therefore, my question to the cabinet: would you like to ensure that a next Commission is working on the separation of functions? I mentioned the Stability and Growth Pact. And don't you want to join us in that spitzen-candidate trial? The Treaty states that the European Council is sitting there, Prime Minister Rutte, who should be President of the Commission, taking into account the results of the European Parliament, and may then say yes or no to the European Parliament. Let us keep it that way, so that we do not have another political chairman, because that is not in the Dutch interest. Then defense. We were in Brussels last week with a number of colleagues. That was a good visit, but then you see that more and more defence tasks are gradually going to the European Commission: a European Defence Fund, a peace facility. There's even talk of a defense commissioner. Now the cabinet says that it has to be intergovernmental, so Heads of Government need to talk about this and not the Commission, simply put. How is this cabinet going to counter this tendency on the part of the Commission to attract things? Finally, I come to new allies. The European Union, like the Binnenhof, is a political marketplace. There you have to wheel and deal, you don't get your way everywhere, but you have to negotiate smart and tough. The Prime Minister's nodding. We have also seen this with the Minister of Finance, who created a so-called Hanseatic coalition to protect our interests in the euro. How does the Netherlands do that? That leads me to two questions. Are we capable of creating change if we want to make alliances? Secondly, if that is the case and if we want to achieve something in concrete terms and lead coalitions, then perhaps we should not take too fast a position in the European Union, not because we are vague, but precisely because we want to achieve something and lead a coalition? Can the Prime Minister and the Foreign Minister say anything about what building a coalition in Europe means?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-02-07-tweedekamer-10.u341", "speech text": "Let's get back to defense. I was talking about a possible Defense Commissioner. I believe that the cabinet is also seeing this problem coming, because there is a rather cryptic phrase about cooperation in the state of the Union. I am curious to see what is meant by the sentence I am now reading: 'In this context, the Cabinet considers it important to consider how best to implement a forward-looking agenda for security and defence in Europe, both politically and institutionally.' What's this all about?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-02-13-tweedekamer-6.u12", "speech text": "It seems that several spokesmen have now come up with this as a line of defense: 'there is now a consultation'. Maybe I'll respond to it before we hear it four or five more times."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-12-eerstekamer-11.u19", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. On behalf of the Group of the European People's Party (Christian Democrats) and European Democrats, I would like to thank Mr Koopmans and Mr Van Helvert and all the supporters who have contributed and contributed. All this work makes an initiative law more exception than rule. Hence our respect for and thanks to the proposers. I wish them good luck. With this initiative they have addressed a current and pressing problem: the global increase in piracy at sea. Not only off the coast of East Africa, but also in East Asia, South America and West Africa. Our merchant navy is right to call on the government to provide protection, as is the case with all countries affected by piracy. However, the military lacks people and means to fulfil all tasks at once. In addition, procedures are too lengthy, the costs are too high, or there is no suitable space on board the ships to be protected. The Marines are doing their utmost, but supply and demand of protection are not sufficiently compatible. To meet this, the proposers propose to involve private maritime security officers operating under the supervision of the government. This would constitute an infringement of the State's monopoly of violence. This monopoly is on good grounds. The government must maintain the rule of law. In some cases, violence cannot be avoided, but this exercise of violence must be under democratic control and violence must be reserved for staff who are directly subordinate to the government. Usually they're military and police officers. Leaving violence to citizens creates the risk of too much violence or playing a judge of their own. In the case of pirates, the monopoly of violence is inadequate. The state doesn't provide enough protection. However, that does not relieve the same government of its responsibility towards the merchant navy. Her duty of care continues, even if it is not fulfilled or not fulfilled. That forces the search for alternatives. Because doing nothing is not an option. Do we accept piracy against Dutch ships? That would mean crime pays off. Victims would continue to fall and the home front and crews would remain in fear. The merchant navy and our economy would suffer a great deal of damage. Therefore, the need for armed action remains after all non-violent protection measures have been developed. Alternatively, the removal of the economic motives of the pirates has been mentioned. Intensifying development cooperation with coastal states could lead to a reduction in piracy. Our country has a balanced and careful international policy and with success. But a policy aimed at improving economic structures is a long-term issue. This is going to take too long, while piracy is a topical problem that requires a direct solution. Another alternative is offered by this bill. The government doesn't have to do everything with its own staff. Many public authorities are entrusted to private companies under the supervision of the government. Security tasks can also be transferred to private individuals when it comes to execution. However, it must be ensured that the performance by private individuals meets the same requirements as the performance by the public authorities: the same procedure, regulation, authorisation, certification, control and supervision. Then there should be no predominantly objection to transfer to private individuals, as long as those individuals have the form of quasi-government. The risks of this proposal have been highlighted in the House of Representatives. First of all, the risk that civil security will be preferred to military, because civil security can work faster and cheaper. This danger would be real if shipowners had a free choice. But there is no free choice. The Minister decides and does so on the basis of the principle \"VPD, unless.\" Another risk is that more protection also means more violence. In itself, that's right. That's exactly the point, you might say. Private maritime security fills the gaps that are now falling. And that's not a risk as long as their M.O. is the same as VPD's. Civil security is second best, but that's better than nothing. There is also a risk that civilian security would use violence faster than military VPDs. The best practices do not provide an argument for this. Citizen guards are regulated and controlled. They are covered by the same Public Prosecutor's Office as the military. A valid argument is that costs should not play a decisive role in the choice of force. That choice is made by the Minister. A separate permit is required for each transport. It covers all aspects, not just the financial aspects. The starting point remains: \"VPD, unless.\" Madam President. Finally, my group has two questions. First of all, the storm. The criminal justice system has a comprehensive regulation of the storm. To what extent does this bill regulate the same thing as the doctrine of self-defense does? Are we doing double work? Or are there elements of civil security that are not subject to storms, such as preparatory measures? In his letter, the Minister announced a reflection on storms. Maybe he'd like to lift a tip of the veil by now, as a try-out. Our second question concerns the bodycams. If force has been used, the captain will send the bodycams to the state's attorney's office. The prosecution may decide to prosecute a private security guard on the basis of the images and sound recordings. To what extent could this conflict with the principle that no one has to cooperate in their own condemnation? All in all, my group believes that the monopoly of violence should not be understood in absolute terms. The government may transfer tasks to others. Justification for this is the duty of care of the State. If the government fails to do so, mandating is allowed under the condition of proper regulation and control. This bill provides for this. We look forward with interest to answering our questions."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-12-eerstekamer-11.u30", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. With this bill, the initiators, first Mr Ten Broeke and Mr Knops, and now Mr Koopmans and Mr Van Helvert, are trying to offer the Dutch merchant ships more security in the foreign. That's what's good for them. On behalf of my group, I would like to congratulate the initiators on the fact that at least they have already made it so far that they can defend the bill here. With this proposal they are addressing an important problem that requires solutions. However, it is the question, at least for my group, whether the solution put forward is the right one. The proposal to give private parties the power to use force to avert the risk of piracy affects a fundamental principle of the Dutch State: the government's monopoly on violence. The initiators follow the view of the De Wijkerslooth committee that the monopoly of violence is not an absolute principle. They argue that the right to violence may be transferred under conditions to others. The initiators believe that this is possible if the government is unable to comply adequately with its duty of care for merchant ships under the Dutch flag. As far as our group is concerned, this reasoning is rather short-sighted. We will go into that further and we hope today to get a little more depth from the initiators themselves around their support. In addition, we would like a clearer picture of how the need for private security has been secured with this bill. In my speech, I first focus on a technical aspect of the legislative proposal itself, and the tension between the VPD principle and the so-called level-playing field standard. Afterwards I briefly deal with the captain's overriding authority and the connection of this bill with the role and task of Defense. I'll start with the design of the bill. As the SP said in the written debate, it is an unfinished proposal, given the delegation provisions for drafting the legislative proposal in lower regulation. The initiators deny this and stress that delegation provisions are \"useful, advisable and customary\" without prejudice to the \"clearness and overseeability\" of the legislative proposal. My group does not entirely follow this line of reasoning. The amended proposal of the law covers only eight pages. So there could have been a bit more effect on this. But much more importantly, it is precisely in the AMvBs that crucial issues will be dealt with that affect the proportionality and feasibility of the legislative proposal. This undermines the supervisory role of this Chamber, i.e. on the spot, in the handling of the legislative proposal. This is not for the benefit of the plenary. But it also becomes more difficult afterwards, because in the case of an AMvB, it is always difficult for a parliament to have sufficient control over what it will look like in the end. I would like to mention two examples which are set out in more detail and which may be objections. As a first example, I refer to Article 4 (2) (a) and (b), which provides that the Minister of JenV determines at AMvB a number of nautical miles and a percentage of additional costs for a planned transport. On the basis of those criteria, a shipowner may rely on private security rather than a VPD. The government has now indicated its intention to determine with such an AMvB that such a VPD would not be 20% more expensive, or that a merchant ship would not have to travel more than 100 miles. This has just been memorized. This to facilitate a level playing field for Dutch merchants. My group fears a sliding scale, where less stringent regulated private security may operate in other countries at a cheaper and unlicensed cost. We now know the intention of such an AMvB. It may take shape in this way, but can also be changed afterwards. Nor can this bill ensure that merchant ships will not reflagged on the spot market on the basis of cost considerations. That flagging was one of the main arguments for this bill, and one of its main assumptions. With such a competition, which is likely to continue, even after the adoption of this bill, the criteria of 20% and 100 miles may be further put under pressure. All in all, there is a significant risk of ever less use of VPDs in this way. In replying to the PvdA's questions on this subject, the Government does not, by definition, raise legal or economic objections. In my group's view, this is contrary to the VPD principle, unless it is based on conditional outsourcing of the monopoly of violence. In our view, that is an inconsistency. We would like to hear how the government and initiators look at this. A second example is Article 8, in which the Minister of JenV at AMvB lays down detailed rules on the specific means of violence to be used and their storage. Here too, the stability of the future is cited as a reason to deviate from the Belgian modality, where these aspects are very strict, much more stringent. Although there is talk of \"transferring the force monopoly under conditions,\" the legislative proposal only seems to require a step-by-step approach and the use of force as an ultimatum remedium. Are these indeed all the conditions, apart from the criteria of 20% and 100 miles, and if not, which others can be imposed? And most importantly, how can they be secured? Will we also be able to assess this in more detail in an evaluation? I'm on the overriding authority. The written procedure has already mentioned two captains on one ship or, more precisely, team leader and captain. The NVKK says that there is \"permanent and structural consultation\" between team leader and captain. If it turns out that protection measures have not averted the danger, then only consultation between team leader and captain is necessary for the use of the violence. There is expressly no need for the captain's consent to the team leader for the use of force. According to the NVKK, there can be \"no difference of opinion\" on the imminent threat of piracy. On the one hand, the government is therefore talking about a captain's overriding authority, in accordance with Regulation 8, Chapter XI-2 of the annex to the SOLAS Convention. According to the government, a situation can previously arise that the captain and the team leader disagree about the threat of piracy and the use of violence. The captain will have the last word. On the other hand, the NVKK only mentions this as a theoretical possibility. According to the NVKK, it is unthinkable that the captain should use this. After all, he has \"no sense\" of violence and will not want to do so. So despite SOLAS recording the captain's overriding authority, in practice many flag states and contracts between shipping companies and private security companies deviate from this. It is often stated in contracts that in grave life-or-death situations the right to self-defense outweighs the captain's overriding authority. Apologies for all those English words, so it's about situations of life or death. Although there would therefore be no inconsistency in the legislative proposal, there seems to be some ambiguity about the responsibilities on board, which is not clarified by the legislative proposal. My group wonders how private security officers will interpret their right to self-defense in practice, and whether this interpretation will be appropriate and not too broad. Are the responsibilities of captain on the one hand and team leader on the other, both clear and sufficiently secured in this bill? And is this really not a derogation from the SOLAS Convention? I'd like a response from both the initiators and the minister. Mr President, I will conclude. As far as my group is concerned, it is clear that merchant ships in the ocean are extremely vulnerable to piracy. As far as we are concerned, these merchant ships must be kept in mind, but not from the heart. This duty of care is important to us. But it's not so much based on a fear of reflagging. I think there are quite a few assumptions behind that fear. All you have to do is read Wikipedia to see what it's worth. There are many other reasons for this: economic reasons, taxes, cheaper operations, scrapping licences, quota hopping, etc. So I would not dare to say: we need this and we will avoid flagging. There are other reasons for that. Moreover, I have just referred to that race to the bottom in order to make it as cheap as possible. This will also put pressure on our criteria that we want to set. That race to the bottom will continue with this bill."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-12-eerstekamer-11.u95", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. The contribution of the D66 Group to this debate begins with the observation that the amended draft has been substantially modified in several areas. A lot of pieces have been exchanged in preparation. I also agree with the compliments for the many work that has been done. You think that's a ritual, but it's serious. I would like to add a compliment on the thorough and detailed answer we have given to the questions we have put in this House. My group's review will focus on the question of legality. Of course, it is always the case that when you get the floor as an eighth speaker, a number of subjects have already been dealt with by colleagues, but I would add a number of points. Hugo de Groot has already been mentioned. Free passage on seas is a right. Obstacles along the way are often referred to as \"piracy.\" That's very old, too. Nor does it go away, and it has not left Somalia in the Gulf of Aden for the last ten years. Prealabel, I note that international law, we call Hugo de Groot, but we are talking about international law, and cannot be conclusive in its answer to the question that is at the heart of today's debate, namely whether the legislator should allow armed private security officers to sit on board Dutch merchant ships for self-defense. That really is a question that needs to be answered on the basis of Dutch law. And that's not such an easy question. The request for security of the shipowners flying the Dutch flag was raised because an obvious security question had arisen. I've already mentioned Somalia. The request is also legitimate, because shipowners are simply entitled to protection. That is also the conclusion of the De Wijkerslooth Committee, which has been mentioned several times today: the monopoly on the exercise of violence is a state monopoly, including in international waters. However, the key question is whether, and if so, how those activities could also be delegated, in part, to specific organisations on the basis of the law. The said committee considered that question in principle negative. She said that if there were to be another solution, the State should be the first to borrow it. I note that this has not happened, but I ask, just to be sure, whether the current situation is still that the State does not lend. I shall come back later to the conclusions of the De Wijkerslooth Committee. I will concentrate on five aspects in answering this key question. Is it a matter of principle, or is it also a matter of pragmatism? Can you look at it pragmatically? 'Cause can't it just be taken off with a \"no\"? It's like, \"It's state monopoly, ready.\" Despite the firm conclusion of the De Wijkerslooth Committee, the Ministry of Defence proved to have a capacity limitation for this state task, for this monopoly task. For example, I understand from the exchange of documents and from the information we have received from stakeholders that this has been the case for many years. But it goes up and down: sometimes there are more, and sometimes there are fewer. My group is very difficult to deal with in the budgetary and strategic reasons why there is this capacity limitation. It will have to do with job vision, with priorities, with money for Defense. Perhaps there is also an extreme geographical limit to making available, which also plays a part in this. However, as long as these are reasonable requests, for example through the Suez Canal and around Aden off the coast of Somalia, and they do not see on the experimental voyage for exploration, but on commercial voyages, you would think that they should still be able to be met. The Vessel Protection Detachments, the VPDs, have been passed a few times. That is a provision that has been developed and offered to the shipowners who are requesting it, but I understand that there are problems. Mr Vlietstra has also asked for this in the written documents. I understand that there are about 175 VPDs listed in the Defence budget with an average unit of 11 soldiers. They're operationally operational. We just mentioned the norm of eleven. I understand that that is a defence standard of its own and not an international standard. It has also been said today that this standard is not applicable to small ships. They just can't be accommodated on board. So that's an offer that's not congruent with demand. Is this indeed still the situation? I read that it could be less than four, but I'm slightly confused as to what the norm is. And that's important to determine if there's a supply that connects to a demand. I understand that there was a capacity limitation, which prevented the Ministry from meeting the entire demand. That does not seem to be the biggest bottleneck anymore, but there is still an operational speed that can be a limitation. It seems to be taking too long. So you could say: the judge is available, but not de facto. Looking at the Wijkerslooth report, I notice that this was discussed in 2016. A VPD framework letter has been written, but apparently it has not been adequately resolved. Otherwise, we wouldn't be standing here. If there is sufficient capacity and sufficient speed, then there is still the demand of the costs. Are the costs prohibitive or not? And what is that: prohibitive? I would like to ask the authors whether they would like to discuss these three elements of the analysis and whether they can advise me on the actual status and the way in which we should look at this and whether, on that basis, you should, in the opinion of the proposers, break that monopoly. I have listened to Mr Strik's statement of principle and I am very much in favour of it. There is another question of principle. If the State itself does not fulfil its monopoly sufficiently and says \"you can hire me at that cost and at that time,\" and if that is not congruent with the question, you could say that there is a duty of care from the State that may be abandoned. Then I think you should look at whether it is still so fundamentally incorrect under those circumstances. I read in the documents that the Minister does not find this a fundamental dilemma in his own answer to the questions. I think that's different from his predecessors, but I've read that. I'd like to hear if that's true."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-12-eerstekamer-13.u7", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I see that not much has changed since 25 years ago. One of the largest members was of course Hugo de Groot. His name has already been mentioned. What has not yet been mentioned is that in 1604 he was commissioned to write the work De iure praedae, about the rightful spoilt, about the way in which the government under conditions could give private navigators the right to use force at sea. And yes, it has been mentioned: the book that came from it is Mare liberum, about the international law of the sea. It was the legal basis for the Dutch merchant navy and thus also for a large part of our prosperity. The rich decoration of this room bears witness to that. The same shipping is now threatened by piracy. That's what we're talking about today. With your permission, President, I will address the questions that have been asked about the need for this bill, about the monopoly of violence and the relationship with the De Wijkerslooth report and about the principle of 'VPD, unless'. I will deal with the deployment and size of the VPDs, the cost of private security, the right to self-defense and the question whether this is sufficient. I will address questions about the relationship between the captain and the team leader, about the reporting obligations of that captain and team leader and, finally, about evidence gathering and the place in the potential conviction."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-12-eerstekamer-13.u9", "speech text": "I've already had most of it, Mr. Chairman. Mr Van Helvert will discuss the operation of the right to self-defense, the use of bodycams, the use of force, supervision and justice in other countries and the AMvB and any other subjects. Many have asked questions about the need for this bill. I would like to say that piracy is increasing again. The 2018 figures show that 201 ships have been victims, compared to 180 in the previous year. 143 ships have been boarded. There's been 18 shellings. 241 times there has been violence against crew members and there have been 141 hostages and 83 kidnappings. This also affects Dutch ships. It has already been recalled by Mr Dercksen: last year a ship with our flag was attacked in Nigeria and eleven people were kidnapped. It was only after a month that they were released. So piracy is increasing and spreading. The danger is not limited to only Somalia and East Africa, but the danger is now also greater off the coast of Nigeria, on the other side of Africa, on Indonesia, the Philippines, Bangladesh, Venezuela and in many other places. Mr Kuiper asked whether this bill is now specifically aimed at Somalia and that neighborhood. No, it's comprehensive as far as it can be. That is why it is very flexible. However, the need for this law has been given, regardless of wave movements in global piracy. Some of us, as the Netherlands, could perhaps be less affected. Mrs Vlietstra spoke about this, for example, because there are anti-piracy missions in a particular area or because other countries do have private security guards and pirates are deterred. It may also be because ships simply no longer fly our flag. In any case, this is a permanent threat to our Dutch ships and primarily our sailors, who are at great risk. But think also of the home front, which lives in fear and worries about the safe return of their father, their mother, their family. Think also of terrorism financed by this piracy and destabilising the local environment. Of course, think also of the damage to free shipping, to our trading fleet, to its position in the world economy and to our country's central position in maritime transport so far. Questions have been asked about Mr Kuiper's reflagging, but also by Mrs Vlietstra and others. Due to these dangers, many ships have been flagged. We know that at least 30 ships have been flagged out in five recent years, but we will never know which new ships have never been flying a Dutch flag because this law does not yet exist. Mr Ruers has asked how the economic damage can be estimated and where we get the figures. Of course, the first is the human damage to the passengers and the home front, but it is also about the economic damage. The World Bank calculated in 2013 that in that period the world economy lost 18 million euros annually due to piracy. What the precise damage is for the Dutch merchant, we cannot know. It is not possible to estimate what assignments might have been given if this law, which is good protection, had already been in place. It is also too easy to say that shipowners have to go around or leave an assignment. It is often not a single assignment, but a whole series of assignments."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-12-eerstekamer-13.u36", "speech text": "I fully understand that and I fully understand Mrs Vlietstra's question. We are all curious how that will work in the end. However, I think we all recognise that the problems of piracy exist and are very flexible throughout the world. The use of security guards must therefore also depend very much on which ship there is and what the circumstances are. There are so many different factors that the authors of this bill did not want to pretend that they could already foresee it. We would very much like to submit some more secret market data, but unfortunately that is not possible. I have a bit of an understanding for that. Then I come to Mr Schouwenaar's question as to whether the right to self-defense is simply sufficient. Now, of course, anyone who commits violence, and I quote from the law, 'which is provided by the necessary defence of one's own body, honorability or good against immediately unlawful sexual assault', is not punishable. That's the right to self-defense. But this law is trying to go a little further. The crew of a merchant ship that violently resists a pirate attack can rely on that storm. This means that they may not be punishable, even if they are using a weapon that should not have been on board. But it is not enough to use that profession. We are talking here about the anticipating effect, the anticipating defence against potential violence. So not the moment that burglar comes into your house. You're going to sail in an area where you know there's a risk. We want this to happen, and I hear that in the Chamber too. We want all the conditions and conditions arranged and discussed in advance as much as possible. That's why we're talking about certification, about quality standards, about that regulation, about the agreements between captain and team leader, all that sort of thing. That is why we are going a little further than just the right to self-defense, although it is always essential for the safety of people. I hope I have answered that. I'd like to hear it if I have to explain it further. I'm pretty good at the end. I come to the relationship between the captain and the team leader and the decision-making power. Mrs Lokin-Sassen and Mrs Strik, among others, have asked questions about this. Is it true that the team leader ultimately has the decision-making power? The answer to that is absolutely no. The captain has the transcendent decision-making power. There's only one captain on the ship. That should always be clear. By the way, the relationship between the captain and the team leader, as this bill is trying to lay down, is exactly the same as the relationship that already exists between the captain and the leader of the VPD. It's an exact copy. We are not trying to change that in any way. Probably a plethora: primary responsibility for the use of violence lies with the team leader of the security team. The team leader is in command, not the captain. But the captain always keeps that transcendent decision-making power, the overriding authority, as stated in the SOLAS Convention. That means that if the captain and the team leader disagree, the captain always has the last word. So basically, after consulting the captain, the team leader has the right to decide; after consulting the captain. For the sake of clarity, if such consultation is not possible, in an extreme situation, the team leader may act directly. That's why he came aboard. But the captain remains the boss. If he does not want the security team to take action, or if he thinks, for example, that there is excessive violence at the time when the action is already taking place, then the captain can say so and the team leader will have to accept it, because there is always only one captain on the ship. Mr. Chairman. Then I come to the reporting obligations. Among other things, Mrs Lokin-Sassen asked for that. It is true that there are quite a lot of reporting obligations. This is necessary to monitor. The precise obligations are set out in Article 12 of the bill. The captain and the team leader each make a report after each transport and send it to the minister. In those reports, they shall indicate whether violence has been used. If that is the case, they also send images and sound material. In addition, there is a reporting obligation for the master, because at the time of use of force at least, as soon as possible thereafter, the master must report the use of force to the Public Prosecutor's Office. So at that moment we are still sailing in pirate territory. Those images and sound recordings will also be included. By the way, we, the initiators, did not come up with that on our own. A similar reporting obligation already applies to all offences committed on board a ship. That is stated in Article 439h of the Code of Criminal Procedure. Let me say a few words about the recordings of images and sounds. Mr Schouwenaar asked whether this would not be a mandatory contribution to his own conviction. The answer to that is \"no.\" This is a targeted application of the usual observation. The use of images and sound recordings also takes place in other professions where violence can be used. I am thinking of F-16 pilots, who are also always recording images and sounds, and of some police officers, who, in certain circumstances, are recording them. Under Article 11 (5) of the bill, there will be an AMvB at least, if you vote in favour, which further elaborates the rules for the use of those cameras and the meaning of that material."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-12-eerstekamer-13.u74", "speech text": "Yeah, I'll work them all out. I certainly did not intend to stay away from an answer to Mr Backer's question. I understand the point and the concern that, if there is not enough money, we might say again: now we are going to do it up nicely. That is why I say that we must take a critical look at what is now a reasonable price, also in the light of the'market development'. And that brings me to Mr Ruers' point: what is the offer of private security at that time? But that has to be addressed in the evaluation. At present, this is at least the relatively low price compared to the one in the past. Well, let's at least be happy about that. I find Mr Ruers' question very difficult. It was also discussed in the House of Representatives. There is a certain discrepancy between what the Vessel Protection Detachments should minimally contain in the defense's opinion, and how private security deploys it. And I also indicated myself that there is some difference in the whole package that is being adopted. I have just outlined that such a VPD also has very clear quality requirements, for example on the 360o observation itself 24/7. In addition, no more tasks are given to the crew or anything like that. Those are the quality requirements of the Defense Department, and that is the minimum that matters at the time. Mr Schouwenaar asked if I could give a hint of the veil..."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-12-eerstekamer-13.u100", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. I would like to thank the initiators and the Minister for their comprehensive reply. I can see that there is indeed a difference in the appreciation of the government's monopoly of violence. In my first term, I indicated that, as far as we are concerned, this belongs in principle to the government. You're not gonna let that go. At the same time, this also implies a duty of public concern for its citizens wherever they are. It must therefore be possible to comply with it, but I can only imagine that if it is not complied with, there can be... But then you actually lose the principle that it belongs to the government. When I hear the initiators and the minister, they are a little more pragmatic on the one hand in the state of law and on the other hand in the economic arguments which they believe can play a part in deciding whether or not to leave it to others. In my opinion, that is precisely the problem, because it really matters what choices you make when making public capacity available or not. We have talked extensively about the VPD and to what extent it can be made more flexible. This seems to be very difficult and, at the same time, makes the implementation of this VPD principle very dependent on the extent to which it can be adapted to the needs of the sea. From the idea that it may not be ruled out for economic reasons, you are actually opening the door to more competition. This will automatically increase the risk of using private security. That is not a taboo, but it may even be interchangeable. And that becomes more important as VPD isn't really suitable for what it takes. Well, that's where we see the big problem. That became even clearer when we talked to the Minister about these permits and the demands they make. The law clearly indicates how the set of standards and rules for these security companies are set at AMvB. The minister says, \"We don't know how we're gonna fill that out yet.\" My question is who is going to draw it up. We've heard, \"Defense sets standards for the VPDs.\" It also actually determines how flexible it can be. I cannot imagine that we are going to set different standards in that set of standards and rules that the government uses for itself. I would therefore like to have a little more clarity about this, perhaps from the Minister rather than from the initiators. We shouldn't be taking double standards. So I would like to clarify that a little bit. Another point I would like to put to Mr Koopmans is the overriding authority. In fact, Mr Koopmans admitted that it is not always the captain who has the last word, but if you listen carefully to the story, it almost seems as if he is the overriding authority in particular with regard to adjacent matters, and not so much with regard to the use of violence itself. I had mentioned some quotes in the first term. I would like to come back to that. It is a quote from the NVKK. He says explicitly: there is no permission from the captain to the team leader for the use of violence. The NVKK also says that the last word of the captain is actually a theoretical possibility. In their view, it is inconceivable that the captain should make use of it, because he does not understand the use of force. The NVKK says that even in contracts it is stated that in matters of life and death the right to self-defense outweighs overriding authority. So I'd like to have that mirror. The initiator has already indicated that there is a need for consultation. But can he give us a more precise description of what that overriding authority is in, really when it comes to violence? Or is it just about other kinds of decisions related to them? Mr. Chairman. We have talked about making VPDs flexible as an alternative, but we have also explicitly asked to examine other alternatives. One of the things I'd like to give you is this. In Somalia, you can see very clearly that emptying the sea was one of the causes that started it all. Fishermen lost their income as a result. Is that something that is being looked at, perhaps by the initiators or by the minister? Is it being considered to what extent international agreements can combat these kinds of causes? Mr. Chairman. Finally, I have a question about international cooperation. I can imagine that if all countries want to protect their populations, they can also agree together on what they are using their maritime capacity on. Mr Ruers and I have also spoken about this. The Minister mentions a number of EU initiatives, but I read that those operations are those to which one country provides ten and the other four military. This is of a much more limited nature than when Member States or countries jointly make structural agreements to secure their own ships through military forces. This could actually lead to a pool, which would significantly increase capacity. Hopefully, the Minister will be able to indicate what efforts are being made in this area. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-12-eerstekamer-3.u31", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. First of all, I would like to congratulate the initiator, Mr Verhoeven, on being able to defend his bill in the Upper House today. Quite an achievement that bears witness to a lot of perseverance. The bill aims, at least in its original intent, to ensure a complete equivalence of insulting the King with communal insults. The ban on majesty desecration should be removed. This initial objective of the legislative proposal brings me on my own to a first general question. Has the petitioner not seriously considered withdrawing his bill after treatment in the Lower House? Because, let's be honest, after treatment in the House of Representatives, his bill is neither meat nor fish. The Party for Animals will be happy with that, but that cannot apply to Mr Verhoeven. His bill no longer refers to a complete equivalence of majesty desecration with the commune of insults. We are now talking, with all due respect, about some crumbs: the penalty is reduced, the insult of the King must be appealed to communal insults and the grounds for exclusion of communal insults also apply to majesty desecration. Does Mr Verhoeven think that he would later dare to tell his grandchildren with pride, pump and circumcence how he got this bill through the First Chamber? Does he recognize himself in his initial ideals? Mr. Chairman. The kingship stands or falls with the dignity attached to the office. This dignity, the SGP believes, deserves protection and is also served with some mystery, magic and special privileges. I am thinking of the immunity of the King, of various duty-free allowances, of an exception to the rules on funeral care, but also of several civil and criminal regulations. It's all supposed to be, you might say, in our country's choice of a monarchal state. Anyone who looks at this rationally only misses the fact that there are things beyond reason. The love of our royal house in the breadth of our society cannot be separated from the magic of the monarchy either. Within this context also fits very well a special, insulting description of the King's crime. This description of the crime is a symbol of the special position held by the King and the dignity served by it. In addition, a king is in fact defenseless. He cannot defend himself in the same way as ordinary citizens. For that reason, too, a king deserves some extra support and protection, so to speak. The King's position and dignity deserve special protection. That would only be otherwise if there were serious objections to this particular description of the offence, for example an unacceptable restriction of freedom of expression or the impossibility of holding a thorough debate on the royal family. However, there is no such thing. Or can the petitioner make this hard? The initiator will also have seen the responses to his bill by renowned lawyers. I also refer to the article just mentioned by my colleague, Mrs Van Bijsterveld. Doesn't that show that the ban on majesty desecration doesn't in any way create any friction in the area of freedom of expression? What does this say about the purpose of the bill? Is this fear, which is therefore not necessary, for too limited freedom of opinion, or yet secretly a paw of that special position of the Royal House? If there are no problems at all in terms of freedom of expression, why is a particularly criminal protection regime a threat to the initiator? Mr. Chairman. It's campaign time, so allow me. Fine that D66 throws her one crown jewels overboard, but she should not touch the crown jewels of N\u00e9derland. Mr. Chairman. Then I ask the Minister whether, in his view, the insult of the ex-King should not also be regarded as a derivative of majesty. Mrs Van Bijsterveld rightly made this point just now. The existing regulation does not provide for this and neither does the legislative proposal. Isn't this an omission? When Princess Beatrix is heavily offended, this also reflects on the person of the King and on the royal dignity, especially now that Princess Beatrix is and remains so closely attached to the institution of the monarchy. I'd like a response from the Minister to this. Is he willing to restore that legal omission? Finally, I would like to endorse Mr Bikker's intriguing questions about the involvement of our overseas territories in this bill. Hasn't the petitioner overlooked some compatriots in preparing this bill? Mr President, I will conclude. An Dutch party like the SGP does not need this bill. Nevertheless, I look forward with great interest to the answers to my questions. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-14-tweedekamer-7.u371", "speech text": "Thank you, Madam President. Much has already been said in this area. It is up to me, as the last minister in this period, to outline a little bit about the broader perspective when it comes to the integration portfolio. I think Mrs Westerveld made it clear in her first term that we are dealing occasionally with a split. We can see that, too. Over the last few months, we have talked frequently about problematic behaviour in the integration domain, which is not a criminal offence. If something is punishable, it is in a way clear, because then the prosecution can prosecute. However, we often have to deal with problematic behavior in this area, so behavior that we find undesirable in this country and that we want to do something about, but which is not always the legal instrument for. Against this background, the Cabinet established the Task Force Problematic Behaviour and Unwanted Foreign Financing. It is precisely with this task force that we want to increase the information position of the Empire and the municipalities, and to increase the scope for action of these municipalities. So we want to give instruments to these municipalities to actually do something if they are confronted with problematic behaviour. This is partly also about unwanted foreign financing. We've talked about that recently. But it's wider than that. This is also the answer to a question from Mr Bishop. He asked: what are we doing to give these municipalities more perspective of action and help the mayors? The task force communicates with the municipalities to see exactly what is happening. That's the analysis. But we are also looking together at what instruments they have to intervene with. It can start with a conversation and it can end with disruption, all in an effort to prevent that problematic behavior that we don't want in this country. In addition, it is constantly searching, because precisely because it is not punishable, it remains, of course, a bit of a grey area, I say in my own words. But that task force will help us to support the municipalities. We do that on a broad palette of subjects. They have not only to do with extremism, but also with extreme right-wing behaviour and undermining, for example. That is in response to Mr Bishop's question. Mr Bruins of the Christian Union asked for new legislation in this area, so apart from the field of education that Mr Slob was just talking about. The cabinet is, of course, working on a number of laws. The Civil Code, article 2:20, has been around a number of times today. But I also mention the law on the obligation of transparency, of Minister Dekker. It obliges foundations and institutions to make transparent who donates money to those foundations. And I myself, together with the Minister of Foreign Affairs, am working on the bill on undesirable foreign financing, precisely because there is undesirable influence bought from abroad, or can be bought which we have problems with in the Netherlands. The developments at the Cornelius Haga Lyceum in Amsterdam show that problematic behaviour often involves a complex layering of reality. So things aren't always criminal. But anti-democratic, anti-integrative and untolerant behavior is socially undesirable. Mr Van Meenen asked in his contribution to the role of this school in the local approach of Amsterdam. From the municipality I understand that the school does not play an active role in that local approach of Amsterdam. However, there are contacts with the school from other parts of the municipality, as well as from the police. But in the local approach, there's no role for this school. However complicated it may be, the government has a responsibility to protect its citizens. The task force, together with these municipalities, is working on an overview of all possible interventions within each track of what is then called \"the three-track approach.\" We also call it the escalation ladder. We'll start with the conversation. If that doesn't work, we'll scale up, escalate, see if we can move on. These are both measures that can be taken from the municipality and measures that are more at national level, i.e. those of the state. This escalation ladder will also include the measures emerging from the investigations currently under way by the Minister of the Interior. It is primarily about possibilities for intervention and, secondly, about existing interventions in other areas. Think of the outlaw motorcycle gangs. I believe that Mrs Kuik has an initiative law on this issue. Or take the Wet Bibob, who just came by to see colleague Slob. Perhaps these can be applicable to the present forms of problematic behavior. Again, it's wider than just this school. It's really about several areas. Mr Heerema of the VVD asked about the integration of children. Most of the policy in my field focuses on the parents. The following applies specifically to the children. There is a citizenship mission, and Mr Slob has just spoken about it, which requires schools to pay attention to active citizenship, democratic values and social inclusion. The new legislative proposal further extends and strengthens this obligation. In practice, we notice that parents with a migration background sometimes need extra support to educate their children in such a way that they feel at home in and connected to the Netherlands. Then we started pilots in five municipalities with the title Weathering, just to see what we can come up with to help parents. Parents play an important role in preventing anti-integrative and anti-democratic behaviour. They're running now. A report on this issue was published at the end of 2018. At the moment, we are looking at what we can do more broadly and how we can follow up where we can also help it roll out a bit wider and other municipalities on this important issue of preventing defenseless children from falling prey, so to speak, to anti-democratic and anti-integrative behaviour. What I also think is important to say is that there is a need from the community for well Islamic-oriented education. The fact that high quality secondary education with an Islamic basis is possible shows the developments at the Avicenna College in Rotterdam, for example. Mr Van Meenen spoke about this and also Mr Heerema. This is education aimed at integration, citizenship and participation in Dutch society, but also with space for one's own religious identity as a starting point. There too we see that in practice it is a daily search. That's why Avicenna College is an example. You see that struggle, and it's still a focus for all of us. I would like to emphasise that the communities involved often suffer most from this problematic behaviour. That is what Mr Heerema said in his speech. The behaviour of some rotten apples affects the whole community, as they are confronted with messages that make it more difficult for them to participate fully in society. Problematic behaviour also has a negative impact on the Islamic community as a whole. Wrongly, an entire community is addressed on and also identified with the behaviour of a few complex figures, let me put it this way: those who very consciously place themselves outside society with their views and really do not want to be part of society. That is why, as a government, we also see the Islamic communities as important partners for the local government in particular, but also for the government in the fight against problematic behavior. We're good at talking to each other to strengthen that position. Islamic education can count on active protection of the municipal and also the national authorities. Mr. Chairman. That's it. Those were the questions I was asked. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-26-tweedekamer-17.u118", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. Today we are discussing Mr Snels' own-initiative proposal and six other Members of Parliament. First of all, I would like to congratulate the authors on this bill. The reason for this proposal is the absurd salary increase that ING director Ralph Hamers wanted to give himself in spring 2018. According to him and according to Jeroen van der Veer, EUR 2 million from ING's supervisory board was not enough. No, it had to be and it was going to be 3 million euros. Mr. Hamers played Champions League and was paid out according to the standards of the Jupiter League. So 50% had to be added at a time when the purchasing power of the average Dutchman only increased by about half a percent per year. ING: intensive cross-standard gripping. The top of the ING bank became known as the hard-hitting Dutch. Under great political and social pressure, the salary proposal was later withdrawn. Now the same Mr. Hammers from the same ING bank comes up with the bizarre statement that the bonus policy in the Netherlands is too strict and that therefore certain financial jobs do not come to the Netherlands after the Brexit. This gentleman doesn't have a plate for his head, but half the Biesbosch. The banking sector proves to be very hard learners over and over again. Therefore, supervision of banks needs to be strengthened. Mr. Chairman. It is clear that the DENK Group will therefore wholeheartedly support this proposal. Wrong financial incentives lead to wrong actions, wrong policies, wrong financial products, the spread of wrong risks and wrong debt positions. This ultimately undermines the stability and integrity of the entire financial system. Any proposal that restricts these perverse incentives can count on the warm support of the DENK Group. Large capital in the financial sector collapsed the world in 2008 into the worst economic crisis after the Second World War. This bill is necessary because this sector has proven itself to be a hard learner. Banks and the financial sector have been under discussion for years. DENK is critical of the functioning of the banks and the financial sector. Too often things have gone wrong in the past. Mr. Chairman. This has been going on for a long time. In the 1980s and 1990s there were already so-called junk bonds: worthless bonds that were sold with all kinds of sales tricks. Around the turn of the century there were the known accounting frauds at Enron, at Xerox, at WorldCom, at World Online, at Ahold, at Parmalat. Later we had the share lease affair with Legio Lease and Dexia Bank, in which people invested with borrowed money without knowing. Even later, we had the very extensive usury policy affair, in which banks and insurers sold financial products with very high hidden costs. Millions of them have been sold. Then there was the DSB affair, in which people with temporary decoy interest rates were tempted to take a lot of credit and buy-out policies, which eventually caused them to suffer from unaffordable debts. Research after research showed that advice from financial advisors only brought the consumer out of the rain. The advisors, including those of the banks, mainly advised products that paid themselves the most commission, putting the consumer's interest aside. It was \"self-interest first\" and \"the higher the profit, the better.\" In retrospect, it is inconceivable that these so-called bounty hunts could last until 2013, when the ban on the commissioning of a number of products finally came into force. Mr. Chairman. The 2008 credit crisis has already been referred to a few times today by profit maximization and perverse incentives in banks, wrongly provided mortgages and incorrect financial constructions. The financial sector crisis eventually led to a global economic recession of unprecedented magnitude at macro level. But at micro level, many personal dramas had preceded it, especially in people who were wrongly advised about financial products. Some lost their homes because of a mortgage that should never have been granted. Others lost their money because they had invested without knowing it in structured packages of these toxic mortgages. The crisis in the financial sector eventually shifted to the real sector, which ultimately affected billions of people. The central point between financial instability on the one hand and the general economic crisis on the other hand turned out to be the bankruptcy of the Lehman Brothers bank on 15 September 2008. Within a few weeks of that black Monday, all the economies of the world sank into a deep recession. For the irresponsible behavior of greedy bankers, countless people eventually had to pay the bill. In short, it is not surprising that many people no longer have confidence in the financial sector. The customer interest is still not central, as shown by TV programmes such as Radar and Kassa. Examples are the interest rate derivatives dossier, the lack of credit that SMEs still suffer from, and the fact that banks do not want to help their own customers with lower mortgage rates. The consumer must always ask for this and is systematically opposed. In 2009, a code of conduct was introduced with the core of \"the customer central'. That customer had to be at the heart of things at last. But this still doesn't seem to be between the ears of many bankers. The latest version of this Code of Conduct started on 1 January 2015. I would like to hear from the Minister whether and when there will be a third, improved version of the Banking Code. As far as the DENK Group is concerned, this should become a code of conduct which not only lingers in the boardroom, but also penetrates the workplace. I'd like a response from the Minister. Mr. Chairman. Mr Van der Linde of the VVD referred to the clawback. Why are banks still resisting this? It is a power of the Minister of Finance to recover part of the fixed remuneration if the State has to save a bank as a result of that bank's mismanagement. The banking lobby doesn't want this. This testifies once again to the hard learning of the sector. Mr. Chairman. Finally, the diversity of the banking landscape. Can the Minister examine the possibilities of transforming the Volksbank and ABN AMRO into sustainable public banks offering basic payment services? The WRR, the Scientific Council for Government Policy, also advised this in January. I'd like a response from the petitioners and the minister. Mr. Chairman. To conclude: as far as the DENK group is concerned, this is a fine bill, which helps to tackle the problems. I wish all six petitioners success with the defense here in the Chamber and hopefully later in the Upper Chamber. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-03-28-tweedekamer-10.u19", "speech text": "Just so we're clear, I'm gonna stick with the defense motion. Furthermore, at the moment, I cannot come up with a plan, because the motion and the subsequent question are based on an assumption about situations that are likely to come. It is not at the moment a question of speculating on this. The cabinet cannot do that in such a letter. Mr. Chairman. Then I have an answer to Mr De Graaf's question as to whether Mr G\u00f6kmen T. was familiar with the services. I have already said that there is no way in which I can answer these questions. Again, at the end of next month, or at least before the Mayaces, but that begins, I believe, on King's Day 27 April, I will come to the Chamber with a letter. I have expressly said, and I repeat this to all parties, that I will really put everything together, in so far as the interests of criminal investigation permit."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-02-tweedekamer-26.u2", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. A year ago, one of the Dutch largest companies, AkzoNobel, sold its Specialty Chemicals component to the private equity investment company Carlyle. He received a loan from the State Fund from Singapore. The reason for this sale was not the poor market conditions and neither did Akzo's operating results nor the Specialty Chemicals component. The sale was motivated by the desire to pay shareholders a short-term dividend of more than 5 billion in 2018 and 2019. So these are more than 5 billion that are not invested in the company and not in the Netherlands, but they usually disappear in foreign hands. The case has a background. AkzoNobel threatened to be taken over by PPG in its entirety in 2017. By blocking this hostile takeover, American and British shareholders, in particular, who missed their takeover premium, felt disadvantaged. They have actually been paid off with the vast majority of the proceeds from the sale of Specialty Chemicals, which is now called Nouryon. A well-functioning business has actually been sold to spawn American and British shareholders. Mr. Chairman. The Minister has written to this Chamber to attach to the harmonious Rhine model. Does he not agree with the SP that in this case we see much more the effects of the Anglo-Saxon shareholder model, where the desire for short-term profits can directly conflict with longer-term business interests? If so, how can we protect our companies from these effects? Carlyle's business model is to buy up companies or business lines and sell them again after a short period of time. It is obvious that they intend to do the same with Nouryon. Moreover, the company is saddled with most of the debt of the loan needed to buy the company. Carlyle needs a quick win. Nouryon's new top manager has already talked about an aggressive strategy. And in the meantime, the investments that are being made take place in America, where the company also wants to go public in the future. Meanwhile, the more than 2,500 Dutch employees are actually on the sidelines in this process. Although they have helped the company to build up, they cannot do much more than use their legal advisory rights in this type of business; an advice that is subsequently ignored. If this is the Rhineland model, then we must conclude that it is really nothing more than an optical illusion: the appearance of participation to ensure that reality seems less serious. Mr. Chairman. I would like to put two basic questions to the Minister. In the first place, is he prepared to come up with further proposals to strengthen the position of employees vis-\u00e0-vis shareholders, precisely in order to counter the negative effects of corporate takeovers or the rejection of business parts? Second. How are we going to prevent large Dutch companies from being so defenseless for foreign shareholders in the future, aimed at short-term profits, that they must also have the negative impact on the employment associated with them? How can we arm ourselves against this? Thank you, Mr. Chairman."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-03-tweedekamer-2.u173", "speech text": "No, he didn't get 16 years. In the end, he only got eleven years, and that means that he was already free after six, seven years. And I'm not just suggesting, I share the opinion of many Dutch people who have had enough that criminal attorneys do everything to hide the truth in a courtroom and exonerate horrible offenders, murderers and rapists. They go beyond what the law deems necessary. So nat\u00fa\u00farlijk needs every suspect good defense, but there are too many criminal attorneys who lie and cheat in court, who hide the truth, who don't tell the truth in court. I have spoken against this before and I think that many Dutch people with me are sick of all those criminal attorneys who do everything..."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-03-tweedekamer-5.u56", "speech text": "That is precisely the key question, because the Minister began by saying: I feel in my fibers that this must be done. Then the driver came up in him, who said: they may be incidents, it is still human work, and I have already taken these measures. It felt as if there was irritation, as if there was only defense, when we needed that sense of urgency with each other. At the end of this debate, we must have the confidence that every fibre feels that this is a structural problem, that this is not yesterday's problem, that this problem requires immediate solutions. If we continue the debate in a game of defense and do not feel that it is a mentality problem, a cultural problem, an urgency problem, then this debate is actually pointless. That's what I'm looking for."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-09-tweedekamer-30.u45", "speech text": "I get it. It's all going one step at a time. That is, of course, what we see in the end. We are fully committed to this. I see that steps are being taken, and that is what Mrs Diks sees when she walks around our workplace. Mr Kerstens cited a survey. It is, of course, painful and understandable that such a survey has been carried out, but you can only make improvements step by step. The staff and the good stuff must always go on together. That's the way we see it. So the judgment remains the same. The Secretary of State will say something about the ammunition side. The motion in part No. Mr Kerstens asked for a plan of action. I have already said that we find what is being found painful but also understandable. It's not new to us, just like it's not new to you. We've realized from the beginning that when it comes to trust in the Defense Department, we have to come a long way. That is not because we are necessarily responsible for it, but because we are faced with it in this case. We have also always said that we find this a difficult task and that what we are now investing as a cabinet is this 1.5 billion, but a good start to achieve a large-scale recovery in the end. We have put that down from the beginning, from day one. But with a plan to work on restoring trust, I don't think you're adding anything. I really want to discourage this motion. I think it's about doing things, showing things, talking to people. One of the things I've noticed in the defense department is that we already have a huge bureaucracy. Then, please, let us not write another plan of action, but just get to work and show what we stand for. So this is what I'm talking about. Then I hope that Mr Kerstens will help, that we will simply show each other that we are doing the right things and that we are working on that together. So I would certainly advise against this motion, because I do not want to put time in writing plans."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-09-tweedekamer-30.u66", "speech text": "So that's what I'm gonna try to do. The motion has already been dissuaded by the Minister. You received a D letter from me last year on investment in ammunition supplies. I would also like to make the point that it has also been established by the Chamber that it is necessary, precisely for the employment and safety of our military personnel, that they can work and practice with the right equipment and the right equipment. The Minister has already given an example of this. What we are doing now is only for the main task number 2, the international legal order. That's what ammunition supplies are for. I am working not only for main task 2, but also for main task 1 to make clear what that means for ammunition stocks, both in terms of deployment and in terms of practice, but also in terms of clothing and also in terms of what is called 'operational infrastructure' with a very nice word. Then you're talking about the tents, the heaters and whatever you need, regardless of whether you're operating in the highest spectrum of violence, for your defense commitment, when it comes to your first main task. As the Minister also pointed out, it's good to realize that it's not or-or. It's and-and, because our military also want good combat boots, good combat suits, a good tent and plenty of ammunition. Those are all kinds of things that go with it. I would like to move on to Mr Kerstens' motion on item No. 117 on the RVU levy. I think we're in agreement on that point. It is not for nothing that I have also indicated, in connection with the CDA's parliamentary questions, that I object to the RVU tax imposed. I don't have an answer to that yet. That is why I would ask Mr Kerstens to hold his motion, because I would first like to know what will come out of it. I would like to stress that this debate was held under the previous cabinet, Rutte II, with the then Minister of Social Affairs, the then Secretary of State for Finance and the then Minister of Defence. Social Affairs emphasized that the aim of the tax imposed on Defence was an incentive which one would like to lay down with employers, as Social Affairs had also proposed. I myself think you should look at that differently, because we have a law from 1966, which was much earlier than the RVU tax. That is why I have objected. That is why I would like to await the ruling, so I would really ask Mr Kerstens to hold the motion."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-10-tweedekamer-4.u183", "speech text": "This interruption is part of a recognizable pattern, so that is in that sense a reassurance. First of all, an image is being created that Mrs Leijten herself outlined. She says that this is the government's position and then she asks me not to do so. Well, what Mrs Leijten just outlined was not the government's position. She sketched a lot of topics. No veto on defense. This has never been the case. No veto on foreign policy. The only thing that has been raised is the veto on human rights sanctions, for example, which the Chamber wants and which can now be stopped by one of the 28 Member States, perhaps also the country where an important port has just been financed by a country that could be targeted by human rights sanctions. In such a situation, it can really be in the Dutch interest to say: human rights sanctions are not unanimous. That's the only thing that's in store. This is just for the sake of relativization. Furthermore, the Dutch government's priorities are clear. I would appreciate it if other governments would put that on the table as clearly as possible."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-16-eerstekamer-7.u16", "speech text": "That's actually what our country always says. The Minister will undoubtedly put it more effectively and better than I am now improvising. If there is criticism, for example, of the fact that we are not achieving the 2% standard for defence, then we are not always wrong to say: that is true; in fact, we should achieve that; that is what my group also thinks, but do not forget all our other financial efforts to promote international stability. We are talking about issues ranging from the promotion of the rule of law, from the rule of law to classical development cooperation, as a whole package of stability-enhancing measures. But that includes defense. If you look at the situation in the world at the moment, there is more reason to pay extra attention to defence than there was at the time."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-16-eerstekamer-7.u18", "speech text": "I do not think you can expect the EU as a whole, of 27 Member States, to have a common view of the importance of those 27 Member States. That's why in defense you usually see a coalition of \"the able and the willing\" of those who are able and willing to act when it comes to actual action. But it's exactly as Mrs. Strik says it is. You're gonna have to see what you can develop together. And that's what's gonna happen. The Netherlands cooperates with Germany. The Netherlands cooperates with Belgium. We're pooling equipment. We're working with Britain. In my opinion, when it comes to actual implementation, it is better to allow it to grow from below rather than from above. So that's also a bit of a growth process you're going through. I am sure that will not end up with a European army of 27 Member States. But that does lead to more power, including in the defence field, of a number of countries that want to defend their own interests and values."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-16-eerstekamer-7.u90", "speech text": "I'm going to serve Mr. Van Apeldoorn on his beck and call later. After all, it is another nuanced argument. Mr. Chairman. I was at the first real concrete experience of cutting off the branch, namely the Brexit. The unbundling of the exit agreement shows, of course, that what is called 'ceteris paribus' in the economy, namely that all other factors remain the same, can never apply after a Brexit. The political leaders in the UK did not have a solution for this either. That turned out to be the day after the referendum. Nigel Farage immediately resigned as leader of UKIP. Gradually, it turns out that the promise actually didn't have any substance. This is tragic for those who voted in good faith. In fact, it's a time machine without a real calendar or plan: back to somewhere, back to when it was better. But the big question is, of course, when was that? Everything has gradually changed since the Treaty of Rome. In the metaphor, the tree has been given many branches. We have had all these great treaties, the Treaties of Maastricht, Nice and Lisbon, and then all the other less large ones. The essence of my point is that the Brexit is of a symbolic order. No cost-benefit analysis has been made. The value of sovereignty has only been mentioned and pursued, but the value for the citizens, that what that sovereignty is going to earn in real terms in their lives, has never been priced at all. You could say \"that might not be priced, because that's a feeling\" but then you should also be honest and say: it's going to cost you a lot of money, but well, then you'll be back in your own trusted environment. That is why \"take back control\" has of course been found so handsome, because it encourages the feeling of losing grip and ignores the characteristic that cross-border action over the national scale is needed to be effective. This is even more true for the Netherlands than for the UK. Let those who say that in a Brexit but also in a nexit just say honestly: we are going to lose prosperity, we are less effective, the citizen is going to go backwards, but we have our way; the pain is through self- chastisement, but it is less bad, because we have done it ourselves. That is not the line we want to choose. That's why a Brexit is also a destructive concept. Unfortunately, we can now see that unfolding. What's the other approach now? Mr Van Apeldoorn and Mr Kuiper also asked for this. That is the further development, construction and improvement of the European Union. There are many persistent differences in prosperity, between Member States, between regions, in neighbourhoods, in cities, between developed countries with a developed welfare state and Member States that do not yet have a minimum wage or even have no assistance. The European Union is a community of values which is progressing shockfully, sometimes backwards, and which is not moving forward unanimously. You'd love to, but you can see that it's also deteriorating in some areas. We have already discussed the complaints about Poland and Hungary, about Article 7. But at crucial moments, which could have turned out to be quite different, the EU, and within the euro area, proved more shock-resistant than expected. I would remind you of the role of the support funds. We have passed them all here in the legislation: Ireland, Malta, Cyprus, Portugal, Spain. They are now back in a phase of economic growth. We now have 3.8% unemployment in this country. Economic growth is taking place in all the countries of Europe. We would have cut the Netherlands down, but it didn't happen. The shock-resistant capacity of the euro area was much greater than we thought. But there are shortcomings. We do not need to be convinced of that. A number of instruments needed to mitigate macroeconomic shocks and stimulate investment have not been included in the instruments when introducing the single currency. That was too early then, but I'd say it's time to do so now. Before the forthcoming European elections, my colleagues in the European Parliament have many radical wishes in many areas, including the circular economy, the energy transition, consumer protection and the social dimension. I come to the point Mr Van Apeldoorn mentioned. There is also an important moment of choice and, in my opinion, a dilemma for him as well. The social pillar can only take shape if facilities are put in place to promote social security in other Member States that are lagging behind. So it is not about breaking our system down to a lower level, but about helping to build other systems. For example, freedom in connectedness should look from the social-liberal point of view: forward rather than stagnation. Then the differences in prosperity will not disappear as snow before the sun, but together we can do more than separate. This was also discovered by the States of Holland and Friesland in this room, where we are now allowed to meet. Mr. Chairman. It concerns the D66 Group in debates that we look ourselves in the eye and say: it is our responsibility to do better in those international fora, to form the right coalitions, to be inventive, and to run a step faster or to be smarter. The outcome is the result of giving and taking. That was just the subject of Mr Schaap. There is now a creeping erosion of self-confidence of middle parties in our country and in other countries in Europe, sometimes with the open accommodation that the EU is the cause of all shortcomings. But that's not gonna make us any better. The symbolism of the anti-EU sentiments discussed reflects a choice not to dare to engage in dialogue with the critics of Europe, but we must have that dialogue. \"You cannot live in chatter or symbolism,\" said a former politician of the Labour Party. The defense file just came by. That's actually exemplary. Of course, very far-reaching decisions have already been taken on joint defence, NATO and the EU. We were just talking about sovereignty again, but we are already working with the Belgians and with the Germans. We have integrated brigades. The Dutch army can no longer act without other European countries. We could, in my mind, save about 30 billion dollars in European defence procurement if we worked together. We have now reached legally binding agreements on a European security and defence policy, also on the basis of the Treaty of Lisbon."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-16-tweedekamer-28.u143", "speech text": "For the cultural aspects, I can imagine that the Minister will consult NOOM, the Network of Organisations of Older Migrants. Finally, a few words about the right of access. Much has passed by on this, in the run-up to this debate and in the debate itself, in the defense of the Minister for his bill, to which a number of colleagues have tabled amendments and which I and other colleagues have asked critical questions about. In any case, the Labour Party is going to look again at the amendments tabled by colleagues before we vote, because, as I said in my speech, there is no 'just a little criticism' of that aspect of the legislative proposal. The minister finds many parties opposite, not only in the Lower House, but also in the field, where there is a broad front, a broad coalition of patient and client organisations and industry organisations of aid workers."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-17-tweedekamer-13.u93", "speech text": "But that's not what I'm saying. I'm not saying it's not a very big problem. It's a big problem, though. I'm just trying to show that I don't think it's illogical that the healthcare sector is the biggest detector of all sectors in the Netherlands. In fact, if the healthcare sector were not the biggest detector, I would be worried, because that would indicate a lack of alertness. It is a sector with 1.3 million people, much larger than any sector. One in seven people with work works in care. In that care, everyone deals with confidential data every day. So if not a large part of the AP reports were to come out of the care, then we really should be worried. Is this a major task for the care sector? Yes, of course the care sector has a huge task, because there are so many people with so much confidential data. And so the healthcare sector has a very big mission. That's a big assignment we have to live up to. I'll outline what steps we can take later. But I didn't want to make it any smaller than reality and what's actually going on. What I am saying is that the scale of the numbers is not so much a lack of care, but rather a sufficient level of alertness. I'm happy about that on my own. I'm not ruling out any more next year. In fact, maybe we should all hope that next year the number of reports from healthcare is more. That would indicate a growing alertness and with that alertness it should begin. We can't do anything. We can make rules until we're on our own and we can set up systems, set up firefighters' functions, but it really starts with common sense. Mrs Kuik said that quite rightly. Mr Peters said it too. Common sense. And also: what you do not want to happen to you... when it comes to sharing data. That's actually the most simple rule in life at all, but especially when it comes to data sharing. What would you think if it were your family, if it were your child? Would you like to see it all out in the open? No, of course not. And so: common sense and treat another in terms of information as you would like to be treated yourself. That's actually the first line of defense or defense wall versus data leaks."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-17-tweedekamer-2.u22", "speech text": "I'm obviously grateful for that, but I want to make a point because this is always making me worse. If the PVV has been calling for something for years, it hasn't been supported for 13 years, but a few years later the parties suddenly come up with it themselves. Then we'll be tens of thousands of battered animals later. Why? Why always wait to come up with it yourself? Political gain, party politics over the back of defenseless creatures, who are far more sensitive than you, Mr Moorlag, I say through the chairman."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-04-24-tweedekamer-3.u134", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I would like to begin by congratulating the initiators, including the defense on this day. It's a good story, so it won't surprise you that we wholeheartedly support the bill. It is ultimately about restoring confidence, as has been said several times. Without trust, there is no financial sector. When you look at the financial sector and the lessons learned, you see that people are very hard learners and always look for loopholes in the law. It must therefore be the policy that sets the limits of what can and cannot be done for a sound financial sector. Then we actually put the ball on the spot for the Minister today. We have taken the step today to give him a position that is much firmer. The goal's empty, it's only 10 feet, and he's really gonna shoot it high. Maybe we won't get out today, but how is the Minister going to hit that ball really hard? He says: I am also going to make a number of proposals and I am also prepared to intervene in part if necessary. We are very curious about that, because that must be very firm. Because we now know from this financial sector that if we are not able to take firm action as a political one, it will be the right conversation. Then it remains that dialogue, the cup of coffee and the moment they drive away in their big car, they think: nice, we go back to our own course and maintain our own work and our own culture. So, Minister, kick him in the ass! If not today, do it as soon as possible! Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-05-16-tweedekamer-4.u85", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Today we are talking, and much has already been said, about the revaluation of certain forms of crime. The cabinet introduces two new crimes, namely revenge porn and obstruction of aid workers. Vengeance porn takes up to one year in prison and perpetrators who hinder aid workers can count on up to three months in prison. In addition, the penalty ceilings for a number of offences go up a bit. That goes for home invasion. Theft in a home is now subject to a maximum of six years in prison, regardless of the time at which this crime is committed. Trade and possession of automatic firearms will be subject to a maximum of eight years in prison. In addition, there is an increase in criminal liability for child abuse. Child abuse is terrible and, by definition, has very vulnerable victims. It is therefore a good thing that the Cabinet wishes to extend the limitation period for child abuse and to add systematic abuse as a separate grounds for increased criminality, and that the grounds for increased criminality for child abuse are extended to other persons, such as people working in schools, boarding schools and health care institutions, where abuse is too common. The PVV always welcomes the increase in penalties, especially in the case of offences that have a major impact on the victim and society. However, the penalties now being announced are not substantial. For I ask the Minister: if someone robs a defenseless woman in her own home, is six years of jail time a terrifying punishment? Is that really high enough? If an aid worker is harassed and hindered on old and new occasions, so that the aid workers cannot provide adequate help and have to do their work at risk for their own well-being, is three months really a great punishment? This minister says that people who commit violence against aid workers and agents should not get away with community service. We agree. But a few days in prison, apparently, the Minister thinks it's terrifying enough? I wonder how aid workers and agents who are constantly being attacked with old and new people think about this themselves. Why does the Minister not propose, for example, a minimum of five years in prison for this kind of horrible crime? And is the Minister prepared to ask the aid workers themselves what they think is an appropriate punishment, and to inform the Chamber about it? So the increases proposed by the Minister are not really very much. But we have another major problem in the Netherlands, and that problem is so great that all these increases will prove to be almost irrelevant. The problem is and is: the magistrate in the Netherlands, the judges and the members of the Public Prosecutor's Office. Namely: the Public Prosecutor's Office often requires too low penalties and judges often impose far too low penalties. The ordinary citizen has been calling this out for years, but nobody in the Chamber wants to do anything about it except the PVV. The magistrate is given by everyone here in the Chamber and by the Cabinet but is given the space to ignore the will of the people, high, just punishments instead of low, weak punishments. As mentioned above, any increase in penalties is welcomed by the PVV, but the penalties in the Netherlands are and remain far too low. Take the only three years of jail time a tbser's been given. He was already in the tbs, then he raped an employee there, and he only got three years in prison for this rape. For a rape! Or take the terror father who has systematically abused ten of his children for years and years and locked his children in the attic and in a shipping container. He was only sent to prison for two years. Or the asylum seeker who has only been sentenced to 20 months for a gruesome rape, who is later qualified as 'other', so that no one knows that asylum seekers commit such terrible crimes. According to the Minister, this bill has a terrifying function. The maximum penalties proposed by the Minister for the crimes he has chosen are only a tiny piece of cloth on a bleeding wound. For example, I have examples of too low penalties up to and including jut-jut, but let me mention one more example: that was extended today in De Telegraaf. Michel B. was convicted in 2008 for the multiple rape of a child. Raping a child! But within one year this Michel B. will be outside again. He shouldn't have been in jail for one year, as far as I'm concerned, he should have been in jail for at least 20 or 30 years, or even life for me, because a child has been raped. The judges, they should've gotten TBs, because they're crazy enough to give such a horrible criminal just one year in jail. Then a question to the Minister. Why does the Minister think that the increase in the penalty ceilings in the law will actually have an effect? For example, in 2012, the maximum penalty for trafficking in human beings was increased from eight to 12 years, but the number of convictions for trafficking in human beings has only fallen. Judges didn't go to prison any harder. For example, in 2016, the average penalty for trafficking in human beings was only one and a half years. The only way for judges to actually impose higher penalties is by introducing minimum penalties. At present, judges have an uncontrolled freedom in the area of punishment. Nevertheless, despite everything, this CDA minister has done a lot of work on one increase. That was the doubling of the penalty rate in Article 137d. But that's because his party, the CDA, saw in this doubling the opportunity to call a political opponent. A political reckoning. CDA-poldermafia practices. The leader of my party, the PVV, has been unjustly haunted by the Dutch magistrate on the basis of this article for six years now. And that, as a child understands, the competition is of course convenient. The penalty rate for this article should not now be doubled. This article needs to be amended first. This article unnecessarily restricts freedom of expression; we have just discussed it. Of course, you should not encourage violence, but the freedom of expression in the Netherlands should be extended and not restricted. The next question is to the Minister. Why didn't the Minister choose to increase and, for example, double the penalty for rape, manslaughter, aggravated assault or robbery? These seem to me to be serious crimes, even those that are now being punished too low. Why doesn't the minister do anything about the low penalties for the most serious crimes? Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-05-21-eerstekamer-12.u128", "speech text": "Well, I didn't hear them say that. And I also think that some of the initiators here will appeal to the government about what will be in that plan. They won't turn to the tables. I can count on that, can't I? I'm hearing some corroborating noises around me. That's what I thought! I see we agree on a lot of things in this country. Then we'll get to those targets. Because is it the case that if you want to regulate parliamentary order and Parliament's involvement, then there must be goals in it? Well, they're in there quite often. Laws on air quality and the environment often have standards, so they are often in them. But in this case there is another reason, because we already know these goals. They're old acquaintances. If we say there must be a 95% reduction by 2050, it's already been through here with you. The ratification law has also been passed by you. We've already decided that. That's an old acquaintance. That's nothing new. This objective of fully CO-neutral electricity production simply follows from the scenarios. Because if you want to reach the first, you're stuck with the second. Yeah, there are also scenarios that say you have to have negative emissions with your power supply. That may be true, but positive emissions from electricity are not part of the scenarios, so that just follows. And also about the third goal, the 49%, I don't have to be very secretive: that's what I'm getting at with............................................................................................................................................................................................................................................... We've drawn the line between now and 2050, and then you come up with something for 2030. And that too, live the ruler! It follows from what has already been decided here. I will have to live with that, because we know that laws are passed by parliamentarians and not by members of the government. Mr Schalk has also made the analogy with NATO and pointed out that the 2% NATO target is very much cheaper than the climate target, but I will get to that in a moment. He says: well, that would be something; if we do it this way with goals, I might want to have a 2% target in the law. But, yes, that is the difference between a 2% target in the field of defence and climate policy. Mr Schalk can easily draw from a single document, the annual defence budget, exactly whether the 2% is achieved or not. He does not need any other integral document or overarching law to do so. That's a little different with climate. The climate goal comes from the addition of, but also the interaction between, a variety of different policy areas and various departments. That overarching, common goal requires some coordination. This would be beneficial if we were to write down an objective somewhere other than in a single budget. That's what we did here; that's what the initiators did here. That is quite logical, and the Council of State agrees with this in its opinions. It says that a goal in this law, a goal for climate policy, is useful. I believe they use the word \"useful.\" So there's a certain difference with the defense budget. Now we have goals, and if you don't make them, what happens? Mr Ten Hoeve said, very nuanced, for which I thank him, that it may be attractive that we do not bring about Urgenda-like situations here. At the same time, however, it is a question of whether, in his words, that should not be regulated a little tighter. That's actually the question. But then back to the purpose of this law. The purpose of this law is to involve Parliament in policy-making, not to place the judge in a political chair. Given that objective, it is logical that we commit ourselves without bringing in the judicial system immediately. In my view, that should be the answer. There is also a lot of question about how to decide on the Climate Act if you do not know the costs. I will come back to the size of the costs later. It's a question that's been asked, but right now it's the main issue. I must remind you that the Paris targets have already been ratified here. The joke of this climate law is that, in intensive treatment, within a framework and with a proper cycle, we can talk about what that policy should be, what it may cost and what the impact of that policy is. That is what this proposal is for, precisely in order to be able to have that conversation. So anyone who is concerned about costs should be us, but I'm going to have to come back to that later to embrace the fact that this climate law is forcing us to talk to each other over and over again. The big cost up to 2050 doesn't exist. There are estimates, but I will come back to that in a moment. Another point that has been raised a great deal is the so-called approval of the plan. But that is, of course, essentially about the role of Parliament. That too is important, precisely because that is the bruise it started with. That's why we're doing this. That is the central point, and that may be asked. So that's what this law is about. Whether it was Mr Pijlman or Mr Binnema, I can no longer trump them, because they have explained it very clearly. In that cycle there are government plans, as in so many other areas. The Millions note is a plan, but also structural visions, the Regional Planning Act, the MIRT, the NOVI and all legislation in the field of nitrogen and air quality. There is a plan and then we have the 200-year tradition of discussing it with each other. There is a tradition that the government takes motions seriously, also because otherwise it could be sent away ultimate. That's how you talk about a plan and then legislation comes along. There is only one person who can say yes or no to this legislation, and those are the people present here. That's a big difference between a bill and a plan. That is the case in all these areas, and we have always done so. If every policy plan were to follow the route of a bill, you would in fact create a very busy task for this Chamber, because then it becomes co-ruled. That was never really the intention, and none of the speakers found the intention. The Council of State's opinion on the handling of this plan has been explicitly followed, so it is as the Council of State suggests."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-05-tweedekamer-13.u2", "speech text": "Mr President, thank you. Whose public information is provided by planning agencies? As far as I am concerned, that is the question that is at the heart of today's debate. Whose information is it? Good journalistic research by Nieuwsuur has shown that the Prime Minister has acted as a driving force when it had to be published. The Prime Minister has indicated at what time the calculations of the Planning Bureau for the Environment could best be shared with the Netherlands and with the Chamber. I think that's problematic. I would like to stress that I do not want to have this debate to indicate that the Prime Minister has made mistakes or to accuse him. I would like to use this debate to clarify how we are going to work together in the coming period. The climate file is a sensitive file. I think there will be a number of speakers tonight who say: you see, the cabinet is behind everything; you see, they are trying to fool the people. I think that's a problem. If we want to build support for climate action, there should in no way be the idea that information is being withheld. The only way to do that is to ensure that plans are immediately shared with the Chamber. I would therefore like the Prime Minister to comment on the following. The memo of EZK of 24 August states that it will look at whether the transfer is made public before or after Prinsjesdag and that it will depend on the content of this transfer. In the memo of August 31, AZ says that publication is undesirable. And that while the Ministry of Economic Affairs and other advisers finally state that it is important to proceed to publication before Princess Day to prevent leaks, in order to avoid thinking that things are being withheld, which I also warned you about. For me, the desired outcome of this debate is that we agree that the information that is yet to come is shared directly with the Chamber, even if there is no cabinet juice. I didn't think the Prime Minister's defense was one of his best moments, I'll say. It is often the case that reports are presented that are not yet ready for cabinet juice. I call the Urgenda targets. Are they gonna be made or not? We've been waiting 20 weeks for a further appreciation of that. I am looking at the figures presented in March of this year, which is already ten weeks ago on the climate agreement. Again, we are still waiting for a cabinet response. So it's possible. I really want the Prime Minister's promise that in future he will also send all the credit transfers that come to the Chamber as soon as they are available. Because, of course, there are quite a few pots on the fire, as the Prime Minister himself calls it. I would really like to know which calculations are already complete and can therefore be shared with the Chamber. Mr. Chairman. Finally, I would like to ask whether the Prime Minister would like to comment on the debate I had with him during the General Political Reviews. I asked him about the CO tax and how it could contribute to achieving the climate targets. We have talked about how hard the agreements in the climate agreement are. That is what he literally said in the debate: I cannot say anything about it now, we are still looking at it, we have to wait for the PBL bill. But it was ready. It would have been right to say: I haven't been able to deal with that, I haven't been able to respond yet, I don't know yet. It was said to us here: it is not ready yet. That'll put the Chamber on the line. Because the Prime Minister knows exactly what the Chamber would have said. The moment he said \"it's there,\" we'd have asked for it. He could not have refused and then it should have come to the Chamber. Mr President, I come to a conclusion. I hope that today the Prime Minister will make a commitment that all the information coming from the planning agencies will be shared directly with the Chamber."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-05-tweedekamer-13.u48", "speech text": "I kind of like it. The VVD has a new line of defense. If there's criticism, the senders of that criticism are stupid or weird or confused. Jesse Clover is stupid. Mrs. Marijnissen is stupid. I'm stupid. Mr. Wilders is stupid. News hour, which has questions, is, of course, stupid, like all those journalists at Rutte's press conference. They're all very stupid, because everyone knew what was going on from July 10th. Then the climate pope told you that at the end of September you will receive the appreciation. That's kind of the line of defense as I understood it. So that should end with us apologizing for harassing the VVD and the Prime Minister with questions about this really nasty accusation that this is weird. In that light, I wonder if you think Mr Ed Nijpels is stupid too. He sent a steamy email late on 5 September in the evening in which he said: \"There was agreement on 13 September up to the highest level. That was not just a matter of reason, but on the basis of careful consideration. That was also agreed with the Planning Agency.\" He was the client, wasn't he? \"AZ then started to object to political arguments, namely: it has to be lifted over the APB.\" 'Political arguments' have been cleared up, by the way. Further on, he says: \"I am not going to ask the PBL to postpone the press conference on the basis of the above points. It stands for AZ, or even better the mp.\"You taste the bitterness of the former leader of that party, who sees how democratic principles are squandered \"free to contact the PBL yourself.\" I don't mind if you share this note with AZ. Put it in the archives.\" How stupid do you think Ed Nijpels is, if we're all so stupid here that we're asking questions about this? He really didn't understand anything."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-05-tweedekamer-13.u52", "speech text": "Yes, you've said that a few times. Then the Prime Minister is free to interpret an appointment in a way that the client of an independent agency who has not experienced and about which he sends furious e-mails? That's the VVD's defense line? That's what we have to do, and the rest isn't stupid, but curious?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-05-tweedekamer-13.u58", "speech text": "This is something interesting. Now the line of defense is changing. Just now it was a very stupid, no, curious question from all of us. Ed Nijpels was a super-oil dumb climate pope."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-05-tweedekamer-13.u60", "speech text": "I just said in my input: I think the cover-up is worse than the offense. I find it insane that if you are caught by Nieuwsuur, you say the Prime Minister's intervention for a debate: it is not a good time for me. I understand that. It's certainly not the first time or the last time that happens, but he gets caught and then there's a story like that. A story that the country will become completely unmanageable if we'd provided those figures. Bullshit! You have read the report and it says: these measures are too vague to be passed on and yes, CO-tax would be a good idea. It didn't come out because then the debate wouldn't be possible without cabinet juice, but it didn't come out because it was bad for the cabinet because there just wasn't anything there yet. That's what's going on. I'm fine with the line of defense being: yes, it wasn't that neat, but you've done that yourself while you were sitting there. That's a different line of defense than \"the whole opposition is crazy.\""}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-05-tweedekamer-13.u231", "speech text": "About that PBL report, we're getting those things, aren't we? We do business with planning agencies, too. There is no hearing and hearing on the results of a model. During the transits, questions will be asked to you. That's what I was told. Then they come back to you about six times with questions like, \"What does this mean?', \"What does that mean?\" And \"how should we interpret it?\" But once these models are turned, there's an outcome. The Prime Minister hangs his entire defense here on the fact that it is super-super important to always have a PBL report accompanied by a cabinet response. And at the end of September, the PBL will present a report without a cabinet response. It is therefore an opportunity argument that the Prime Minister is using, because if it had been so important, you would have caused it to be postponed for a week or the cabinet response to be made faster. You didn't."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u12", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. The Jan van der Hejonstraat (Jan van der Hejonstraat) was spooked by a gas explosion a few kilometers from here on 27 January. Three homes were completely blown out of the street. There were no deaths, but there were ten wounded. The cause was a 12 centimeter crack in the cast iron gas pipeline. Here, too, it is a question of maintenance. We read in the newspaper this morning that we still have 3,830 kilometers of this kind of dangerous gas lines. Here too the story is: the execution of the replacement assignment is lagging behind what is needed. What's the Cabinet gonna do about this? The same applies to ICT. The General Court and Mr Snels have already spoken wisely about this. It is painful that even our highly qualified General Court cannot get a grip on what the government spends on maintaining ICT. Lack of a standardised accounting method seems to be the basis for this. Can the Minister now explain clearly why, according to the cabinet, one generic framework for governance, risk and compliance would not be a solution? And what about the exploration towards other ways to ensure that the responsibility for the maintenance of ICT systems is standardised? This is referred to in the cabinet response. Are we going to read in the next state that concrete agreements have been made about this? Is it conceivable that non-crucial ICT projects will temporarily go into the refrigerator until the maintenance of existing systems is in order? Is it possible to extend the powers of BIT as an ICT watchdog to research issues of ICT projects, I ask the Minister of the Interior. In that case, too, the call can be made in good time. Mr. Chairman. Finally, people. 'Cause it's about people. Today, I would like to focus on staff: the tension between enough money and too few people. Mr Nijboer mentioned this. The General Court notes that where this cabinet decided to invest, it often fails to actually spend the extra money. Where it was decided not to spend any extra money, the services of the Empire sometimes deteriorated. The Court of Auditors calls on the cabinet to pursue strategic personnel policy, and the cabinet hardly goes into that. With the police and the Defense Department, the outflow is even greater than the influx of new people, despite all the extra money. Mr Nijboer also mentioned this. When you realize the large numbers involved in the care, education and tax administration, care is in place for those in need who deserve good care, for children who deserve good education and for citizens and businesses who deserve well-controlled tax attacks. With Mr Nijboer I am curious about the reaction of the rulers to this. How do they tackle this gauntlet of the General Court? Mr. Chairman. On D-day, I want to end up with DOD. The readiness of the defence equipment has still not been restored, even though billions more have been added. The Court warns against a vicious circle. There are too few maintenance staff and there are too few engineers and buyers, so the recovery cannot be achieved. At the same time, the poor state in which our defense is providing a drain of personnel. See here the vicious circle the Court of Auditors warns against. How is the cabinet going to break this circle? Of course, it doesn't help if Defence doesn't even manage to reach an acceptable collective agreement with the unions. It is irresponsible for this situation in the defence sector to continue to be so."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u46", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. I didn't have a maiden speech two years ago because I had it long ago. But I do have a farewell speech today. Here I am again. Thank you for your lovely words. Mr. Chairman. The books for 2018 are closed. The Dutch government is including the tax claim there we're going again about 400 billion on pension assets probably the richest government in the euro area. I would, of course, like to congratulate the Minister on this result, but I also congratulate others, namely the citizens and businesses in our country. Together they raised the surplus of nearly 12 billion. Since 2012, collective burdens have increased by 3 percentage points, equivalent to EUR 24 billion higher taxes. The surplus should therefore not be surprised. It would be amazing if it hadn't been there. The other side of the coin of higher burdens and rising surpluses is, of course, the decline in purchasing power for years. In 2017 it was already very disappointing, in 2018 the weather was very disappointing and again this year we see the same pattern happening. Even the Central Planning Office didn't get past this. It re-examines the purchasing power estimate. Yeah, well, that doesn't mean anything. \"That's just disappointing,\" said Daniel van Vuuren, head of public finances of the Central Planning Bureau recently against De Telegraaf. \"Inflation seems to be higher before 2019 than we previously thought. We're going to look at that again in the next estimate.\" A few months ago, our critical questions about purchasing power figures for this year were answered in a casual manner, but now they are going to look at them again. Now that the cabinet is working on the AOW-age, the Central Planning Office comes to the aid of the established order with spontaneous sustainability billions. This makes the Central Planning Bureau vulnerable: sustainability at the command of ongoing negotiations. It looks like the Scientific Research and Documentation Centre (WODC): science on demand. I think there's more financial space in the longer term, but you can't pull it out when it suits you. 50PLUS is also always calculating and is entitled to the latest information. The reduction in the AOW age will be much more financially viable in the longer term with a windfall of 4 billion. Of course, we want to know that from 50PLUS immediately. Raising the AOW age was a political choice. Lowering the AOW age is equally a political choice. Mr. Chairman. It all points to the fact that this year nothing has been achieved about the beautiful purchasing power predictions, not for workers, not for benefit recipients and again not for pensioners. For pensioners, the downfall in 2018 was even double the disappointment of the average citizen. But that doesn't bother the cabinet. On the contrary. This battery of unfulfilled purchasing power predictions was not the beginning and will not be the end of the poison cup for pensioners. That poison cup must of course be completely empty, including the end of the pension system as we have known it for 40 years. It hurts to talk about it just today on my last Chamber day, one day after the appearance of a provisional pension scheme: provisional pension agreement. Many sacrifices have been made to maintain the pension system. For ten years, there has been no indexing. As a result, pensions have become de facto 20% lower. This applies to everyone, from pensioners to young workers. This missed indexing for young and old will never be overtaken. Several funds that were relatively poor have also had to cut short and even the retirement age has been raised as a blow, but it was not allowed to benefit. Nothing but nothing helps a capital-covered system against the scorched earth as a result of risk-free interest rates. On the basis of this national interest rate canard, therefore, there is a pension agreement, an agreement that shines away from it. Today we are experiencing the lowest ten-year interest rate ever in the Netherlands: minus 0.05%. The state gets the present. Security in pensions is being abolished, a security which, incidentally, never existed. For convenience, the cabinet ignores the fact that millions of people participate in a pension fund that does not have any buffers at all. They struggle with a coverage level just above or below 100%. It's just bullshit for this huge group that the discounts are off the track. It should be feared that many large pension funds, the big four in particular, will have to be cut down immediately, now, at the end of the year or at the end of next year, and also once the new system has been introduced. At the moment, the coverage rate of four large funds is below 100%, which means that they will have to be cut unconditionally and definitively at the end of the year and at the end of next year. I refer in particular to the metal at the end of the year. The two metal funds represent 2 million people, of whom 1.5 million are working and only 0.5 million are retired. They fear a 10% discount. Mr. Chairman. The employers are satisfied with this agreement. The premiums remain stable. They will no longer have to contribute to the maintenance of an additional 25%, but the premium will have to be covered. This is going to be a massive and extremely vulnerable renovation. In the case of an interest rate of 1%, a premium should be roughly doubled or the structure, the structure for the workers, should be halved. That is not going to happen, of course, and that would be a disaster for the workers, but until that is resolved, workers will continue to pay too little contribution compared to the pension they are building up, and that will be paid back by the pensioners. With this pension agreement, the Netherlands remains the country with the largest pension assets and with the lowest calculation rate in the world. The fact that the result is therefore already very shaky should not surprise anyone. All in all, there are more minions than pluses to be found in the draft agreement. The balance sheet is negative for 50PLUS. Solving the average problem is a plan, but the funding is not yet clear to me. Somewhere between 60 and 100 billion must be found. In any case, this is at the expense of the level of coverage of at least 4%, with all the consequences. I would like to say: first, give full clarity about the costs and the cover of those 60 to 100 billion before introducing them. It would have been even better to think first and not to decide until you know for sure what the consequences are. Then there is a specific problem with Europe. The question is whether the agreement still fits in with the European rules which gave the Netherlands an exception and give competition law for our pensions. Next thing you know, you solve a non-existent problem with a hugely complicated new build-up and you get the horse of Troy from an organized competition between insurance companies and pension funds. Mr. Chairman. The calculation rate remains cast in concrete. It's just a matter of faith. So what is the Dijsselbloem Commission doing? If yesterday in the agreement it was agreed that the premium should cover costs, then the interest on the premium is simply due to short-term and long-term interest rates. What happens to long-term interest rates for pension funds? Will it finally be aligned with the insurers or will we not get any advice from that committee for a long time? Mr. Chairman. I will be surprised if the FNV members vote for this agreement by a majority in the next few weeks. Suppose, as in the last ten years, the new system produces a 6% return, for example, then it takes ten years for that 6% return to be reflected in an increase in pensions. It's going very slowly. Moreover, this system was not so badly chosen in itself, because if it had existed in the last ten years, pensions would have been substantially increased on the basis of the actual rate of return of the last ten years, 7% each year. But if we only start after ten relatively good stock market years, then such a positive outcome for the future is far away and also very uncertain. I would say: trade unionists, count your buttons; still discounts and no indexation, especially because of that 60 billion claim. And the AOW age for young people in the new proposals still goes to almost 70 years, and we do not think that this is a wink. Mr. Chairman. It is not just the government that needs to prepare for bad times; it must also enable citizens to do so. The purchasing power in general is not an achievement of this cabinet. The burden burden is a fact, but precisely because it has risen so rapidly. The draft pension agreement builds on the extreme risk-avoiding interest rate vision that has been adopted in the Netherlands, but which is applied only as strictly when it comes to pensions: an accounting rate of 1%. Climate investment has a social discount rate of 3%. All right, everybody, listen up! Pensions 1%. Climate 3%. Power load in box 3: 5.5%. The pension contributions for young people are calculated at a rate of 2.8% and according to Capital in the 21st century of the French economist Thomas Piketty, all these interest rates are a gross underestimate of the actual return on capital. Mr President, I am almost at the end. The IRS. In the annual financial report for 2018, very little was said about the public authority that makes all these fine figures possible for 2018: the Tax Administration, five years ago the best public service, with high international standing. But under Rutte I, II and III this cork on which everything floats has lost its famous reputation. I hold Rutte responsible for that. This should have been chiefsache for years. The growing number of deficiencies identified by the Court of Auditors in 2018 is, of course, yet another humiliation for the service in conjunction with the policy holiday requested by the Secretary of State. Mr President, when you read my farewell letter you left a passage and now leave it to me to say it here: on 28 May, the Secretary of State stuck a letter on the door of the Tax Administration 'closed because of renovation, can still pay'. How could it have come to this? I will, of course, continue to follow this dossier intensively, I can assure you. Finally, Defense. A few rules, Mr. Chairman. It is today the commemoration of D-Day, also mentioned by others, 75 years ago. Our liberators are coming to visit, but our current defense personnel still have to do it without a proper collective agreement. This stalemate really needs to be broken. They deserve maximum appreciation. The fact that in the spring note the cabinet tried to ship our NATO associates with a tip of only 160 million is an insult which we can correct today. 50PLUS therefore proposes to abolish the RVU fine for Defense, releasing 150 to 175 million for our armed forces. I shall table a motion on this subject in the second term. Mr President, thank you for your leniency and apology for the overrun."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u59", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I know the SGP as a highly financially sound party. According to Mr Stoffer, the public debt has to go even further down. But if I have counted just as quickly, there must be a billion or 6,7 for defense, 1 or 2 billion more for relief of charges, single workers and additional money for infrastructure. I wonder how the SGP thought it would fund this."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u68", "speech text": "The concern expressed by Mr Stoffer about defence and infrastructure has, in my view, been expressed by many parties here. But at the same time, the defense needs to go to 2%. Your group chairman regularly says 'we want more money to go there'. Then I find it hard to understand when you start your introduction with \"Well, well, Minister of Finance, aren't you a little too spacious; shouldn't you have another tooth?\" Then you have to point in the direction: where do you want to look for it? That is what I think is so balanced in a debate. I miss that now. On the one hand, wish lists are laid down, but on the other hand, there is no indication that this is not necessary to the decimal place where you want to get them."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u69", "speech text": "I believe that I have complimented the Minister of Finance for the fact that this year, too, the debt of the state has been brought back. I assume that policy will continue in the coming years. I think we're gonna see it go back a little bit. The fact that I address a number of cases here that we address every year is clear. We've always been clear about defense. If you have seen our election programme last time, you will have seen that we have properly covered it. Infrastructure is now a new issue. I don't think it's a huge amount of money. I can say wonderfully: you know, we transfer it from construction projects. But I think that's too easy. All kinds of commitments and political desires are established. I think you've got the whole country on you if you're gonna get some of that out of there. In fact, there are still a lot of wishes for projects that have not yet been covered. They're also in the coalition agreement. So I think that is too easy, but I agree with you that the coverage should be included when we talk clearly about how much we are talking about. You can rest assured that, if we need to do so later, we will take a strong interest in this. I totally agree that we are not going to get there with open ends, but I am far from wishing for a huge laundry list. These are two logical points, which I think we have always said a few things about. The maintenance is indeed a new point, but we are not talking about huge posts."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u103", "speech text": "Yeah, exactly. And again, there's a six-month trajectory. If you've been here since your third year of life, or... If you're born here, you can go into that trajectory where it can happen within six months. Dan DOD. The Minister for Finance is still talking about under-utilisation. But there were also some questions asked, among others by Mr Bruins, about expenditure, in the sense that it would not have been put well with the material readiness of Defence. We're dealing with a whole series of backlogs in the Defense Department. That is well known and is being worked on incredibly hard. Many additional resources have been made available in the coalition agreement. Work has been carried out, among other things, to put the investments in order, including in terms of conservation and recruitment. There's a big staff question behind that, too. Additional resources have also been made available in the Spring paper. 'We are not there yet', I say to the American ambassador, when he begins, and rightly so, about the Wales Pledge of 2%. Because the cabinet wants to see what we can spend extra on Defense in the future, and the Wales Pledge is about 2024 and not about 2019. But you're seeing a steady increase in defense spending. The 1.5 billion from the coalition agreement, now again the Spring Note, and we feel bound to Wales's commitments to work towards 2% by 2024. So that's just standing up. Recruitment is a top priority, as well as maintaining staff. It also looks at alternative ways of getting the work done. That can be both temporary and structural. Rental, outsourcing and co-operation with the market. I will not update on the collective agreement negotiations, because they are always precarious processes and they must now be followed up. Mr. Chairman. Then I think I have answered the questions about the monitor, the climate, education and defence and security to, so my impression is, more than complete satisfaction, because nobody gets angry."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u159", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. I would also like to thank Members for their questions. I will make a number of preliminary remarks, then specifically talk about first the Court of Auditors and then the burden and the economy, and then the CW and the supplementary item. Then there's one question about broad prosperity, then defense and investment. Finally, the other block, where \"other\" as often happens to be very rich and other cubes will prove to be rather limited. Before I go into the questions asked, it is good to note that the whole cabinet, but I, as Minister for Finance in particular, attach extraordinary value to this debate. I am also pleased that the Minister for Foreign Affairs is present at this debate. As a coordinating minister, it will answer all questions relating to ICT and information security. But I would like to emphasise, also to the Chamber, that ICT is really an issue that concerns every ministry, not least my own ministry, and that I know from experience how complex, persistent and extensive these problems are. Mr. Chairman. Public finances belong to all of us and to all of us. That is why it is so important that we report annually on the income and expenditure of the Empire. I would like to thank the General Court very much. I think they have left the lodge, but I would like to thank them very much for the advice and comments that keep us sharp. It is not always easy for colleagues in the cabinet and myself, it is sometimes confrontational, but it is always helpful. As Mr Van 't Wout said, it is also part of a mature democracy. I would very much like to join in that. Mr. Chairman. The Court of Auditors has, of course, said a lot about the shortcomings. I will say a few more about this in a moment, but let me make a few comments. There is a high degree of legitimacy in terms of expenditure and revenue. The Court of Auditors also endorsed this with a positive statement. We stay within the 1% margin of error. Many Members, Mr Nijboer, as well as Mr Stoffer and Mr Sneller, have pointed out that there is not only good news on this issue. I recognize that very much. Particular attention should be paid to the management of a number of departments. The number of deficiencies has also increased from 35 to 47 in business operations. Seven deficiencies have been resolved, 18 new ones have been added and 29 have not yet been resolved. There are also quite a lot of shortcomings in financial management. According to the Audit Service, the Court of Auditors confirms that there are no major fluctuations in financial management. Mr Azarkan, Mr Sneler, Mr Snels, Mr Nijboer, Mr Stoffer and Mr Van 't Wout all asked questions about financial management. I cannot go into every one of those pieces with all my colleagues now, but from my role it has my particular attention. In general, I would like to say that although on the one hand imperfections are a fact of life, as the Court of Auditors always explains to me when I asked a year ago how I got rid of a lot of those imperfections in a year, they said to me: have no illusions, if you have an imperfection, it usually stays with you for a few years this total palette asks for action from the cabinet. Each of the speakers I have just referred to also drew attention to this. This means that I will not be asking for specific attention in the cabinet next Friday, but in the next Friday, that I will draw attention to this in the Ministry of Finance, and that we simply have to get on with it. Mr. Chairman. I will continue in the Court of Auditors category. I think I answered Mr Van 't Wout's question by saying what we are going to do. To paraphrase him: I would, of course, not want the Prime Minister to be the prime prime minister in this century who would not get a positive statement and would also have to look at his finance minister. I hope that we have been able to address this immediately to the satisfaction of the VVD Group. Mr. Chairman. I believe that Mr Nijboer and Mr Sneller asked about the balance sheets. Quite rightly, that is what people are asking for. Something unfortunate happened there. The Secretary of State and I seem to be calling that Saturday prior to the Monday we sent that letter. That shows that something clearly did not go well there. As I have also informed the Chamber, this means that we will have to introduce the four-eyed principle even more clearly here and that we will take measures to prevent this problem. That calls for something from the Tax Office and possibly from the Audit Office of the Empire. What is reassuring in all of us is that no one has gotten into any kind of trouble, as the Secretary of State and I have also informed the Chamber. But I'm the first to admit it wasn't pretty. Mr. Chairman. Another point in the category of unlawfulness, which I believe several spokesmen asked for, among others Mr Van 't Wout. With regard to decentralisation payments, we are going to examine whether the Financial Ratio Act needs to be amended. Maybe one or two more comments on liability management. This is particularly a problem with the Treasury and the Defense Department. This simply means a task for these two ministries, including myself and my ministry, that we will have to steer better and, if necessary, use more capacity to get that right. Mr. Chairman. That brings me to the block on burdens and the economy."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u195", "speech text": "Quite precisely, for me, it is essential for the Chamber to be given the explanatory statement in accordance with 3.1. This is necessary for parliamentary discussion. This can be done in the budget itself, or in a separate letter. That is in no way in question to me. I will also draw attention in the monitoring to the explanatory notes on those transferred supplementary items. I hope the viewers at home can still follow. I think that's as far as I can go right now. I ask the whole of Snel for some understanding. Mr. Chairman. The Prime Minister has said almost everything and more about what was to be said about the Monitor Brede Prosperity. I think there's one thing Mr Snels left lying there. We've had a lot of contact with them in plenary. I would like to say to him that we will really pay attention to this in the Millions Note. That is not so much a repetition, but I think a refreshment and an addition to an earlier commitment I made to him. I think we all see the problem. I agree with the Prime Minister's reply when I say that it is not so easy to do so in a way that then makes sense with the Million Papers. But I'm really gonna work on that. I'll be in the under-utilization, in the Defense and IenW, and the investments there. The question by Mr Van Dijck, Mr Slootweg and Mr Sneller was why the money is not being spent. In fact, they didn't even ask so much why it isn't being spent, as how it can get money back. We still have the debate on the Spring Note ahead of us, but let me get it out of my head for the DOD. At DOD, we're making an additional investment. We believe, as a cabinet, that this is much needed, given the challenges that exist and given the Welsh Pledge. Of course, we consciously take into account the under-exhaustment that was there last year. For the record, I believe that 10 million will be added this year and that amounts to between 400 and 500 million, or a small half billion. Then it goes back to, again out of my head, 162 million structurally. We have therefore taken into account last year's under-exhaustment. By the way, the good news is that this money from the Defence Department will simply remain available and will also be spent in the coming years. The Prime Minister referred to that as well. Mr. Chairman. There were also a few questions about why, including Mr Slootweg and Mr Sneller. Mr Nijboer referred to this as well. After all, it's a combination of a number of things that make this play for the Defense Department and for Infrastructure. If you look at 2018 it has to do with the moment when the cabinet started. The cabinet started on 26 October 2017 and has deliberately wanted to be ambitious from the start. That means that much had to be done in that run-up. It has worked on a lot of subjects. The directors of Infrastructure and Defence have worked very hard on this, but that has not been fully achieved, I will simply be honest about it. At the same time, we have spent many billions more on all issues, but certainly also on these two. The second reason why things are going less fast than we want is that on these two issues there have been such huge sums of money and here you see the downside of something that we have previously described as very positive with each other, namely the state of the Dutch economy, combined with the fantastic employment we have at the moment. Had we had this money for infrastructure about five or six years ago, it would have been much easier to get builders to work. Then it would have been much easier to spend some of the money on the defense. We're dealing with this dynamic. After the discussion in the cabinet, I also looked explicitly with the Minister of Infrastructure and the Minister of Defence at what we can do to spend that money on good plans. The rulers are the first to want that very much, because they stand in front of their own shop and they want us to do those things that society needs, in this case safety and accessibility and transport."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u214", "speech text": "I will come back to this in the second term, but part of the 5.2 billion will be taken away. 2.2 billion of them go to infrastructure and defense. That's on the budget, and that means you have 3 billion left. I just want to know exactly which part of the 3 billion goes below that 1% standard, so that it does not damage expenditure, and which part goes to the repayment of public debt. I just think that's a very fair question. I have also asked this question a few times before, even in debates, but in the written answer I only get the answer: most of it goes with me. It's about 2 billion, and that's more than the Empire spends a year on the MBO! So it's a very reasonable question."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-06-tweedekamer-12.u236", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Thank you all for the first-term input. Surely it is a special time for me to be here as Minister of the Interior and Kingdom Relations. I even think it's a scoop in a way, but I think it's good and I think it's important. Questions have also been asked today about ICT, information security, business management. Traditionally, a large part of the debate is also about this, hence the agreement that I am also in charge of coordinating matters of this kind. I think that is a good step, but I also realise very well that this has given me a certain responsibility. Let me say straight away to all those who have raised the issues of ICT and information security here. In other words, I share their concern. That is why last October, the cabinet decided to give the Minister of State extra powers in this area and to tackle the problems with real authority. I sent a letter to the Chamber in October. That is the way we want to deal with it. That won't solve it overnight. I am not under any illusions at all on this point, but we think that we have taken a step in the right direction. I'm going to go through the questions that have been asked about this and start with Mr Van 't Wout, who also spoke about it first. He asked the cabinet, and in particular me, to really come up with a clear and convincing plan on how we're going to improve that information security. He also asked to make the Chamber clear not only how we do that, but also to provide a planning. He asked for interim reports. Other members then made similar comments. I sent a multi-annual plan to the Chamber in February. We call that the Strategic I Agenda 2019-2021. That's what it's about. This is an approach consisting of state-wide measures. How do we improve control? How do we improve and share knowledge and skills? How can we attract ICT talent? In short, a plan of action including firm measures. And that, as far as I'm concerned, is the starting point, the starting point from which we have to work. By the way, there is an AO scheduled on 3 July, the AO Functional State Service, in which these pieces are scheduled. Information security and ICT are not just tough and complex subjects, but are also subjects that are actually constantly moving. I believe that Mr Van 't Wout asked: can you say that before 1 January this year it will be much better or perhaps it will be resolved? I'm sure if I promised that, I'd promise too much. I couldn't live up to that. However, I can promise that we will take firm measures and map them in a structural manner, just as we need to better identify the vulnerabilities of the ICT systems of the Empire. In other words, what I can say is that we have a plan of action and that we take these measures in a structured and joint manner, that is to say with all the other colleagues from the cabinet. And there's a coordination at the Ministry of Foreign Affairs. I would also like to say that your Chamber will be informed of this in a letter in the autumn. It will describe the progress of all these state-wide measures on ICT, on information security. And, of course, I will also say that the recommendations of the Court of Auditors, which are simply knocking down in the individual departments, are being taken up and monitored. So it must not be lost, without any insight, but the departments must take the actions they have to take, and they must follow the recommendations of the Court of Auditors. We need to monitor this and I will ensure that your Chamber will also be informed of this by means of a progress report in the autumn. Mr. Chairman. Mr Sneller of D66 pointed out that ICT and information security deficiencies were higher this year. That's right. I can't take anything away from that either. The rise is probably partly caused by the fact that the world is changing and that new things are being asked of the government. But at least it is a clear signal that we really need to get to work in order to guarantee that necessary level of information security. And the most pressing flaws must be addressed as quickly as possible. It is never nice to hear from the Court of Auditors that there are shortcomings, and it is certainly not nice to hear that there are more, across the board, and also in my own department. But it's a good thing we know, because what you know, you can handle it. So we are also in the mood to do so. Mr Slootweg also asked about this report, which I already made a commitment about in the direction of Mr Van 't Wout. Mr Slootweg suggested reporting four times a year. My proposal would be to do it twice a year, also just to not overburden the reporting burden. I hope that Mr Slootweg and others can live with that. Of course, as much of the commitment as possible should go to the actual improvement of information security and ICT, but I am very aware that the Chamber has expectations and that it can only monitor them if they are reported on a regular basis. So my proposal is to do that twice a year. Mr Snels asked: why can't you really identify how much government spends on maintaining certain systems? Can I make better arrangements about the administration within that government? This is an understandable question, and I think it is right. But the Court of Auditors also says that it is not easy to collect information about ICT management and its costs. And there's something else going on. I think we often focus on the major ICT projects, and thus less on management in its entirety. IT is basically everywhere, and everything behind it. Sometimes you start with a project that applies to me and to my colleagues because you want to change or improve something, or because you have been given a new task, and that is a lot of attention. But of course there will also be a lot of costs in ICT management because, as I said, ICT is actually behind everything. That's a bit underexplained, isn't it? But we've started. For example, in collaboration with the Tax Administration, we are now testing in a pilot form with the inclusion of ICT management activities on the state-wide ICT dashboard, so that we can get a more complete picture. In that strategic agenda that I just mentioned, it says that I want a thorough evaluation and a further development of the Rijks ICT dashboard, because I think that dashboard provides the steering information that can structurally improve accountability about the management and accountability about the maintenance that has to be done. But you're gonna have to build up and make up for that control information first. So I will be able to set additional frameworks, where necessary, based on this new way of working, with the additional powers laid down by the Minister for Foreign Affairs, without losing sight of the diversity of the entire ICT landscape. Mr. Chairman. Mr Bruins of the Christian Union also had a number of more specific questions. He asked why I do not create a generic framework for governance, risk and compliance for IT management within the Empire. He also asked how you could continue to work on the same point that Mr Snels made, namely the responsibility for the maintenance of ICT. Could you standardize that further? Are we still able to make concrete agreements on this further along this route? In response to his rather specific questions, I would like to say a little more generically that I agree with that, but we must realise that I know that Mr Bruins does this like no other, that ICT within the government is so diverse and so complex. I have just said that the Court of Auditors agrees with that. It remains the case that the ministries themselves are responsible for their ICTs and should even be able to make demands on their ICTs to do justice to their own responsibilities, but that I do see and agree that it is really necessary to be able to manage the risks properly. I therefore hope that this dashboard, which I have just mentioned, will provide us with the necessary steering information, so that we will indeed be able to report better and structuralally, including to your Chamber, on the ICT systems in the future. Moreover, the Court recommended that better arrangements be made between the CIO Rijk and the CIOs of the departments on information sharing. I think that is also a very logical follow-up. So I take this recommendation to heart and I would like to take it on board. As a result, Mr Bruins also said, at least he suggested that perhaps you should have management in order before starting new projects. That's a logical thought. He also suggested that BIT should play a role in this. First of all, every minister, every ruler, must make that assessment. That sounds good to me, too. There are projects that are intended to replace old systems or some old systems, but of course new projects are also needed because of new services, because of new wishes, things that we want to do or which we have agreed here with each other that we will do but which are not yet there, and which also require a system. So every time that consideration has to be made. The BIT is already fully involved in the review of ICT projects. I do know that Mr Raymond Knops, the Secretary of State for BZK, who is formally responsible for BIT, will present a letter in the autumn on the future positioning of BIT. He will deal with a number of issues. I shall pass on Mr Bruins' comment to him, so that he can perhaps come back to that. Mr. Chairman. Then there are a number of things that are a little bit more about the state's personnel policy. Mr Alkaya, as well as others, have asked questions about this and found that there are staff shortages in certain public services. Of course, that's just a fact. The Court of Auditors has said that there should actually be a better and more strategic human resources policy with the Empire. Mr Alkaya and Mr Bruins have also said that it is important for the cabinet to ensure that the government is an attractive employer, that people want to work there. I think the Empire is indeed a very attractive employer. For anyone who wants to work with passion on the public cause, there is very interesting work at the government. Fortunately, the Empire also scores well in investigations into attractive employership. We have had research done, and that has also been shared with the Chamber. This research is translated again by the departments into the various multi-annual staff plans that they should have completed by the end of this year. In other words, I very much support the objective that we must do everything we can to remain an attractive employer. Things like the common traineeship and the labour market campaigns for ICTs are examples of how we can and should do that, given the current labour market. Of course, you can go wider. The investments just mentioned by both the Prime Minister and Mr Hoekstra are, of course, important to us, but they are also investments in a sector in which people are needed and in which people have to shape policy. They have an incredibly important task; a public task. We have to do everything we can to make people want and work there. Mr. Chairman. I've already said something about what the Empire is doing to be attractive as an employer. Maybe there's something else I can add. Mr Van 't Wout specifically asked for this. He talked about competition that could occur between different parts of the Empire. We are indeed aware of that. However, it is sometimes good to start highly targeted recruitment campaigns, but then it is wise not to compete with each other if you know that you are fishing in the same pond. That's what's gonna happen. Think about police and defense. You'd better hang out. The same applies to ICT. There is no point in competing with each other to bring in the scarce ICT talent we need. That's why we started a state-wide ICT training program. Mr Snels was somewhat concerned about the quality of service, also as a result of successive cuts that he had pointed out. It was just about that: you can see that wage developments in the public sector are following wage developments in the market. We know the bottlenecks there. We also know that there are different collective bargaining tables. We know that the sectors mentioned receive a cabinet contribution each year based on the average contract wage development in the market. That's the system we work with. In general, that appears to be sufficient. I would like to comment on a suggestion made by Mr Sneller. He said that if we go on like this, the women in the government won't get along very well. The same could be said of financial spokesmen, but that would of course be very faint and do no justice at all to the quality of the input of the financial spokesmen today. But I noticed. Mr Sneller said: perhaps you should agree that in every application committee from scale 14, I think he said a woman should sit. I actually think that's a nice idea. In any case, it supports my policy of getting as many women as possible into top positions. It's not bad, but it's not getting anywhere. We all know that the composition of application committees matters. So I'm taking that suggestion with me and I'm going to see how I can anchor that state-wide, because I do think it could contribute to the goal. Mr President, I think I have answered the questions that remain."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-12-tweedekamer-8.u7", "speech text": "The coalition's line of defense is apparently that there should be a letter within a week. That's excellent news. Well, at least we know this is gonna happen. Would it be acceptable to the CDA if, in the end, regional broadcasters went bankrupt before the letter with these measures was published?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-18-tweedekamer-2.u52", "speech text": "The cabinet does that. The government reduces income tax on balance by more than the increase in VAT, including the increase in health insurance contributions. The cabinet invests a lot more in matters such as education and care, in roads, police, defense. These are all public sectors that have had a hard time in the crisis, which have been affected. Now that things are going well, it should be invested in again. I'd love to do more. At the same time, putting public finances in order is also crucial, so that if there is ever another crisis, I hope it is far away and preferably not at all, you will be able to cope with it again. The promise, the core promise I made with the Labour Party in 2012 was to make the Netherlands emerge stronger from the crisis. The Netherlands has emerged more strongly from the crisis. It's time to make people feel that, too. The government does a lot and will like to do more, but also companies, especially the large companies, have to make their contribution."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-18-tweedekamer-34.u2", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. This debate is taking place on the eve of the European summit on where we want to go with Europe over the next five years. I think it is appropriate to consider Europe's values at the beginning of the debate. What is this cooperation based on? It is about solidarity, peace, security and prosperity. In this context, I believe that we, as a Chamber, should also consider what has happened with our neighbours in Germany. There was a colleague of ours murdered, a colleague of the CDU. As we understand this week, this has been done for political reasons or is taken into account by the German justice system. Ties to neo-Nazis with the perpetrator or the suspected perpetrator have been proven. I would ask the Prime Minister to express our support and solidarity with Germany in the direction of his colleague and in the direction of the next of kin there and also to express firm support at that European Council that we will do all we can to fight against this kind of extremism and to ensure that we in Europe are protected from this kind of terror that is now directed against one of our colleagues. Mr. Chairman. Looking at what we have to do, it is important to realise that 70% of the people of Western Europe have not experienced a real rise in income since 2004, while the economy, which has experienced a crisis, has long been growing again. We see that the profits of companies are really back in order, we see the shareholders celebrating, we see the top men of the companies celebrating. It's often the same thing. It is important to do something about this if you want to understand and fight the discontent about Europe. The Prime Minister's plea in his other political capacity therefore requires a follow-up. This is not only a Dutch problem, but it plays a role throughout Western Europe and is partly the result of a policy, a culture, in Europe where these companies have always been facilitated to allow workers to compete on lower labour costs, not to seek that competition in value added but at as low a cost as possible. We must also press for measures and develop proposals at European level to ensure that a more real proportion of profits reach the working class in the Netherlands, in Europe. In this context, I find it disappointing that one important point is missing from the strategic agenda, whereas the European Commission had previously advocated putting it on the agenda. The whole social pillar, the whole need to protect workers in all respects, seems to have disappeared from the strategic agenda, while all other issues return. I would like to ask the Prime Minister to call for this item to be fully on the agenda; even more so, for concrete proposals to be made. We adopted the Ploumen motion in December 2017. We know from the Prime Minister that he relies on that agenda on himself. It is important to include this in the strategic agenda, because this is a little bridge to the nasty Brexit subject, which indeed resembles a feuilleton of an extremely bad television series \"brexit\" which is partly caused by dissatisfaction with labour migration. That discontent doesn't go away if we just say to the British, \"What an idiot you're doing.\" It goes away if you make sure people are properly paid for their work and progress in Europe. With the election of a new main figure, however lamentable, there in that Brexit soap, I am afraid we must also take more and more account of a hard Brexit. The question to which we are now well prepared and to what extent we are protecting the Dutch working class, I would therefore like to give to the Prime Minister. Mr. Chairman. The European elections, which had a higher turnout and a very diverse outcome, seem to have gone well in the Netherlands, but we are seeing more and more reports that efforts have been made by the Russian authorities or by other Russian actors to influence European voters. For example, there was a message that more than 240 million people are confronted with deliberately distributed fake news. I think that the time has come to send out a somewhat louder signal from Europe than just to talk about it with the tech companies. It is yet another attempt to interfere in a democratic process, the second largest democratic process we know in the world. We're gonna have to protect that. That's gonna take defense. That too is a European value that we must stand for. Finally, Mr President. Just for the next five years, I would like to call on the Cabinet to emphasise an agenda of protection, freedom and prosperity. This means that not only in the Netherlands, but also in the rest of Europe, people should go above multinationals. It would be worth a sweet thing to me if it were transferred from the festival halls to the meeting rooms where the decisions can be made. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-19-tweedekamer-8.u81", "speech text": "That is what I rhyme with each other very well, because I have also informed you that it is not just about helping these people in this category, but at the same time freeing up time and capacity at the CBR to help the other target groups. Of course, I do not know how much acceleration that will lead to, but it is clear that it is getting better and that we can also help those people, for example the self-defense."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-06-26-tweedekamer-7.u26", "speech text": "I'm afraid you'll be able to sit down for a while. Mr. Chairman. This law does not provide a fundamental review with priority for restoring and protecting our living environment. On the contrary, it's more of the same. This law literally makes change from our nature. The PAS policy, which has recently been annulled by the Council of State, shows that ecology is literally suffocated by our economic ambitions, that economic growth is not the solution, but the problem itself, and that trees that grow into the sky and cows with golden horns are not the result of a happy coincidence, but of unbridled greed at the expense of the life that surrounds us and that is becoming more and more at risk. The objective of the PAS to regulate nature conservation and the area for economic growth and economic activities proved to be a prime excuse for expanding intensive livestock farming around sensitive areas, continuing to expand highways and increasing speeds. Everything at the expense of nature. Nature values were secured according to the principleless principle \"who lives, who cares,\" a wretched political compromise of Ger Koopmans and Diederik Samsom as a ticking nitrogen bomb among everything that grows and blooms. The Dutch merchant spirit with the approval of a former Greenpeace activist who was stuck in what he himself called \"the gravel bin of raw reality.\" The hazing of political ideals, smothered in the political recklessness of the polder model. Mr. Chairman. I am thinking here of this aspect, because this is precisely the same double objective that we are also reading back in the Environment Act. History repeats itself, based on completely unrealistic wishful thinking from the short-sightedness that it will take our time. The Environment Act has two objectives: protecting and exploiting the environment. But can the Minister guarantee that this law is nitrogen proof? Does the Minister see conflicting circumstances which could lead to legal bodies disqualifying this law in the near future, as has happened with the PAS, on which only four years ago the glass was raised as if it were the egg of Columbus? Does this law provide sufficient protection for nature, so we won't be back here in a few years, crying about spilling milk? Mr. Chairman. Looking back at almost ten years of Rutte, but certainly after the coalition parties' statements last week, there is no confidence in my group that protecting the environment in this law will ever be put above exploiting it, that nature will be protected when the economy knocks on the door. According to a MP of the VVD, the sea is mainly meant to transport goods and make a good living. In his vocabulary there is nothing about protecting vulnerable natural areas, the intrinsic value of marine life or protecting everything of value that is defenseless against the unbridled economic ambitions. Money that's stupid makes right what's crooked. Earlier the VVD said that we have enough nature in the Netherlands with the Veluwe and the Wadden Sea and that the rest can be exchanged for the construction of more business areas, residential areas and roads. When the judge made it clear that after years of economic development at the expense of nature that literally suffocated nature in our nitrogen production, his colleague, Mr Weverling, here, stated that the balance between nature and economy had gone missing. We should see if we don't have too many nature reserves and rules in the Netherlands. After all, entrepreneurs must be able to undertake, according to the VVD. Nature is too expensive to protect, nature is there to make change from. Mr. Chairman. The Minister of IenW also said that where economic development came to an end, we should come up with a new ruse. She put an army of lawyers on it. Not to respect the ruling of the Supreme Court and to focus on a sustainable policy change, but to circumvent that ruling. That is total anarchy in the service of commercial interests, ignoring everything that really has value. Greed reigns. The judge says we're causing serious damage to nature. And what follows is no mea culpa and an army of ecologists to repair the damage done. No, an army of lawyers is being rigged to come up with a ruse to murmur and ignore the crystal clear statement of the Council of State. 'Marketing' is called that, in etymology from the Latin'mercatare', in the use of speech mainly 'dealing in the sense of shattering, not taking it so closely', in this case not taking it so closely with the judgments of our highest court."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-07-03-tweedekamer-14.u2", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Two interruptions or those four shorts is indeed a bit little, but yes well... We are discussing the Spring Paper today, President, and we are seeing the economy cool down. The rack's out. The mood among the purchasing managers has also turned and reached the lowest point in six years, just above 50, and that doesn't predict much good. And consumer confidence is also negative for the first time in four years. In this Spring note we see that all rosy predictions are substantially adjusted downwards. The economy does not grow by 2.6% but by 1.5%, consumption does not grow by 2.3% but by 1.3% and purchasing power does not grow by 1.6% but by 1.2%. Tough adjustment down. People therefore have little confidence in it. That is understandable, because every year their golden mountains are promised, but none of it ends up. And after the acid comes sweet, remember? Everyone's gonna notice that things are getting better economically. It should have been there a long time ago, but for the third year in a row it has remained sweet for the people and by the time it has to be sweet, we are already in a next recession and we can write the sweet weather on our belly. Mr. Chairman. That's the way it goes over and over again and again. For example, the Spring note shows a great windfall of 1.5 billion and the surplus is 7 billion this year. That is almost 10 billion and there is no shortage of money. But where's that money going? Not to the people, that much is clear. It'll go to a children's pardon. There will be 150 million to the asylum industry, 318 million extra to Brussels and 400 million extra to the climate. Defense gets 1.2 billion, while there are billions left on the shelf. But again nothing for the people of this country, when you see that the purchasing power promise of 1.6% is not reached. Then why not intervene now, I ask the Minister. The money is there, only the strength is lacking. Mr. Chairman. Because of the wrong policy of this cabinet with all its burden increases, prices rise even more than wages. How do you get it done? And yelling that everybody's gonna feel better. People do feel something: they feel cheated. That's what they feel. This minister raises VAT on messages and increases taxes on energy, and then he is surprised that inflation is rising faster than wages! He does it himself. The cabinet also presents itself as a \"good news\" cabinet, but first Rutte together with Asscher has completely cut the costs and increased the burden by 16 billion. And now Wobke Hoekstra comes to stick the patches. First of all, it is hard to clean up defence, education, care for the elderly and youth, and now it is supposed to make a generous gesture by adding money. And then try to sell this as good news. One example is the energy bill. If we all have to believe it, it will go down by \u20ac100 next year, after it went up by \u20ac334 earlier this year. Or take the nurses: there will be 100,000 nurses, but after 77.000 nurses have been fired in a previous cabinet period. You shouldn't have fired them! First, we cut back 0.5 billion on the police, then we cut back 0.25 billion and now we cut back 111 million. What is it? They do nothing, but Secretary Hoekstra's Band-Aids are usually too little too late. Also at the VVD they are completely lost. \"Working Netherlands earns lower taxes\" has now become Europe's burden champion. The collective burden has never been so high. The burden increased twice as much in the Netherlands as in the rest of Europe. They also turn on all points of view, in order to become foolhardy. A few examples. \"Hands off the mortgage interest rate deduction'. Remember? And then put the axe in it. \"Never drive a bill, never never\" is now \"must be, after 2026.\" Or abolishing the dividend tax. That was \"a must, a necessary evil.\" And yet it doesn't have to be now. A CO tax would be detrimental to the climate of establishment, and yet it is not that bad if we believe the climate agreement. \"Windmills run on subsidy,\" but let's fill the Netherlands with those things! Mrs Lodders said in the last AO about the fiscal policy agenda that she did regret the VAT increase, but this morning I heard her say at BNR that she regretted the bpm increase. Then don't raise those taxes! I think Mrs Lodder regrets being part of the VVD, the party of charges. Look at the energy bill I already said it or the extra labor discount: \u20ac1,000 extra promise, and then the VVD thinks it's crazy that people no longer have faith in politics! Mr. Chairman. Meanwhile, the lap machine is working overtime. Yesterday we said goodbye to MP number 32 since this cabinet took office. They've been going on for over a year and 32 MPs have already left this house, one in five makes the defense. They're looking for a nice job as mayor, alderman or at the United Nations, as long as they can. This speaks volumes. The coalition isn't there for the people in this country, it's there for itself. A working man can pay, even pay too much. Last year we all paid EUR 11.3 billion too much. This year we pay EUR 7 billion too much. That's 18 billion too much tax money collected in two years! That is not a \u20ac1,000 extra, that is \u20ac1,000 off for every Dutchman. One in three Dutch people has serious money worries in 2019, and this minister is touches 18 billion too much! Pure theft, chairman. Since the start of the crisis, public expenditure has increased by 50 billion, but in that period the burden on citizens doubled, while the burden on business fell. So the citizens paid the 50 billion bill in full. It is therefore not surprising that yesterday Laura of Spirit of the CPB, who at last woke up, said the alarm clock about the imbalance between the tax burden on labour and that on capital. She even warned of the tax morale because of the rising burden on labour, while those on capital remained the same. The cake has not been distributed fairly in the Netherlands for decades and I have been calling for attention to this for years: the so-called AIQ problem. Is the Minister finally gonna fix this? It can't be that you've been billing the citizens and leaving business alone for 20 years. The burden on labour is simply too high in the Netherlands. And then you can say that wages must be raised, but if you skim more than half of every euro's increase in wages to the treasury, then that doesn't get us anywhere. I quote someone who has researched this: \"that explains why household net disposable income is lagging behind rising gross wages,\" says Widmar Bolhuis of Leiden University. In other words, in my own words: the Dutch pay their taxes and everything we get is immediately skimmed by the mob gang of Rutte cum suis. Finally, Mr President, something about multinationals. During a hearing it became clear that they are indeed not paying any tax at all. The Philipsen, the Akzos, the Unilevers and the Shells of this world don't pay anything to the treasury. They do benefit from the beautiful infrastructure, from the well-educated population, from the good care for their expats, but they don't contribute, and they can't. A cashier at Albert Heijn pays even more taxes than Shell, Unilever, Akzo and Philips combined. What's Menno Snel, the second man at the Treasury, gonna do about that? It scared me. Nothing at all. He doesn't think it's necessary. I quote him: \"For the time being, I am pleased with the situation we are in.\" What's this? Can the Minister pick this up, for God's sake? Because we don't have to expect much from the Secretary of State. It does not intend to put the multinationals in the way of one straw, so much is clear. I hope the Minister will pick up that signal. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-07-03-tweedekamer-14.u31", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. If large companies are not quick to raise wages, then we should remove the reduction in the tax on profits. That was about the Prime Minister's words a few weeks ago. Does the Minister of Finance agree with the Prime Minister? How is he going to shape this in the budget preparation? Is he going to look at the CPB estimates in August as soon as possible and then put the deletion of the Vpb reduction on the table? This debate is, of course, about the very heart of social discontent. The Minister himself has sometimes made comments about the excessive wage increases in CEOs of large companies, and this is also part of the discontent and unfair distribution of wealth. But if, as a cabinet, you invest billions in burden relief for companies while people's purchasing power is lagging behind because the messages are getting more expensive and the energy bill is rising, you also have a problem. The threat to large companies is justified, but what role does the government play in all these blocked collective agreements in the public sector? In the case of the Defense Department, it seems to have been resolved, but what about the various collective agreements in education and care? In my view, it is the combined challenge facing this cabinet: to ensure an energy transition that achieves the climate goals while at the same time ensuring that people also feel that they are benefiting from an increase in broad prosperity. Mr. Chairman. This cabinet does good things, too. This Spring note contains quite a lot of policy additions. The presentation of the Spring paper was also accompanied by great words: more money for youth care, more for education and more for defence. There are major bottlenecks in the public sector and we have often had a debate on this in the last two years, but now a number of steps are being taken and that is good. I do think we should be honest about the figures. Against the pluses are also loves. Let me give you three examples. I'll start with Child Services. Firstly, I noticed that the cabinet presented the intensification as an investment of 1 billion. In my view, that was a press release from the Finance Minister's colleagues. What do you mean, an investment of 1 billion? It's just a series of over 400 million and then another two years 300 million. We're not saying that the government is cutting profits tax by 12 billion, are we? Why this rhetorical trick? I actually think that the Finance Minister should look into this with his colleagues. There's a minus in the numbers because of the stair-on-strap-afsystematiek. Municipalities get more money for youth care, but less from the accres: 74 million less than expected on Princess Day, 249 million less than expected for 2020 and 388 million in 2021. Or, as colleagues of the finance minister in the cabinet would say, 711 million less acres if you add up the three years together. How does the Minister of Finance judge this? Does he think it is right that we should take another look at this system? It's still weird that you give with one hand and take with the other hand. One more example. The police are an important priority for this cabinet. In the coalition agreement, 267 million more were promised, but in the spring note we also see the minions. The salary/price adjustment is not awarded but used for a job assignment on JenV. This adjustment means for the police a minus of 18.5 million in the years 2019 to 2025. Additional funds promised for counter-terrorism and auxiliary officers, 33 million, are also being postponed. Among others, Mayor Aboutaleb of Rotterdam wrote us a letter of fire. What's your answer to him? Is this also giving with one hand and taking with the other hand? And that while the defense is getting more and more money, it is unclear what this should be spent on and where money remains on the shelf. How does the Minister rhyme with Understanding Quality and Careful Policy? I thought we were gonna do that differently. Then higher education and universities. In the Spring paper an advance is made on the results of the recent opinion of the Van Rijn Committee. This committee has recommended additional investments for beta technology and there is broad political support for this. But in the short term, especially in the year 2019, there is great uncertainty at universities about the consequences of this policy. The cabinet wants to make a soft landing of the financial impact of this advice on universities and, for scientific education, it will allocate 27 million. On the other hand, there is a reduction in the wage/price adjustment of 25.1 million for scientific education. Give it with one hand, take it with the other. During the note-taking meeting last Monday, it remained unclear what the effects of redistribution would be and it was not substantiated by the Minister of Education why redistribution should take place now while the adequacy of funding still needs to be investigated. How does this fit in with careful decision-making? Is this what the Minister means by Understanding Quality or Article 3.1 of the Compatibility Act? I have made an amendment to this with Mr Westerveld. Our amendment deletes the discount on the salary adjustment for academic education for 2019 and only for 2019. The coverage of 25.1 million is found in the 220 million of windfalls in 2019 that this cabinet wants to use to fill the in=terminal. This is in line with the government's budgetary rules, as I say to the Minister. This amendment literally buys time for careful decision-making in the 2020 budget. I therefore hope for the support of the cabinet and the coalition. This is an opportunity to do this decision-making properly and carefully and to remove the unrest at universities. Thank you, Mr. Chairman."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-07-03-tweedekamer-14.u38", "speech text": "No, I'm being put in my mouth now. When it comes to defense, we haven't spent the money that should be spent for years and there's a catch-up mission. It turns out that the Ministry did not succeed in 2018, especially because there has been too much savings in the past, to spend that money. I hope this will work in 2019. Mr. Chairman. I'm moving on. A thorn in the middle class meat is the high collective burden. How does all income support outside income tax count in this indicator, e.g. care allowance, rent allowance and childcare allowance? These are formal expenses and they therefore count in the picture of government expenditure. However, 5 billion of healthcare payments feel like a different type of collective spending than development cooperation. How pure is the collective burden burden as an indicator of income support outside of income tax and how high would this collective burden be if we had designed supplements differently, for example as a tax deduction measure? Mr. Chairman. In addition to the money in the wallet, the housing is the most discussed point in society. The Spring paper pays little attention to this. With regard to the CDA, how can more homes be built, especially for start-ups and seniors? The construction plan is central to us. But we also see competition, especially between the starter and the private investor. The Telegraaf came today with the message that in recent years homes have been massively hijacked by private investors for starters. Are you sure there's nothing you can do about this? Mr. Chairman. If the Empire spends less money than it intended, it will continue to work in the budgets of municipalities. This is a logical consequence of how we regulated the relations between the Empire and the municipalities. Take joint responsibility in times of prosperity and adversity, stairs up, stairs down. However, I can imagine the annoyance of many aldermen. The city council has just agreed to your beautiful multi-annual budget, and then it turns out the Empire could have spent too little. As a result: sometimes up to \u20ac34 less per inhabitant and you can go back to the city council. The VNG is clear; it does not want to change this system, share this system of joint financial responsibility on the general benefit. However, because, for example, the budget of youth care and the Wmo is also included in the general benefit, the step-on-step scheme has an increasing impact on municipal finances. What is the Minister's view of more stabilisation by examining whether there are variations of the step-on-step system that do not take away the principle but which may lead to less fluctuations in the budgets for municipalities? Mr. Chairman. A good steward has his performance in order. Much cynicism of our residents is due to the performance of implementation organisations. The Court of Auditors and the Ombudsman call for more attention to be paid to this. Try extending your driving licence as a 75-year-old in this country or driving off as a youngster with a light form of autism. There is a dysfunctional CBR, not to mention the UWV. From the Tax Administration, the Court says that the desires for new policies cannot be met due to a shortage of IT staff. This affects democracy. But there is also the idiotism that as a tax return filler you need two different authorisation codes: one to be able to fill in a tax return and one to be able to apply for surcharges. On page 10 of the Spring Note, with regard to the performance of the implementation organisation, it is stated that a task force is engaged in problem analysis and scenarios for solution directions. They should be ready by 2020. Mr. Chairman. In part, we really can't wait that long. Can a first report with desirable measures, perhaps already with low-hanging fruit, be sent along with the 2020 Millions Note? With regard to its own ministry for the fiscal year 2020, can it not be ensured that volunteers from, for example, older organisations only have to work with one authorisation code for both the declaration and the application of fees for their members, elderly people or people with language disadvantages? The Minister describes the importance of strong buffers in government, because our economy is very sensitive to economic shocks. According to the Council of State, this also partly relates to the debt position of households and businesses. An important cause of the debt position of our residents is located in the mortgages. Households have a debt of 105% of GDP. The EU says that you should strive for a debt of up to 65% of GDP for households. In the Netherlands, the mortgage debt is the cause of 86% of that debt. But is this 20% non-hypothecary debt actually in line with debt in other EU countries? The previous cabinet has taken many measures to reduce mortgage debt. Are these measures likely to reduce 86% in the coming period? Mr. Chairman. The concept of steward has not only a financial dimension, but also a green dimension. During the debate on accountability, I indicated that I was particularly pleased that there was so much interest in the green bond. It offers the opportunity to involve financial markets in making our economy climate-proof. Climate change entails major financial risks. A report by EenVandaag recently showed that farmers in Zeeland suffer economic damage by salinisation of the soil. The Frankfurt School has developed a Finance fit for Paris benchmark. This benchmark has previously looked at the extent to which legislation and regulations for the financial sector are climate-proof in Germany and the European Union. Unlike for example in France, Dutch financial institutions report relatively little on the climate risks of their portfolio in their reporting. During a meeting of the Sustainable Finance Lab, DNB director Frank Elderson expressed a positive opinion on the application of such a benchmark to the Dutch financial sector. How does the Minister intend to have Dutch legislation for the financial sector assessed annually on a \"Finance fit for Paris\" benchmark? Mr. Chairman. I am well aware that today's questions and proposals will not suddenly make everyone rich and that the middle class, the hinge of our society, will not be free of all worries. For this to happen, more fundamental errors in the economic structure need to be changed. We can do this partly ourselves, but in part we also depend on cooperation with countries and institutions that sometimes have a different agenda. But that does not discharge us, within these narrow margins, from the task of finding majorities that make this particular group of people feel that politics is there for them."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-07-03-tweedekamer-14.u72", "speech text": "That's what I thought I understood. That is exactly why we want to present this. Mr. Chairman. Mr Snels asked about the investment in youth care and why it was presented as 1 billion. I think I have just tried to answer the question of whether the problem in youth care is temporary or structural. That's what the investigation has to prove. That is why the cabinet has decided to meet the municipalities with a series of 420 this year and then two times 300. I think that's probably where the confusion comes from. I think we can both hold on to what we mean about that investment. Mr. Chairman. Then Mrs De Vries asked how the defense will use the extra resources and when there is more clarity. Defence has set out priority capacity objectives in the NATO National Plan. That's just a fixed list that included the F35s, but also the special forces and cyber. We have explicitly agreed that part of the additional resources will be invested in staff. In my view, Mrs De Vries herself referred to the fact that there was or seems to be very recent white smoke............................................................................................................................................................................................................................................ That sounds like excellent news. Mr. Chairman. GroenLinks also had a question about Defense, but the inspiration was, I think, just another one. It's also in the party's DNA, I think, to look at it differently. The question was about understanding quality: how do we make careful policy? Then I'm actually back to the phaser answer. The cabinet does believe that more needs to be done in the field of defence, also taking into account the insecurity in the world and the idea of taking responsibility for itself, including towards our NATO partners. But I understand very well that Mr Snels and others say: but the money was already not coming up. That is precisely the reason for looking very closely with the Defense Department at what is a rise that is reasonable and probably can also be observed. Mr. Chairman. Both Mr Snels and Mr Slootweg asked if I would agree to look again at the standardisation system and the indexation of the Municipal Fund, the whole step-on-step discussion. I have to say quite frankly that I am a little bit confused with that, because it was precisely the VNG who also indicated to us in the recent discussions on youth care that he wanted to stick to the step-on-step approach. I understand the inconvenience in itself. I think Mr Nijboer has explained more broadly what many of us, at least sometimes, hear when we are in contact with fellow party members or others who are active locally. But the VNG sees benefits and I understand them. On the one hand, you can say that it is strange that the municipality gets something out of it when national politics decides to invest extra in, for example, defence or education, or vice versa, and that it should be at the expense of the local swimming pool if national politics decides to cut back. But in a world of imperfections, this is still a solution that may be the least bad. I am prepared to think about everything in my own right, but from the VNG's point of view that makes sense."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-07-04-tweedekamer-40.u25", "speech text": "Thank you, Madam President. The cheapest does not have to be the best and safest, and I fear that this will be the case again. The PVV has so far advocated the roll-out of 5G under some conditions. From the very beginning we have always been very consistent and consistent in this regard, we have expressed our concerns about cooperation with foreign companies at all. We've said that before. When it comes to state security and privacy of our citizens, we must try as much as possible to regulate all this ourselves, and if it is not possible, they must be reliable partners. Even before there was a big fuss about cooperation with the Chinese multinational Huawei, our group raised concerns about privacy and state security. We also made the condition that there would be no danger to human and animal health. I'd like to say a few words about that. For the long-term effects, we must await epidemiological and, where possible, oncological studies in relation to the PVV. That should actually happen. I know that terrible animal experiments have been carried out in the past at 3G and 4G. I strongly oppose that. For example, they're going to tie a monkey's phone calls to his head, while a monkey isn't representative of man at all. So it turns out. That is why we are going to stop animal testing in the Netherlands and reduce it as much as possible. We go as far as possible to animal testing-free innovations, where I myself am the great director behind. Because animals are not representative at all. So let's be very clear that I'm not asking for animal experiments. No animal testing, because it must all be representative of man. No tests on defenseless animals, which are not representative. As long as harmful effects on humans and animals cannot be demonstrated, the PVV could agree to roll-out. Mr Bromet also said that 16.6 million was spent on investigations into electromagnetic fields. Can 5G cause increased or wrong cell division? And if not, what's the difference with 3G and 4G? We do not want any health risks to be taken at all. There must be no health effects. Now the Secretary of State wrote in a letter we received that the Health Council has also established that as long as you remain below established standards, there are no health effects. And Professor Hans Kromhout of Utrecht University is investigating the long-term effects of mobile radiation on humans. At the moment, he cannot guarantee that the radiation from mobile telephony is dangerous, nor can he guarantee that it is safe. Kromhout advises to do more research. That is why I am holding a motion and will support various motions by my colleague from the CDA. We really want those health effects to be investigated. And that money certainly also for the oncological effects, if possible and necessary. According to Professor Kromhout, the roll-out of 5G does not need to be stopped. I also like to get a reaction to that. Let's make it clear that Huawei is a no-go. That is simply not going to happen, and we are happy to get a commitment on that. I hope, moreover, that there is a majority in the Chamber for that too, because only you are so lonely and you can start so little. I therefore hope that several parties will support this, because state security must never be at stake. Never! And it has already been said that vital parts must be protected. Fixed and mobile networks must be protected. It is quite possible that vital parts can be hit in their hearts instantly. That must never happen. In addition, people's privacy must be guaranteed. Madam President, I await the answer. So I'd like to get the commitment as far as Huawei is concerned. Then I may not have to make a motion on that. And I also like to be promised that these tests will be carried out outside of animal testing. It is therefore epidemiological and oncological research. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-03-tweedekamer-3.u10", "speech text": "The last answer I didn't find so terribly clear. Was it also on behalf of Minister Koolmees and Minister De Jonge or was it the personal title? But more importantly, the minister says you have to be honest in politics. I agree with him. So if you choose one, you can't do the other. So if you choose defense and charge relief as a priority, you can't spend a lot of money on other things. Then I ask the Minister to also clarify to the people he wants to cut back on. Does that mean that your own risk or your own contributions to care go up? Does that mean, like Dijkhoff, that the welfare is going down? Does that mean I wouldn't advise the Minister, because CDA leaders have preceded him in the past and that the AOW will be reduced? What does that mean, then, what did the Finance Minister say yesterday? He can't stay away from making clear to people he's pleading for, because it can't be both. And \"less\" doesn't fall for that, because we all know that we're all getting older, that we're getting older, that care costs are going up, and that means that you can't keep the same level with the same money. The Minister of Finance knows that better than anyone. So if he wants to do something, he should also mention measures and give clarity here to the people in plain language."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-10-tweedekamer-26.u4", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Tomorrow it will be exactly a year since this debate was requested, but it is good to talk in plenary today about digitisation. Because, of course, the digital world has not stood still since the Council of State gave its opinion. Yesterday, a report from the WRR was published to address the vulnerability of our digital defense. I have a direct question to the Secretary of State: when can we expect a cabinet response to that report? The State Committee on Parliamentary System, which we will soon be discussing extensively in this Chamber, has also made recommendations in the area of digitisation. And right now, there's a temporary chamber committee working to look at the digital future, and how we can get a better grip on this as a parliament. However, today's debate deals specifically with the unsolicited opinion of the Council of State. This opinion raises a number of important legal concerns and suggests to the Council of State how these concerns can be addressed. GroenLinks shares those concerns of the Council of State. The Council of State rightly calls for attention to be paid to the position of citizens. The position of citizens is too often underestimated by the government, and speed and costs are taken too quickly as the main guiding principle for policy. Mr. Chairman. An important concern is digital decision-making based on algorithms. Because of this automated form of decision-making, there is no longer any need for decision-making. This may sound efficient and saves costs, but the circumstances of the case and/or the situation, an important criterion for GroenLinks, are hardly or insufficiently taken into account in this decision-making process. There is also a risk of undesirable effects, such as discrimination. With regard to GroenLinks, the use of algorithms must always be verifiable as to how a particular decision was made. How are things now, so I ask the Secretary of State, with monitoring the use of algorithms by the government? At the end of May, a study by the NOS revealed that governments use large-scale predictive algorithms. As a result of these results, the Dutch Data Protection Authority has called on the government to be much more transparent about the application of algorithms. In the cabinet response, the Secretary of State refers several times to the GDPR and the Code Good Digital Board. How's this code coming? And do the existing rules provide sufficient protection against unwanted use of algorithms? Because even though algorithms don't lead to direct decisions, they can be very controlling. Often people do not know that algorithms are being used, and certainly not how they can defend themselves against wrong use. I'd like a response from the Secretary of State. Mr. Chairman. Then there is an important concern for GroenLinks, namely how to ensure that everyone, including those who are less or not able to make use of the digital service, can always continue to participate in society. We have nearly 2.5 million low-lettered people in our country. These people must also be able to communicate with the government. I know that the Secretary of State is using the line that contact via the post or a counter should always be possible. I'm very happy about that. In addition, it is of course good to support anyone who is unable to do so in digital participation. For a large group of people it is becoming increasingly difficult to participate and communicate fully with the government. There is a real need to invest in opportunities for these people. For example, contact points in neighbourhoods, where people can get help with digital contact with the government. As far as GroenLinks is concerned, the public must always be at the forefront of services. And the development and improvement of services must always be driven from the citizen's perspective. How can citizens be helped as adequately and inclusively as possible? Too often, unfortunately, we still see too much being driven from the government's perspective. What is the state of implementation of the recommendations in this area? Mr. Chairman. In its opinion, the Council of State states that legislation on digital development is now often made too ad hoc. The Council of State also sees a tension between, on the one hand, technical independent legislation and, on the other, legal certainty and the primacy of the legislator. That's a tricky field of tension. Nevertheless, we must guarantee the quality of legislation and legal certainty from our constitutional point of view. I would like to ask the Secretary of State how the legislator can ensure that the principles of state law are properly safeguarded. I'd like a response from the Secretary of State to that. Thank you, Mr. Chairman."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-11-tweedekamer-10.u18", "speech text": "Depends on the ship. If it's a supply ship, it's got a whole different bet than when the ship's in defense or as an attack ship. Then it's just part of a fleet. So if your question is whether the supply ships are equipped with all sensors and all weapons by default, the answer is no. It depends on the function of the ship. They are protected by the frigates that sail along and for which they supply."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-18-tweedekamer-2.u3", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. I want and I will spend my speaking time today to a large extent in a different way from other years. Last week, the coalition parties VVD, CDA, D66 and ChristenUnion, together with the group of DENK, made it impossible for me to speak here in this house, actually the house of democracy, even before the forthcoming verdict in the political trial against me. First a verdict and then a debate: apparently they had agreed with each other. Above all, the bottom stone must not emerge now and no conclusions must yet be drawn for the verdict. 'Cause that might help me. And that, Mr. Chairman, is false to me. But I'll talk about that political persecution. Nobody's gonna shut me up about that. And I will do that today. Here. Live. On television. In the house of democracy. About the hatred of those justice officials against me and about their direct involvement in my trial, about the decline of our rule of law, about the madness of the state-facilitated claims against me and about all the energy that takes years of misery. Mr. Chairman. In a few weeks it is exactly fifteen years since I lost my own freedom, that I had to leave my house in beautiful Venlo and was taken with my wife to a barracks on the Dutch-Belgian border and later to a prison in Zeist to be safe. There were no safehouses at the time. I've never been home since. In those 15 years I have never been alone on the street and I have never emptied my own mailbox again. Privacy has since become an abstract concept for me, because my agenda, both business and private, goes to the DKDB every day and every week to the intelligence service, the AIVD. I say this because over the past 15 years I have learned that freedom, the most precious possession of a human being, is never self-evident, that every day you have it, you have to enjoy it, that you always have to fight for it and cherish it every second. Some things can't be valued until you don't have them anymore. And I crave my freedom every day. I lost my own because I criticize Islam and because I am convinced that my political belief is that Islam is a threat to our freedom. But I could never have said that it wasn't just Al-Qaeda and the Taliban, ISIS and other idiots, but of course it was also a very different way, but still parts of the Dutch government are doing everything they can to fight me in their own way, because they hate me, and they're patching the trias politician to their boots to get at me. In the first process I've experienced, the so-called Wilders I process, after the release of my short anti-Koran film Fitna in 2008, it already started. Back then, CDA Justice Minister Hirsch Ballin actually wanted to give a political lead to the Public Prosecutor's Office to prosecute me, but another way was found. His party colleague, the councillor of the Amsterdam Court of Justice, Tom Schalken, was used to prosecute me by means of a so-called Article 12 procedure. And I did. The CDA judge Schalken even went so far that he tried to influence my late friend and colleague Hans Jansen at dinner shortly before his trial in court. Shameless. But luckily that all came true. The court was avenged. The CDA judge Schalken resigned and I was finally cleared of all charges. But it was, of course, mafia practice. Then the Wilders II process followed, after my \"more or less\" question at a political meeting of the PVV in 2014 in The Hague. I don't care what you think of that statement. Anyone can have their opinion on that. By the way, 41% of the Dutch agreed. But apart from what you think, what happened then is hard to comprehend. There were parades, with mayors first. Like in Nijmegen, where CDA mayor Bruls bought the givers coffee and tea, while the summoned band played a cheerful music. There were thick piles of pre-printed declaration forms all over the place. The police went to mosques to help fill out the forms. The police also said that she didn't like Wilders' statements. Counselors of the Labour Party did translations in the mosque. Imams put pressure on mosque visitors, people who often didn't know what it was about at all, to sign these declaration forms. We know this from witness interviews. Mr. Chairman. But it got a lot crazier. In the meantime, we also know that the Public Prosecutor's Office itself at least had serious doubts as to whether it should prosecute me. It didn't even want to prosecute a few statements. And yet there was a trial, with a very bad role of the Ministry of Justice of then VVD Minister Opstelten. A witness even heard Opstelten say 'I quote that witness, I was not there myself, but I quote that witness 'that I was in front of them'. Madam President. The officials of that VVD Minister Opstelten then interfered extensively with my criminal proceedings. They called me evil. Imagine: an official of justice calls a parliamentarians evil! I thought that only in dictatorships opposition leaders are seen as a form of cancer that should be eradicated. But then they helped the state's attorney's office with the defense again. They gave legal arguments to maximise the likelihood of a conviction. They adapted press releases. They wanted to get the petition from the D.A.'s office in advance so they could read along, give tips to the state's attorney's office. There were attorney generals and prosecutors who made police reports, as we now know, in which there were obituaries. And witnesses such as the same Minister Opstelden but also top officials, members during their interrogation to the council commissioner at the court suddenly collectively of amnesia. On nine out of ten questions, they said they couldn't remember. And Minister Grapperhaus, who is not here today for understandable reasons, deliberately informed the Chamber two weeks ago incompletely and misplaced the Chamber. Mr. Chairman. With all this interference from the Ministry of Justice, the rule of law has been violated, but the coalition does not want to debate it until the judge has sentenced it and I may therefore hope not, but it may have been condemned. I really don't have any words for it. The members of the government's groups should be deeply ashamed of themselves. If the rule of law is at stake in Hungary or Poland, then it is shameful. We will then be demanding heavy sanctions, and we would prefer to have an urgent debate on the same day. But if it happens in front of their own eyes here in their own country with a colleague of the opposition in their own parliament, then unfresh cases are at once under the courts, then everything has to be covered up for a while until the verdict has been passed."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-19-tweedekamer-3.u70", "speech text": "Finally. My colleague Mr Stoffer will undoubtedly repeat that question in the General Financial Reviews and then I will rely on a well prepared answer, so it will be fine. But just another thought experiment. I already mentioned the DOD. There we are certainly not just rushing towards 2%. Luckily, there's money coming in. Repairing and modernising, beautiful. But defense spending is going to fall again as a percentage of what we make with each other. We're dangling at the bottom somewhere. How is that budget deficit gonna make any extra money for the Defense Department, which is necessary to move on? What does the perspective look like?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-19-tweedekamer-3.u245", "speech text": "First of all, the point that Mrs Van Kooten also raised in her first term: the problem of working poor, the people who stack jobs and have very little money. I've already talked about that. I have outlined what we are doing in the framework of the Borstlap Committee, within the framework of a minimum rate forzzp, and what we are doing with the Labour Market Act in balance. That is a whole package of measures. That does not just solve it; I also said that this is a tough problem. So that's what we discussed, but that doesn't solve it. I thought the discussion was now much more about the broad public sector, so the people in the care, education and police and defense. There are broad-based collective agreements. The average of all these wage increases is really in line with whatever happens in the business sectors. So I do not deny that there can be a problem for, as it is called, 'working poor', people with very small wages, who often work part-time or feel more or less forced to rent out as a zzp'er. We talked about that. But I thought Mrs. Marijnissen here was talking about that much broader group of agents, teachers and nurses. That's where I'm seeing wage increases right now. Yes, I would like to see more. It is of course always beautiful if it can be done, but it is not the case that they are lagging behind what is happening in the companies. My party political point was much more the huge discrepancy between the top salaries and the collective bargaining increases in very large companies."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-19-tweedekamer-6.u45", "speech text": "Right, I totally agree. I'll mention two other things. Firstly, this is also in the interests of those companies themselves. We know that teams that are diverse perform better than when you put only white guys from the early 40s on a team. Male/woman, different cultural backgrounds, it's just more creative. There's just more going on when you do that. The second is, we need everyone. Today unemployment is rising by a fraction, but I understand from the CBS explanatory statement that this is because more and more people who hear that there is so much cramped in the labour market are now reporting. Then you have a temporary effect of rising unemployment. That is good in itself, given the big cut we have in education, care, defense and police. We need everyone, but also in business. Then I'm like, \"Oh, my God, how incredibly stupid to just keep looking for someone who looks like yourself.\""}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-19-tweedekamer-6.u306", "speech text": "Surely the Prime Minister can't be serious... He can't be serious about saying, \"I'm not gonna say anything about it.\" I can only ask my colleagues that. They are my equals, in a constitutional sense. I could ask them to make a request. But you are standing here, at least on behalf of the government, on behalf of your predecessors, on behalf of the cabinet and therefore also on behalf of the former Minister of Justice. I could ask you for an answer. I said yesterday that it was proven that many MPs and also many people outside this Chamber - at least on behalf of officials from the Ministry of Justice were interrogated at the Public Prosecutor's Office. I'm not even talking about politics. They sent defenses to the D.A.'s office. They helped with the legal foundation, in the vein of, \"Then we're gonna fix that\" you have to use. They've had the wish to request the requisition. You can't be serious, can you? Then you throw me again in front of the wolves of that court, the court, I have to say who might then condemn me. I hope not, of course, but it's possible. Afterwards, if you're here in the Chamber, it turns out you might agree with me. Once again, I am already sorry about my colleagues, but I can really ask you for an answer and a ruling on what you think of that."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-19-tweedekamer-6.u421", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. Finally, the process. I really do not think it is worth describing that the Prime Minister, in line with the coalition, responds to my request by saying: no, look at it Wilders; I am not going to comment on the facts. He said it a little more politely, but that's the bottom line. At this stage, I will never ask the Prime Minister to speculate. I can't understand that, but I'm asking him to speak out about the facts, and those facts are public. Once again, those facts were sent to the Chamber by Minister Grapperhaus. Those are the facts of the WOB procedure or the facts of which the Court has ordered disclosure. Mr. Chairman. These are facts that not only point to it, but also show very clearly that the officials of the Ministry of Justice have intervened in my trial under the ministerial responsibility of former Minister of State of State of the Interior. Those facts are proof of that. It's not an interpretation! Those officials threw the trias politician out the window. They have influenced the process, and that, of course, requires a ruling from the Prime Minister. What have these civil servants done? Let me say this briefly, also for the Chamber and for my motion which I am about to table. Those prosecutors helped the D.A. come up with and rebut the possible defense defense defense defense. And that involved concrete legal questions such as: can Wilders call for participation in the social debate? Has there been any mention of nationality? Shouldn't we bet on race anymore? Very specific legal questions have been passed on to the prosecution by the Ministers of Justice. They've also given legal ammunition to the D.A. to make a successful conviction of me. It's literally there to make it more likely. I am not talking about Russia or North Korea. For example, the final sentence of what I said then: then we will settle it. It has literally been said to the prosecution: tell them that that might be a very good angle to use in the prosecution of Wilders. And then one official e-mailed to another: okay, I'll pass it on to the state's attorney's office. Mr. Chairman. Those are facts. You can see that. It's on paper. It's not an opinion. It's nothing in my head. They're hard facts! The officials also wanted to read the petition from the Public Prosecutor's Office and make useful comments. Officials also rewritten the press release, which took out the names of colleagues Samsom and Spekman, former colleagues of the Labour Party. That wasn't a good time. Don't do that. The Minister approved that out. That's not a decision of the D.A.'s office, because that's what the D.A. did. Mr. Chairman. Again, it can't stand the light of day. If we did what the Prime Minister said, if we waited until after the trial and for the verdict and if we said, \"Well, we don't harm the trias politician now,\" you'd put me to the wall with your back. Then you say: \"It's okay if the trias politician gets trampled on in the beginning, but we're not gonna fix it. We're not even gonna talk about that. Go hang first and we'll see what happens.\" Mr President, that is false! That is falseness of the highest order and that is why I shall now table a motion. Because I can't accept that. I would like to say the following to my fellow Members. At the request of colleagues, I did not wish to interrupt the debate by making an order proposal and asking for a roll-call vote. So I'm doing that now with a motion. But I'll tell you this. Even if this motion is not adopted, with which the government may be entitled not to implement it under state law, because it has not been adopted, even if the government does not carry out that rejected motion, which is normal in this country, but I shall still ask the question of confidence. Anyway. If the motion is adopted and the Minister refuses to implement it, I will ask the question of confidence. But if the motion is not adopted and the Minister insists on not answering it, I will also ask the question of confidence. Hence the next motion."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-09-25-tweedekamer-3.u43", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. The speaker of the PVV, Mr Kops, just started the attacks. Those are moments of course that are burned on the retina with all of us. Reference was also made to France. I have some friends and family who live in France. When you hear how the fear still concerns some people, when they haven't even been there, then I understand very well the quest of these proposers for opportunities to cut off people who are really evil towards us. I think we all share that search; Mr Van Dam referred to it as well. Definitely the VVD also supports the search for opportunities to cut off the bad guys. Mr. Chairman. Having said that, I would like to begin by congratulating the authors and congratulating them on their important work. To defend an initiative law here is a memorable moment, a parliamentary highlight. Then to the content. I have found that the proposers have clearly sought the limits of the legally feasible, so dare and courage cannot be denied. They are convinced that all existing instruments seem to be inadequate. Everyone wants, and can also expect, that the government will do what is necessary to protect the Netherlands from terrorists who want to violate our rule of law. \"Wanting to abuse the rule of law\" is in itself also a wording that we need to take into account. The members propose that the Dutch be given the power to jail for up to six months via the government, without the need for a judge. Moreover, detention may be extended for the same duration each time, infinitely. The number of times the measure under this proposal can be extended is therefore not limited. We've taken a good look at the proposal. Have the initiators taken into account that their proposal does something that also targets terrorists? Indeed, it renders important foundations of our Dutch rule of law inoperative. This will make it possible for the government to hold you as a Dutchman for six months without a proper and fair criminal trial, without defense, without any possibility of appeal, without any foreseeable criminal offence by law and without protection against abuse of justice and arbitrariness. These are all the foundations of the rule of law. Moreover, in theory detention can be infinite, because the measure can be extended an infinite number of times; that is not maximized. I'd like a response from the proposers to this concern. The principle of criminal legality means that people know clearly in advance what behaviour is punishable, so that they can adapt their behaviour accordingly. This principle is the cornerstone of criminal law in a functioning rule of law. This proposal removes this cornerstone. If the government, under the guise of guarding the security of the Dutch people, can lock up outside the court without criminal proceedings, this raises the question of who is guarding the guards. In addition, there is a second reason why this proposal may not combat terrorism, but serves precisely. In fact, judges are bound by the ne-bis-in-idem principle, the principle of law that a person cannot be prosecuted twice for the same fact. On the basis of this proposal, a person may be locked up for, in principle, six months on the basis of undefined conduct which may be associated with possible terrorist activities. That's nine and a half years shorter than the prison sentence that's possible when the same person comes to court for conspiracy or preparation of an attack. However, if that person has previously been punished administratively, a judge must take account of these circumstances of the case, which means that that person can either not be prosecuted at all, or gets away with a lower prison sentence. How do the proposers see this risk of lower and milder penalties thanks to their proposal? Or is their confidence in justice so great that they think that this will be easy and that judges will still dare to give the full pound of punishment, even if an administrative penalty has been imposed before? This proposal must, if I understand it correctly, be an anti-terrorism law, but it must not be limited to terrorism. Why not? Making it possible to prosecute a potentially dangerous person, a person who could pose a potential threat, is not defined in this proposal. Why not? There are also no concrete grounds for imposing a measure of freedom-absorbedness. I ask the authors why they are not present. It is unclear for the VVD to whom and for what facts or behaviour detention can be imposed, if I look at the text of the law itself. Can the proposers clarify this? I look forward to the answer."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-01-tweedekamer-28.u14", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. The PVV supports the decision of the D.A. to prosecute three Russians and one Ukrainian. The criminal trial is getting closer to that. But a happy outcome, I fear, one that does justice to the murder of 196 compatriots, is getting further out of the picture. Russia is hardly cooperating, the anti-Semitic Prime Minister of Malaysia continues to cast doubt and Ukraine has now also failed to do so. As part of that prisoner exchange, Ukraine would have handed over an MH17 crown witness to Russia. Later, in a letter to Ukraine, the prosecution even talked about the extradition of a suspect. Can the Minister of Security and Justice confirm that this Tsemach was already a suspect at the time? Was and is Tsemach, the man I'm talking about who led an air defense brigade in eastern Ukraine, indeed suspect? What does the transfer of Tsemach to Russia mean for the relationship with Ukraine inside and outside the JIT? Can Ukraine still be trusted, now that it has turned out to have used a key witness or suspect as a means of exchange in 297 homicide cases in a transaction with Russia? I'd like a response. Mr. Chairman. 9 March next year, the MH17 trial will start, without suspects in the benches, without a key witness and without unconditional political support from initial allies. It is therefore beginning to look more and more like the case is slipping through the hands of this cabinet. And I must say that it also seems that the cabinet owes it to itself. Because nothing shows that the cabinet has taken everything out of the closet to prevent the transfer of Tsemach to Russia. The fact that this Tsemach is worth gold is demonstrated by the fact that Russia saw him as a crucial part of the exchange. Without Tsemach there would be no exchange at all, the Russian demand was. And yet our rulers were invisible and silent in the weeks preceding that exchange, even though they had knowledge that Tsemach should be involved in that exchange. Silent diplomacy seems to have failed. And I'm sure Tsemach wouldn't have been so stupid to give just before his extradition just as full openness to a rushed employee of the Dutch state's attorney's office, would he? I'd like a response from the rulers. Mr. Chairman. Where Russia and Ukraine have understoodably thought about their own interests with the exchange of prisoners, the PVV concludes that this cabinet has harmed its own interests. Why didn't the Netherlands play the case extremely high in August and look for support from other JIT countries, to prevent the exchange of Tsemach, and publicly threatened with counter-measures? I would like a reaction, because I still find that incomprehensible. Mr. Chairman. The PVV has previously indicated that for the full truth finding not only the cooperation of Russia but also that of Ukraine is indispensable. Now that both countries do not, or at least do not, fully cooperate, it is seriously damaging the truth. A call by the King at the UN for full cooperation cannot repair that damage. And why didn't the king alongside Russia also call for Ukraine to cooperate fully? I would also like to receive a response from the Foreign Minister. UN Resolution 2166 instructs countries to fully cooperate in criminal investigations. Ukraine has lapped that resolution through the exchange of Tsemach. Or do the ministers disagree with me? Finally, I would like to ask the Foreign Minister whether the talks with Russia on state liability are still ongoing. Is that gonna go well? Or is that actually dead in front of the closet? Thank you very much, Mr President."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-02-tweedekamer-6.u27", "speech text": "When we were in the outgoing cabinet, D66 and other parties said shame that we then said that we needed more money for education in that budget too. We've been committed to that for years. In the previous period, I have benefited greatly from the efforts of D66 as an opposition party to regulate more money for education. I would say: take this hand-off from the opposition, from the PvdA, to get those cuts off the table. You also say about the cuts: they are the budgetary rules, but it also hurts me. The cabinet does pay extra money for defense and other matters. Then at least get those cuts off the table. Because the relationship with the universities has fallen to a low point, and that under the responsibility of a minister of D66-house. Couldn't we work together to at least get these cuts off the table that they can't do anything about?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-03-tweedekamer-5.u58", "speech text": "In this discussion, I'm missing a variant. The Ministry estimates healthcare expenditure and then it has been falling down for a few years in a row. The VVD says: it can go back to the people. The cabinet lowers the ceiling and raises the ceiling at Defense. So you can also put it in defense equipment. What is also possible is that the money will go back to health care in the years to come. For example, you can do something about the vacancies and the staff shortage. The salaries can be raised. You can invest in health care again. And I haven't heard that variant so far. If we're going to do research, I want this variant to be included."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-09-tweedekamer-4.u38", "speech text": "I don't want to think about hugging some people, but with Barry, I'd love to do it. Madam President. The most important part for me is, of course, animal welfare. I once went into the Chamber for that, to be a representative of the people, or 'animal representative', I actually have to call it. From the Wilders Group, in 2005, 2006 we asked for the fundamental rights of animals to be enshrined in the Constitution. We did that together with GroenLinks, but GroenLinks is currently blocking my own initiative law. I can't do anything right now, because the initiative law has been put in place by GroenLinks. I have it ready too, but Bureau Legislation does not allow me because GroenLinks has been freezing it for so many years. Maybe the Minister could take action? How can the Minister guarantee the rights of animals in the Constitution? That is very essential for us. We started that once as Group Wilders. I'm a first-hour boy, and so is Barry. Afterwards, of course, it became the Party for Freedom, but by the way, it should always have been the Wilders Group. But that's not the case. I call on GroenLinks to release that law, because we would like to submit it. Basically, we can't do anything right now. Why has he been blocked for so many years, over ten years? I'll probably hear about that later. The current Animal Law recognises the intrinsic value of the animal and assures some needs, but with the growing number of serious ill-treatments and the undersized, laughable community punishments, which are truly scandalous......................................................................................................................................................................................................... So it's necessary. Madam President. Soon, during a general consultation, an AO Animal Welfare, two petitions will be presented to the Minister by Mrs Gerda van den Wijngaert and Mr Michiel Mulder. That's two civilians. I don't know how many tens of thousands of signatures I've collected, because everyone's sick of it: if you tie a dog to a tree somewhere in the middle of the summer and let him starve to death and drown, you'll just get a community service of 100 hours or 50 parole. Those people are going to jail! They must be put in jail, on water and bread, and be banned from keeping animals for a lifetime. That's how animal executioners should be dealt with. I won't die until I do, though I'll have to become a minister or secretary of state myself someday. But that's a pretty small chance, so I'm gonna leave it to this minister, our deputy prime minister. Animalia does not need to have the same rights as homo sapiens, human beings, but once we deprive animals of their freedom, they are entitled to an animal-worthy life. Babies and other commercially incompetent people without awareness and even criminals have rights. Even criminals! Why don't animals have them? They have never harmed a fly and are all born healthy and well, without evil in them. Because all animals are born good and sweet. Why don't animals have rights? Minister, please give me an answer, and please take action. I trust it, also as a shepherd of your sheep, because this is the Minister of Animal Welfare and the Deputy Prime Minister of our country, and also a religious man. Whether you believe in evolution or in the creation story: animals were there before humans, whatever you believe in. As with the latter, the trade-incompetent people, this can be exercised, for example, by having those rights by legally competent representatives. On 17 May 2002, the Bundestag decided to include animal protection in the Constitution with a two-thirds majority in Germany. The Germans! We're behind on everything. Minister Weiss is also passing us on all sides. Even in Bulgaria. In Bulgaria I myself was allowed to be present at the introduction of the full-time animal police. And what are we doing here? We have a full-time animal police. It's one big success. But no, he's a brainchild from the PVV and so we're gonna turn it into parttimers and preferably we're gonna kill them. Party politics on the back of defenseless animals. It's just outrageous. And that while the animal police, according to a former chief of police, is one of the most successful units, you shouldn't say that anymore, but let me call it that among the national police. Those teams are so successful. They do a lot of things about undermining crime. When you invade an animal executioner, you also encounter arms trafficking and trafficking in human beings, trafficking in money and dogs, and dog fights. They're just assholes, and they just need to be dealt with. And that's what you do by protecting animals. Are you all right, Madam President?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-15-tweedekamer-15.u26", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. The veterans are entitled to an answer soon. We support the letter. As far as I am concerned, this letter is for the debate on the defence budget, because that debate is in the week of 4 November. Then it could be taken with the defense budget. If we still have to have a separate debate, then we can look at it. So now no support."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-16-tweedekamer-11.u4", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. It's a good thing we're talking to each other again in the short term, but the reason is, of course, terrible. The Kurdish politician Hervin Khalaf was dragged out of her car and murdered by Islamic militias who, together with the Turkish groups, are fighting the Syrian Democratic Forces in northern Syria. Her death may be the most obvious atrocity we have seen so far from the Turkish attack, but there are many more victims, at least dozens, possibly hundreds. Moreover, another 160,000 people have been displaced. UNICEF estimates there are about 70,000 of them children. Mr. Chairman. These are the consequences of the irresponsible and unjust action of NATO member Turkey. Irresponsible, given the great humanitarian suffering caused by it. It is also irresponsible because the main ally in the fight against ISIS is being attacked, which actually stops the fight against ISIS and already manages to escape prisoners. One irresponsible and unjust because there is no attack on Turkey from Northern Syria by the SDF or even by the YPG. So there is no question of self-defense. This is therefore a serious violation of international law. Another result of the Turkish attack is that the SDF know themselves betrayed by the West and then turn to Assad out of despair. Mr. Chairman. I come to the following questions. What if Turkey and Syria are about to face each other directly? What if Syria attacks the Turks? Are we then obliged, I ask the cabinet, to help Turkey as a NATO ally? Article 5 points out that. We shouldn't end up in a situation like this. I'd like a response from the Prime Minister and the Prime Minister. I'm considering a motion on that point. Mr. Chairman. It is good that arms supplies from the European Union to Turkey are actually stopped, but the question is, of course, the following: we could not get that out of the EU-RBZ Council statement. Everyone's in now? And what are they doing, a full arms embargo on Turkey or a partial embargo on only those weapons that can be used against Syria? Let us be clear on that point. There should actually be an arms embargo as wide as possible in the EU. Does the Minister agree with me that it should go that way? Mr. Chairman. At least 160,000 people have already drifted; I already mentioned it. These people need help immediately, in the area itself, but when they cross the border, they also need help in Iraq. Is the Minister prepared to lend the help? Is the cabinet prepared to make funds available for this? Mr. Chairman. Turkey plays an ambiguous role in relation to ISIS. We know the AIVD report that says Turkey has given ISIS the opportunity to regroup. Now the Turks are effectively putting an end to the fight against ISIS. In fact, captured ISIS fighters are now on the loose and are once again a threat. That is why the following questions to the cabinet. What will the cabinet do with the EU to prevent the captured ISIS fighters from being released and returning to battle or travelling uncontrolledly to Europe, and thus to the Netherlands? What happens if the camps of ISIS fighters come under Turkey's control and are then handed them over to the Netherlands? Hundreds of women have already broken out, with their children. The Minister states in his letter that these are not Dutch mothers. Where are the Dutch mothers? What are the chances of uncontrolled release? What answers does the cabinet now have to this new situation? Mr. Chairman. Let me be clear: the Christian Union is and remains in favour of the local trial of those ISIS fighters, preferably through a tribunal, without the death penalty. They have committed the crimes there and must also be tried there. Finally. Does the government now know whether goods supplied by the Netherlands, such as pick-up trucks, are being used by the so-called moderate militias fighting with the Turkish side in the fight against the Kurds? If not, can the cabinet figure this out? For it would be very harsh and very acidic in the direction of the Kurds if we had provided material, although not weapons, but material that could be used against the most loyal and effective ally in the fight against ISIS. I'd like to hear a response from the cabinet. Thank you, Mr. Chairman."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-16-tweedekamer-11.u85", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. War is horrible and war is propaganda. Operation Rainbow, Operation Olive branch, Operation Summer Rain and now Operation Peacelord. This week, Cartoonist Bas van der Schot made it painfully clear which cynical names are chosen for wars that make defenseless people play ball of geopolitical interests. Naming as gold for the political interests of Erdogan, Trump, Putin and Assad, and of the Dutch arms industry. If we want it to stop, we have to start with our own part in this misery. Minister Blok informed this Chamber that arms exports to Turkey, where there is a risk of arms being used in the battle in Northern Syria, were rejected. According to the Minister, arms supplies to Turkey are de facto suspended. The Animal Party wants no more weapons to go to Turkey. Can the Prime Minister guarantee that no European and Dutch weapons will go to Turkey? That's question one. The VVD thought we shouldn't risk the Turkish holidays. Later the VVD mentioned that as a bad example. Let's get out of here. It happens. Let us agree that the fate of 4 million displaced Syrians must be at the forefront and the fate of the Kurds, who have now chosen between two fires for the least of the two evils only to save the environment, and that of the people who have been driven out of their homes in the run-up to a winter that can also be very barren in Turkey and Syria. Let us agree that this must be the priority. Mr. Chairman. A NATO ally who does what Erdogan does is not an ally but a danger to peace and security. Europe has given ally Erdogan the ultimate blackmail weapon: the Turkey deal as a shield against European criticism of the invasion of Northeast Syria. The Animal Party was against the law that made staying in terrorist territory a criminal offence. Through this law, Dutch aid workers and journalists must first seek permission from the Ministry of Justice and Security and this is the most important work: independent news gathering as a counterweight to war propaganda and independent aid as a counterweight to war violence. NGOs, journalists and the Council of State have destructive criticism of this law, which is still being continued. Can the Prime Minister reflect on this in the light of the current circumstances, in which defenceless people are held hostage by superpowers? Is the Cabinet prepared to re-examine and reconsider that law? I'd like a response. We cannot leave the children of IS fighters who live in terrible conditions to their fate. There are parties in this house who want to condemn these children in absentia for the choice their parents made. Dutch children are entitled to stay in the Netherlands, regardless of who their parents are and what their parents' choice has been. The rights of children must be guaranteed. Does the Prime Minister agree with the Animal Party and is he prepared to act accordingly? We too are concerned about the IS fighters who can return massively. The Animal Party wants these warriors to be tried. What are the options for this? Mr. Chairman. Violence almost never solves anything and often leads to new violence and new escalation. Can the Prime Minister give us an insight into how he invests in de-escalation and what humanitarian aid he envisages for the Kurds and Syrian refugees in particular? Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-17-tweedekamer-10.u140", "speech text": "Yes, Mr. Chairman, let me move on quickly. Our ears still hurt from all those retarded sustainability plans we've heard from the rulers. The whole of the Netherlands is turning into one major traffic infarct, but this minister writes a competition for CO-neutral asphalt. As far as we're concerned, that's crazy. Asphalt must be sustainable because it has to last a long time and not because it is made of hippie materials and bins with money costs. It is also too sad for words that this VVD minister continues to hit motorists hard by lowering the speeds on our motorways. The PVV is fiercely opposed to this government defense, which is why I'm filing the next motion. [[Motion]] [[The Chamber,]] [[heard the debate,]] [[noting that:]] [[the promotion of traffic flow on motorways by increasing the maximum speed;]] [[a maximum speed of 140 kilometres per hour allows drivers to operate a variable speed in order to promote flow;]] [[calls on the government to increase the speed limit on motorways to 140 kilometres per hour,]] [[and goes to the order of the day.]] [[This motion has been proposed by Mr Van Aalst. It seems to me that their submission is sufficiently supported.]] [[She's getting No. kst-35300-XII-17]]"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-29-eerstekamer-6.u209", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. If one thing has become clear in these General Reviews, it is precisely that the content and strength of the argument still prevail here. That started with the contribution of the first speaker, Mr Cliteur, and that has continued. We will have to do our best in this respect. My conclusion after the first term of the Chamber is also that, if we want to get something done here, we need to motivate it well and that is not a race that has run in advance. The eulogy, by the way, was very positive, was said here and there, and \"the Netherlands is doing so well.\" Yes, that is true on many points, but that speech also contained a profit warning, namely: where we stand well, we must also be alert. This applies to economic growth, which we are currently seeing flattened under the influence of international developments. But that also applies to public services and even to our pension system. We shall, of course, be discussing this again this evening. Another profit warning, which was also very clearly present in the speech of the throne, was about the fact that during the journey all kinds of problems can arise, with which you have to deal politically and where you have to remove bottlenecks. That's where we're in the middle of it, too. Nitrogen and pfas are of course the most visible subjects. I shall come back to that again on the basis of the various questions. Perhaps I could say to Mrs Vos that what she said about racism and discrimination has been taken from my heart and that I agree with her that we, as politicians, have the task of standards. That can happen in a debate if something is said about a woman in that debate, but that certainly also applies when it comes to this issue. What always annoys me is that I understand that, when large groups of people have come from outside the Netherlands to the Netherlands, that requires a country as a whole to deal with it. But if you don't give someone an internship because her name is Fatima, or you don't hire someone because his name is Muhammad, or you reject people's skin color, that's so fucking stupid. Apart from the fact that it's stupid, you're also doing yourself very short, because it doesn't lead to the good mix of people, man-woman, white-black, gay-hetero, which ultimately leads to better decisions. If you don't think so, you'll be stuck with all the clubs of white Dutch men from the early 40s and we now know where that takes us. For that reason it's unbelievable... Well, Mrs Van Engelshoven is sitting here and Mr Grapperhaus is older, but I would like to say this in my reply. But I take up the point that there is also a normative role for politics. The first issue I would like to address is economics and taxation. Furthermore, I come to purchasing power and burden development as a second block. The third is labour market, social security. Four, environment, climate. Five, safety. Six, international and defense. Seven, domestic government. Eight, take care. And nine, education. But I'll always tell you exactly what theme we're in. The first theme is therefore economics and taxation. There were quite a few questions about that. That also makes sense, because that subject belongs to the General Reviews. One of the first questions that has come back several times is: is there still cause for optimism? Isn't there a risk that expectations will have to be adjusted? I heard Mr Van Rooijen but also others about this. Very briefly, we must base ourselves on the estimates as they are. We know him. That is that the economy is growing by 1.8% this year and by 1.5% next year. We'll have to see if it stays that way. By the way, we are one of the fastest growing economies in this part of Europe, but this is also part of a country that is highly export driven and often comes out of the crisis a little slower and therefore continues to grow a little longer. So that in itself is not a very special one. What you do see is that the Dutch economy has been significantly diversified in recent years. For example, our dependence on the German economy, which was still very large ten years ago, has decreased and we have more of our own independent economic space. It is still strongly linked to Germany because of its exports and all other contacts, but economically speaking we are somewhat less dependent. When Germany sneezes, not all of the Netherlands has a cold. That's gotten less. Of course, we rely on the estimates of the Central Planning Bureau. That's all we've got. They're good. They can do that well, but, as has already been said in my introductory word and in the Throne speech, there are economic risks. I mentioned a few and add the Brexit to that. Then there was a question about the ESC opinion entitled Diversity in the summit. All advice from the ESC weighs heavily, but of course we are also looking for support for these measures. We are considering it right now. Before Christmas, we come up with a cabinet position. So I can't anticipate that right now, because then I'm going to tell you what I think. But then maybe I'll have another fight with flanks in this coalition. With four parties, I've learned, it's wise to say something when we agree. Then there was the question from the angle of D66 and CDA: how do you look at the long-term absence of interest? What does it actually mean for a society if you have low interest rates for that long or actually no interest? This is, of course, an important question, because this development has an impact on many policy areas. Wopke Hoekstra and Menno Snel, the rulers, have given a reflection on this Millions note. During the General Financial Reviews in the House of Representatives, we have also been promised to see if we can't explore that subject a little more broadly and in depth, so that's what we're going to do. The Minister will then come with a letter. I'll make sure he goes to the First Chamber, too. Perhaps it is also an opportunity to discuss it separately. But that letter's gonna be here anyway. I'll be right back with the effects on pensions. Specifically about low interest rates, Minister Koolmees van Sociale Zaken, at the request of the Dutch Parliament, has promised to have independent research conducted into long-term low or even negative interest rates on pension savings. He will also be asking the Central Planning Bureau to look into this issue in the near future. That will come back to Parliament in the near future, at least, if you wish, here as well. Then, of course, the question of our economy and our multinationals in particular, on which comments have been made. Mr Rosenm\u00f6ller drew attention to the increase in wages. I also heard Mr Kox on this. I said this very simply. I think that if a very large company in the Netherlands gives the top man 10% or more raise, the staff should get half. Then I've kept it mild, because then we'll limit it to 5%. If the top man gets more than 10%, the staff will still get 5%. That would be my norm. Because I don't understand what those top men do with all that money. It's not even their own company. I don't understand why there should be such crazy high wage increases at the top of these big companies. At the moment we see that the contract wage increase in the Netherlands is slightly below 3%. That's not bad at all, because that's the highest level in ten years. But my comment was about the very large companies. I think they should actually raise between 4% and 5%, given the huge wage increases at the top. I would like to say that these very large companies are extremely important for the Netherlands. They make sure that the fair in Amsterdam is strong again. And because there is a strong stock exchange in Amsterdam, Amsterdam and its surroundings are again the places where other companies want to settle, possibly also to try to manifest themselves in the Netherlands via that stock exchange, at least if they are public limited companies. The fact that we have very large companies like Unilever, Shell, Philips and others in the Netherlands has huge spin-offs. They have brought much to our country and will bring much to our country in the future. They are important, for example for our innovation investments. 40% of all innovation in the Netherlands comes from Philips and former Philips companies such as ASML and NXP. Those are huge percentages. So let us never underestimate how incredibly important these companies are. But that's no reason to be a top man grabbing that you're getting more than 10% raise. By the way, I think 10% is a big deal. Well, that was my comment. I have tried to look for the debate on this, including through Pauw and other programmes, but it has not been possible. I'm going through with it, but that doesn't mean I don't care about those companies. They are of vital importance to the Netherlands. Furthermore, although I do not have to explain this here, we are naturally working to reduce income tax across a very broad front, to bring forward tax relief and to try to make a contribution as a government. Again, overall wage growth is considerable. It's really at the highest level in years. Then there's the investment fund. Later this year, we want to come up with a letter. Mr Wiebes, the Minister for Economic Affairs, will then lead the way in terms of the earning capacity of the Netherlands, i.e. where will the great opportunities lie in the future to further strengthen the earning capacity of the Netherlands. In addition, such a fund is being worked on. Wiebes and Hoekstra, therefore the Ministers for Economic Affairs and Finance, will come forward with further information at the beginning of next year. I can start philosophizing about that now, but I'd rather not do that until there's a cabinet position on it, in line with what I said earlier. We have said something about the type of investment we are talking about. That's also in the Millions Note. You talk about investments with added value compared to private investments. These are not primarily aimed at achieving the best possible financial return. Furthermore, the fund should clearly distinguish itself from existing public funds and funds, such as Invest-NL. These are therefore non-regular and non-structural investments with social added value. Then you can think about knowledge development, innovation and infrastructure. Those are the picket posts we hit. In it, the exceptional earning opportunities for the Netherlands must be developed. At the beginning of next year, financial design will also be further developed. So that's what we'll get back to."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-29-eerstekamer-6.u480", "speech text": "NATO is the most powerful military alliance in world history. NATO's umbrella is of paramount importance and America has a crucial contribution, not only from its historical interest, through World War II, but also from a forward defense argument for America itself, to prevent this part of the world from coming under Russian influence. But the answer is and-and, because Mr Knapen outlines developments that I see as well, developments where NATO is not automatically the first approach route to solve a problem. I also understood his plea for a strong embedding in immediate neighbouring countries within Europe. In my speech in Zurich in February and recently in Australia, I tried to draw attention to the importance that Europe is projecting on the world stage, with the authority and effectiveness that this entails, which is not possible at the moment. We do not use our foreign political instruments enough over a broad front. As a result, we do not play a sufficient role in the Middle East. It is true that Russia has the Benelux economy combined with the three Benelux countries. Look at all the damage it can do with that little bit of money. That means that we have to do the other things as well as NATO. But given Russia's enormous military power, also in relation to Europe, NATO remains very important. For me, it's en-and. You have to do both."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-29-eerstekamer-6.u521", "speech text": "The Climate Act mentions not amounts, but a target for CO emissions in 2030 and 2050. The Climate Act does not deal with measures and costs. This would, of course, be a direct claim to the state budget. Then there is the plea that I have also heard, I believe from Mr Kox, to consider whether Turkey should be suspended from NATO because of the situation in Northern Syria. I agree that we condemn the raid. Blok also managed to get that conviction and a de facto arms embargo to Turkey, when I thought it would not work on Monday morning, when I spoke to him just before the Foreign Affairs Council. I think that a suspension of Turkey from NATO is extremely unwise, with all the reasons that go with it. This would remove a vital pillar under NATO and one of the most important partners in the security and defence of that eastern flank. So that's really not something we should do. So yes, address and tackle hard, but we really need Turkey in NATO for our security. That's the point of international defense. Now we come to the national administration. In this context, it discussed, among other things, the major issues relating to implementation. What are we doing about the policy and implementation capacity? Mr Rosenm\u00f6ller and others referred to this, but especially Mr Rosenm\u00f6ller. The Throne speech also goes into this of course and stresses the importance of this, because this is the place where people in the country meet the government. There are no quick solutions to the problems of implementation, I say here. We are particularly committed to this in the Cabinet so that improvements can be made quickly in the places where it is most urgent. That is broad in the government and, by the way, does not depend on the people in the execution, absolutely not. If there are problems in implementation, my perception is that this is almost always the case because we, the politicians, have made it too complex. It's not the quality of the people who work there. Whether it's the Tax Office, DUO, the NVWA or the CBR, good people work. I'd like to say that again. There are major issues about how we shape legislation and about legality and quality of implementation. We're looking at that integrally right now."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-29-tweedekamer-18.u214", "speech text": "I am a friend of the SGP but I think Mr Bishop is too weak on this point. Surely the SGP could speak much more explicitly against the horrible prayer call of those tedious minarets that are far too high, of those far too dominant mosques in our streets in our country? Why is Mr Bishop fleeing into all sorts of quasi-universalist defenses? No, this country has centuries of Christian traditions and Christian roots. It's supposed to be here. That's our culture. That's who we are. If people from faraway countries with vast sand plains are so eager to come here to live here, okay, well, you can, but why can't you just say: no, this is the Netherlands, this is Sparta, this is the Netherlands we stand for?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-10-30-tweedekamer-8.u61", "speech text": "No, I don't have cover in mind yet. When we come up with proposals, we like to cover them in general, but in legislation we are always a little reluctant to do so. Anyway, if you've already found cover and if we come to two years, we might be able to use that extra coverage for, for example, raising the defense rate or something. So I do see opportunities emerging. I will continue with my second bottleneck: the medical hours limitation. I've heard them come by before. The government paints the prospect that every Wajanger who works more will also earn more. But that picture is probably not always so bright, because there are Wajangers who can work only a limited number of hours for medical reasons. In this bill, these people are particularly vulnerable. At present, for example, they can receive higher benefits when they enter a continuing working scheme. However, given the expiry of this scheme, they are more dependent on assistance, although a more extensive guarantee period may be positive for this group as well. The SGP draws attention to that income exemption in the Participation Act due to a medical hours limitation. Income can now be exempted up to 15% per month, if I have understood correctly. However, I have not been able to read any further in the parliamentary debate any support for this figure or for any other figures in this context. So I have the feeling that this has been chosen somewhat randomly. My question is whether, in the light of the amendment made by this bill, the government can examine what standards are really appropriate for this target group, which reduced medical hours. I don't make statements like: this or that should be it. However, I would like to see some support for this and that this will be really appropriate for this target group. Finally, I come to the bonus, which has also been mentioned earlier. It is of course very acidic when you see all the financial benefits disappear immediately because you have a benefit. The bill can ensure that Wajongers will retain some of that extra income, but that is different with Wajongers who are fully and permanently disabled. I think GroenLinks will be the first to report it. I understand the government's calculation. In these cases, the benefit is also higher than for Wajongers with work capacity. It may lead to perverse incentives if we completely offset all income to 20% of the minimum wage. My question is whether the Secretary of State sees the possibility of applying coulance in this respect. Mr President, I come to a conclusion. I sincerely hope that we will be able to reach as broad a legislative proposal as possible with some compromises and folds. Let's try to cash this opportunity in with each other. I'll leave it at that. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-6.u42", "speech text": "Yeah, I'm just gonna get on with the honest story. Meanwhile, a crisis in slow motion is taking place in secondary education. Why? Because the agreement is partly defined by teachers who do not have the good papers suddenly no longer \"unqualified\" but \"appointable.\" Of course, that makes very little difference to class practice. Is the Minister prepared to show how many lessons are given in total by unauthorized and appointed teachers? In our opinion, the deficit in secondary education is much greater than a lot of people think. That's what a high school teacher e-mailed us: \"I don't do full-time work anymore. That's really hard to keep up if you want to be there for your own kids and husband. I see people leaving education again because they can't keep up. I see young people heading towards a burnout. At the end of the week I'm all up and during the holidays I'm often sick for the first few days.\" Michel, another teacher in high school, says: \"What I want for education is more teachers, more supervisors, more resources. I want a government that sees teachers as an essential part of a well-functioning society and that is right behind its teachers. More respect for the profession, a field in which knowledge, skills and talent are needed.\" Mr. Chairman. That is why I have tabled an amendment to the proposals. When reckless behavior of bankers plunged us into a deep crisis, we all had to pay for it. People lost their jobs, their homes, came on the zero line for years. The public sector was stripped. Meanwhile, we read in the newspaper that the banks make record profits on the Zuidas. That could be a little less. And then I express myself very kindly, because I don't want to upset the chairman. I think that is important, Mr President! That can be a little less, especially since the people there have an interest in well-educated children. I remember them well: demonstrations there with signs saying \"let the banks pay for the crisis.\" Unfortunately, that never really happened. So we can still settle that. That is why we have an amendment. We propose to increase the bank tax by one billion. They can really spare that. The profits last year were 11 billion for the four largest Dutch banks alone. They'll get over it. With that money you not only solve the pay gap and not only solve the unfair salary in secondary special education, but you give the whole foundation education an extra wage increase: primary or secondary school, regular or special. And why? Because our teachers deserve that and because it is very much necessary to tackle the educational crisis that is afflicting our country. Dare to make a radical choice, but not one such as the cabinet recently made for schools, namely to put one parent in front of the classroom and to do video lessons. So I am referring to a radical and positive choice. A choice for the teacher, who is now drowning, and for the student, who otherwise does not learn to spell or calculate. Is the cabinet prepared to stop using these test balloons and Band-Aids that sometimes pissed teachers off so much and which have touched those teachers to the depths of their professional? Do you want to make a radical choice? Then make it free of charge, ban temporary employment agencies in education and require management to finally give a teacher a permanent contract over time. But stop making those negative choices; intervene in them. Later today, the defense spokesmen of the Chamber will take over. Then the billions here fly through the hall; in the case of the JSF that is literally the case. The billions for the submarines will come after that. Yesterday it was announced that the Netherlands has more millionaires and billionaires than ever before. Last year the Dutch banks made record profits. So let no one here today say that it is simply too expensive, that we have to choose in scarcity and that it has been enough. Minister and Chamber, do not choose submarines today, but teachers. Choose not the billionaires from the Quote, but the students from Rotterdam-Zuid. Do not opt for ABN and ING, but for the teachers' room. That is what the people sitting here in the bleachers deserve and the people who strike out here and in the rest of the country. That deserves our education."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u19", "speech text": "I think the SP sometimes talks about a health care fund, and that's not going to happen tomorrow either. I think those are plans for the future, where you say we're going to go that way. Coincidentally, the VVD is now in the cabinet and we are taking careful steps in that direction with 1.5 billion in addition. Those are careful steps that go in the right direction. I'm happy about that. It is a good step in the right direction. Mr. Chairman. The frigates must also have crusader weapons on board and be able to fire. These are so-called tomahawks for land purposes, but they can also be used for surface purposes at sea. For the replacement of the M-frigates that are now under discussion, perhaps we should also think of the replacement of the air defence and command fregates, the LCFs, which is only in the late 1920s. Maybe it's useful again, I'm a layman to have one kind of frigate, but more frigates with identical armament and equipment. That weapon must have the entire range of defence, from close-in goalkeeper, or its successor, to Ballistic Missile Defense, SM-3 or possibly SM-6, and everything in between: Sea Sparrow and Harpoon against surface ships, torpedoes against surface ships, but also against submarines. In short, a fully armed platform that can project an enormous force against the enemy. Fortunately, the combat support ship now gets armament for self-defense, where earlier it was said that that might not happen. For a Navy ship that has to go on mission, there's no other way than that it has armament, at least for self-defense. I often refer to the story of Sir Galahad during the Falklands War. If a ship cannot defend itself, there will always have to be a frigate nearby as soon as there is a risk of violence. But that seems to me to be a very expensive solution. How does the Secretary of State view this? The Dutch submarines should also be able to carry cross-flight weapons and anti-ship missiles, in addition to the important torpedoes already planned. Now let's quickly decide on the purchase of those submarines. And let me repeat once again that the VVD takes defence strategy as its starting point: a strong Dutch industry, coupled with our excellent knowledge institutions, working with the Royal Navy, to arrive at the best boat. And yes, Mr President, I do not use the term \"for the best price\" here. Let us now note that there is no competitive price with state-owned companies that can cover their own risks with state aid and offer equipment below cost. Is the Secretary of State also aware of the fact that the German Government is not planning to award European military equipment, which has been identified as key technology and is important for the security of Germany? Why would the Netherlands still do that? I'd like a response from the Secretary of State. The Air Force's MQ-9 Reaper must also be armed. Why fly around mission areas and identify danger, but cannot intervene? We're restricting the security of the military in mission area. A Reaper is no different than an F-16 or an F-35. They remain manned devices, only with the Reaper the kite is not in the aircraft, but on the ground behind the controls. We are now imposing a political limitation on military efforts."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u33", "speech text": "No, but in the end there are a number of tasks that you can do much better in the Netherlands. The use of military personnel in the Netherlands with regard to the security of the Netherlands is better. But we also have a responsibility in the Kingdom. We're gonna have to have a defense for that, too. In NATO too, we have a responsibility for the defence. So all these cases are getting together. I still believe that NATO is the cornerstone of security policy, especially for the VVD. So you're part of a whole. If you are part of a whole it is almost even more important to meet the agreements you make as a group."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u48", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Last September I walked along with my son in the Airborne Hiking Tour, the largest one-day memorial tour in the context of the Battle of Arnhem of 1944. The theme was remembrance, awareness and experience. That was the key point. It was an impressive journey for my son, but also for me, in which I was allowed to speak many fellow walkers. Here, the sense of peace and security lived tremendously, just as the realization of what can happen if we do not know peace and the consequences are great. This awareness is becoming less and less evident among new generations, although not everyone participates in this journey, although the number of participants is very large. This while the insecurity around us is often increasing and also growing in the world. In 2020, Defense will continue to restore and modernise the armed forces. That's very important. Since the budgetary depth of 2014, Defence has just over 3 billion extra to spend by 2020. Defense's budget comes to 11 billion. With the government agreement, this cabinet invests 1.5 billion euros a year in Defence. The Spring Paper 2019 added an occasional \u20ac1.5 billion and a structural \u20ac 162 million per year. There is a record number of investment projects. We must think of new transport aircraft, submarines, frigates, a supply ship, personal equipment, the modernisation of armoured vehicles and investments in IT and cyber. But this is not enough for the future. It is a step forward, but there is also a lot of late maintenance and setbacks. Every day every Dutchman spends about \u20ac1.75 to our army, our military, on peace and security. For \u20ac1,75 you and I buy our safety. For \u20ac1.75 a day we protect our country. For \u20ac1.75 a day, we also send women and men to dangerous areas to help people for our safety. We had more money left in the Netherlands in 2019, 12.3 billion, than we were willing to spend on Defense, 10.4 billion. All the money we spend on social security, with 1% of that budget, you can add almost 10% to the Defence budget, to care, education and to our municipalities and provinces, all the money we spend on it, which is extremely important, will become meaningless in one blow if we are no longer free. It's useless if we don't live safe in this world anymore. At the very moment when the Minister of Finance is defending the budget in the Chamber during the General Financial Reviews, a budget which was agreed in this cabinet, the Prime Minister has written in the newspaper from abroad that more money has to be sent to Defence. I agree with the Prime Minister, but my question is why he says so after Princess Day, after the General Reviews. But has the Secretary of Defense noticed any of this generous statement by the Prime Minister? Or what did the Secretary of Defense notice of this ruling? With the extra budget that Defense has been awarded, it is now heavily invested. The CDA asks the Cabinet whether targeted policies for the exploitation of that investment are also being developed. After all, we can buy equipment, but if we can't maintain it, it's only very short and very few. Then the window is nice, but the warehouse is empty. We have considerable financial blocks on our hands, which are mentioned here and there in the budget, but not with clear figures. For example, how much delay is there for those stocks? How big is the ICT's financial footprint in the coming years? What are the additional costs in the new wage building? And what kind of financial freak is behind the real estate and the practice grounds? I'll get back to you on that. Can the supply chain of materials and logistics be restored with the 2020 budget? A vehicle, a ship or a plane is beautiful, but without supplies, it's no use. Is there a budget for stocks, payroll building, real estate, practice areas, ICT and the supply chain material logistics? Mr. Chairman. The large financial deficit is also somewhat masked by the shortage of staff. There are no less than 8,273 vacancies. One in five military positions is not occupied and the workload is increasing. Nevertheless, absenteeism remains low, a compliment to our women and men. The understaffing means that we can do less, we need less equipment and less supplies and we need to pay fewer people. If we were at full strength, the deficit would become really clear in its full size. To what extent does this underemployment mask the financial problem? And the influx isn't even the biggest problem. It's about the huge outflow from the Defense Department. What makes people not stay with the D.O.D.? And how can we solve that? The personnel, our men and women in uniform are the gold of the defense organization. The CDA welcomes the agreement on working conditions that has been reached. This is crucial for restoring trust, but more is needed to bind and preserve people, as the unions also write in the letter to the Chamber. A new staffing system and a new market-based wage building are needed. That must be ready on 1 July next year, as has been agreed. In fact, the current wage building dates back to the service period, which my colleague Mr Bosman has already mentioned. In particular, the lower framework deserves relatively little. In response to questions to the 2017 BZK report on what government personnel earn compared to the market sector, and defence personnel, the directors refer to this as reasonable, but to what extent does the report reflect the special position of a military? For example, in the CDA's view, training and temporary work allowances are very low. Does the Secretary of State share the criticism that defence's job evaluation system, based on that of the government, should take more account of military competences? And how do the rulers see the space and possibilities in the RVU tax? It is also difficult in terms of rotation, because we have few people. Technical staff is almost impossible to find, as is the case in many sectors in the Netherlands. Technical mbos are picked up with the service car from school or another job and in all ranks we have partially filled battalions, too few soldiers and too few petty officers. This understaffing ensures that many exercises and tasks cannot be performed. This is demotivating on personnel, leaving even more soldiers. We don't have enough Manoeuvre units. According to the NATO standard that we have agreed with ourselves, there must be four, but I think we only have three. The problems apply to all parts of Defense, because at the military level it will also be extra pressure around the Brexit. On top of the already high pressure, additional requests, such as from the police, to secure judges and officers after the murder of attorney Derk Wiersum. If we can believe the newspaper, the Marechaussee has not yet responded to this distress call. Is that right? The KMar itself claims to be overloaded with the security of mosques, synagogues, the Second Chamber and the airport Schiphol, which was also on the news about this tonight. Is this message correct and what can the rulers do about it? By the way, the police also continue to attract the people of the KMar, because the police are looking for people again. The pressure of military deployment is enormous due to shortages in the chain. If technicians go on mission with two helicopters, then everything around the helicopters in the Netherlands stands still. The current military force is what we managed to maintain financially after a quarter cuts. There hasn't been room for real future vision yet. That is why the review of the Defence Note is urgently needed. The Minister informed the Chamber quite a bit about that on 2 October. What tasks do we expect from the Defense Department? What are we good at and are we going to strengthen it? What are we less strong at, and are we going to repel it or raise it? What does NATO and the UN expect from us and what does the EU expect from us? More importantly, how do we contribute to peace and security in the world and the importance of the Netherlands? In the letter, the Minister states that she is clearly involving the Chamber and also external parties in order to achieve this review. The CDA looks forward to the discussion and looks forward to the input of the Ministry of Defence and also of external experts in order to form a reasoned opinion. The women and men of our armed forces are doing very important and good work. Every effort is a tough one for the organisation, because equipment, supplies and staff are very scarce. We're currently at the lowest number of people broadcast since times: 480 if I'm right. It is precisely in these missions that we do important work to prevent major problems and danger closer to home. In Afghanistan last month we visited the Dutch Mountain camp in Mazar-e-Sharif and the NATO headquarters of Resolute Support in Kabul. We have seen for ourselves what progress is being made between all the violence of setbacks. The dishonorable thing about the work of our military is that the eyes of the world and also of the Netherlands are often focused on the progress that the Taliban sometimes make, while those same eyes often seem to be closed to the lasting progress that our armed forces make possible there. The Netherlands is there to ensure that the Afghan army and the Afghan police will be able to guarantee their own security in the future."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u60", "speech text": "I think the Secretary of State is there as Secretary of State for Defence and not on behalf of a party. That's the first thing. Second. The SP wants to cut 3 billion dollars on defense. The SP just had the story about what the defense should look like. But then the SP must also admit that the SP Defense Department is actually some sort of Boy Scout club behind the dikes. How does the SP see its own Defense Department?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u70", "speech text": "No, no. Again, I didn't cut anything. You've been cutting back. At that time, I thought about how it should be if we want to cut back. At least it shouldn't be like the VVD did. We have seen the consequences of this in recent years; I have mentioned a number of them. I have just indicated that we do not buy expensive submarines. We don't buy expensive jets either. We don't need any to defend our country. What we do want is to have our defenses in order. We will have to look at exactly what that should look like under these circumstances. Your lobby, your submarine lobby, your military-industrial complex with large armament and want to continue to engage in permanent warfare in countries like Afghanistan for 18 years, making it more unsafe... I would advise the VVD, Mr Bosman, to reconsider that strategy. That's exactly my plea. If you're willing to do that, we can find out which Defense Department is one of them."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u72", "speech text": "So Mrs Karabulut has no idea what her defense organization should look like. So that's clear. It's not \"my\" lobby. I think that's inappropriate. There's a lobby. We know that. It's just going on. That goes for a lot of things. There are also NGOs, human rights organisations and all kinds of other organisations lobbying."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u119", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. I do not have much speaking time tonight, but I would like to begin by expressing a word of thanks and appreciation to the people of the Royal Marechaussee who took action at Schiphol tonight. It only shows that she and their colleagues in the other aid and security services are always ready for our security. In one of my first defence debates, I said that I had never talked about culture as much as I had been since I became a spokesman for Defence. That hasn't changed. Last week we got a look at the culture at the officer training of the army, the KMA. It appears to be an ideal breeding ground for abuses. If you're not in on it, you're not really in on it as leader of tomorrow. That is not going to change if you let tomorrow's leaders train and guide them by today's leaders who have grown up in the same culture. Is the Minister prepared to break that pattern by assigning people from outside to a few crucial places, for the guidance of cadets? So that's about people who aren't infected with that culture. And is the Minister also prepared to continue to ask me to open an external hotline for complaints about social security before? So far, such hotlines have always produced significantly more reports than when people have to knock on the door to the Defense Department themselves. We all know why. I've been pushing for more money for a decent collective agreement for the people of Defense, because that's what they deserve. That extra money has finally come and the new collective agreement has come. Late and after a process that has not increased people's confidence, but now there is. As a first step, because more are needed. A new, modern function and reward building could be such a step. That's gonna cost extra money, especially if the new building wants to make Defense a more attractive employer. And I have to. However, there is no additional funding in the budget. Do, I say, because otherwise you run the risk of the beginning of trust disappearing like snow before the sun. If it's going to take much longer than it has been agreed and if it's going to be a lot more hassle again, because you haven't spent enough money on it. Mr. Chairman. The new collective agreement does not mean that the back door is already closed, quite the contrary. For example, many 30s and 40s leave the Department of Defense. That sucks, often for themselves, but also for the Defense Department. They are people who have invested a lot and who can do a lot, often have even more to do and can be years of added value. You can't just replace it with someone who comes in new. What do our rulers think about giving people in certain functions a serious or a more serious stay bonus? For example, I call Marines and Commandos. The emptiness among them continues; we are approaching a critical point. Other countries have such a bonus and it works, I hear. I think the defense should take unorthodox measures to get to strength, no, what do I say, stay on strength! That does not happen automatically, not when I listen to the Commander of the Armed Forces, who has already philosophized twice in the newspaper about re-establishing the duty of attendance, and not when I look at the filling rates that remain at 80%. That is far too low to be able to do what we need to do, especially when we see that we will have to put even more on the mat in NATO. I have said before that if we are not careful in the future, the question of our vision, our mission and how we are going to carry it out will not so much be determined by what is necessary and what we want, but by what we can still do in terms of people. Mr. Chairman. There's more money going to the DOD. That's what I'm supposed to do. What we also see is that the Defense Department doesn't always manage to turn that money into people and resources. Almost no material project reaches the original planning, from the submarines, to the M-frigates to the marine barracks. I actually want a smart-formulated plan in which I can see how much money is needed when it is spent, at what rate and at what rate, and in which I can see what we can deliver and how ambitions become reality. If we can convert the money into people, material and capabilities so difficult now, how can we do that if we are moving towards that 2%? Moreover, as far as the way in which equipment is to be tendered is concerned, we often talk about the French, but I would also like to point out, as Mr Bosman has said, to Germany, where it is always the case to stop all European procurement. I ask the Secretary of State to follow suit. The opposite is happening around the real estate of the Defense Department. The Minister is running out of money for investment in this area. That's why money goes from equipment to real estate. Where's the DOD gonna feel that? Is the material side so spacious in his jacket that more can be done there, for example for the staff? I'm gonna finish up. I do this by calling attention again to a few groups that I have spoken about before, starting with the people of the Marechaussee. They guard our safety, including here and at Schiphol. Can we now agree that those decent raincoats, which I mentioned earlier, are common at the end of this year, for example? Last year the Secretary of State reported that it should be possible to settle quickly. It hasn't happened yet, but it has to. Then the chrome-6 victims. How long must the suffering of these people, who have been bullied for years by their employer, so Defense Department? In my view, now that the money released for the people in question is far from being spent, I propose that a gesture be made to them. Don't let it be a long shot, if only because those people don't have it anymore, literally. Solve this as you might expect from a good employer. That's what the DOD wants to be, isn't it? I'm coming to the federal walk-in houses. I understand the Minister doesn't want municipalities to sit back when she says, \"I'll take care of it all.\" Also, I understand she's not in the mood for a generic arrangement. So let's see where and when walk-in homes get into trouble and then deliver customization. Two weeks ago, I visited our people in Afghanistan with a number of colleagues. Men and women of armed forces and police are doing very important work there in dangerous conditions, for our safety and for our children's safety. I have a lot of respect for that. I thank them for that, even from this place."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u121", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. 75 years of freedom is not self-evident. In the year 2020, we will consider in detail the fact that we were liberated 75 years ago. We were liberated from a tyrannical foreign domination. Since then, we have been living in peace and security for 75 years. That's something to be very grateful for. I also express that gratitude towards our military. But it's not something that's self-evident at this time. NATO and the US are our main allies for peace and security, especially for a relatively small country like the Netherlands, but these guarantees are no longer self-evident. President Trump is right to ask for greater contributions from EU Member States and a NATO member, Turkey, to be a great risk to our own security. Our most loyal ally against ISIS was driven out, allowing IS to group again and probably IS-fighters to go uncontrolled towards the Netherlands. The European Union has also ensured peace and security in recent decades. But this union is also under tension. We know that the United Kingdom may want to get out and that other countries, in Eastern Europe, do not really contribute to stability when it comes to violations of the values of the rule of law. Sureties we trusted aren't so sure anymore. That is why I come to a number of points of interest on behalf of the Christian Union, which I would like to stress to the rulers. Firstly, the Defence Equipment Budget Fund. Each year, the Christian Union also insists on the restoration of basic readiness. That is also the reason why D66 and the Christian Union together argued for the Defence Equipment Budget Fund last year. I am therefore pleased that the relevant legislative proposal is now before us. This fund should help to prevent the defence budget from falling prey to drastic cuts as easily as before. I hope the law will be passed soon. Then there are the strategic choices concerning the submarines. The restoration of our defense demands and demands that we make strategic choices. But when it comes to new submarines, those choices take a long time. The B letter about the submarines would come first this spring and then around the summer. It is now November and the letter is still not there. What's going on, I'm asking the Secretary of State. What are the reasons for this long delay? Strategic choices for the Christian Union are about the greatest possible involvement of Dutch industry, not only about the economic interests of that industry, but also to preserve its own knowledge and capacity for the future. Because they keep threatening to disappear. Does the Secretary of State agree with me on that point? The Chamber adopted a motion by Mrs Bruins Slot at the beginning of this year. This motion instructs the Cabinet to accommodate the design, development, construction, maintenance and final direction of the submarines within the so-called golden triangle. It seems to me that this motion gives a clear direction to the process leading to the B letter. Then what is the problem, I ask the Secretary of State."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u126", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. Today is a special day, not only because we are dealing with the defence budget, but also because today is Thanksgiving for Crop and Labour. Unlike tonight, I was lucky enough to attend a service this afternoon in my own church church in Elspeet; an oasis of peace so between all those Defence debates. I hope that at least today the Minister has found a moment of peace, because that is what I wish her. But when I sit there under such a sermon and hear the words of Jesus, it always makes me long for a new heaven and a new earth. Why? On such a new earth where there is no more war and where there is peace, you no longer need defence. But yes, as long as we live on this earth, the SGP likes to cooperate in a strong defense. In this respect, we will try to play our part in this budgetary process. That is why I would like to review a number of issues, Mr President, and I will start with the F-35. Last week, like Mr Bosman, as well as Mr De Vries and the Minister and the Secretary of State, I was present at Leeuwarden Airport at the reception of the first F-35. Mrs. Diks, you were there? I didn't hit you, I apologized! Good of you to come! I hear all these noises, but I'm not gonna respond to them, Mr. Chairman. It has to be an interruption first. Then let's talk about it. Anyway, I was very impressed by the strength, versatility and also the intelligence of that fifth-generation yacht plane. Let me say straight away: we as SGP are very happy with the purchase of nine additional devices. Last year our motion was dissuaded and voted away, but in such a year there has been a lot of clear insight. The question we do have at the same time is whether that number of 46 is sufficient to achieve the Dutch goals of staying safe, bringing safety and connecting safely. Would the Secretary of State consider the possibilities for purchasing a larger number of F-35s at a decreasing unit price in the future? Mr President, my next topic is the NATO standard. Not only the SGP, but also this Minister and Secretary of State have a warm heart for Defence. When I see their passion, I'd almost say they're on fire. But I think I've also set Mrs. Diks on fire, so I'm just gonna stop. For the DOD, that's what I'm talking about, isn't it?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u137", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. The Ministry of Defense sometimes looks like the Ministry of Secret Affairs. The word \"secret\" appears nine times in the defense budget. Confidentiality is sometimes a necessity, especially when it comes to protecting your people's lives. But secrecy is too often a cover-up in practice. On page 3 of the budget, I see an amount of EUR 10 million under the heading'secret'. Why is this post classified? How can I check, on behalf of the Dutch people, whether these expenditures are sensible and meaningful? What am I supposed to imagine at the secret post? Are we talking about the night vision goggles, coats or pickup trucks sent to the Syrian rebels, or other expenses we're not supposed to know about? Mr. Chairman. The budget also explains only changes amounting to EUR 100 million or more, while ordinary citizens have to justify every euro in their tax returns. Will the defense budget be an inaccessible black box? In our opinion, the DOD needs to get rid of the secrecy story. DENK wants to end this secrecy. How can I, as a Member of Parliament, monitor, under budgetary law, what the government is spending, as the word secret is too common and things are not explained? I'd like a response from the Minister. Mr. Chairman. DENK has a consistent story about the Defence budget since it was founded. DENK stands for a Ministry of Defence that focuses on peace and reconstruction, not international bombing sessions for the great powers. DENK doesn't want to stop military and billions in Defense to serve the great powers. DENK stands for: the basis on order, a good equipment and reward for our military and sufficient staff. We do not want expensive prestige projects such as the JSF and the new submarines, not international bombing missions, but an army dedicated to bringing peace and justice."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u157", "speech text": "I understand that agreements were made at first, while suddenly we started earlier. We have the defense budget here. I am allowed to interrupt twice in two stages, while it is about an entire budget. Now there is also such a shocking remark, which speaks of a very bad remark from yesterday's law. Because the gentleman is being prosecuted by an attorney, he's suddenly gonna make up for it, while the verdict is definitely done and that several times. And we're still not allowed to say anything. I think that we should actually increase the number of interruptions, and it is a pity that it will become later."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-06-tweedekamer-8.u168", "speech text": "I just indicated how we are in our defense strategy. We've been doing that consistently for four years. You can read in our party program how we want DOD."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-07-tweedekamer-10.u251", "speech text": "That could be for example. I find it really unwise to make statements in a motion about resources in a subsequent cabinet period and then to say in this Chamber that schools should interpret it as if it were already structural. I think that's unwise, and I think it's false. You just shouldn't, for the simple reason that we might be in a whole different situation later and you can't keep that promise. In addition, I assume that any cover within the budget will have to be found. Are you going to take half a billion from culture, or half a billion from the media? If you want to look outside that budget, are you going to take away half a billion dollars from care or from Social Affairs? Are you taking 10% of the defense budget, the security of our country?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-07-tweedekamer-3.u141", "speech text": "I've been talking to POMS employees myself. Many employees are also employed by the Defense Department. So I know the stories. I have also spoken to people at various meetings that I have organised before. They impress me too, because it's about people who have worked with soul and salvation for the defense. So I also recognize the stories. It is important that we try to provide proper care for these people, to see how we ensure that these people are recognised and recognised. We are also doing everything we can to see if that is possible. Whether that is to compensate for one's own risk, to give an example, or whether one can ask all kinds of questions and get support in them, that is what we are focusing on. You have received an e-mail and I would also like to receive it if you wish, through you, Chairman. Those stories affect me too, because this is about us. What I would like to propose to Mrs Karabulut... You're making some kind of false contradiction as if we're not willing to take care of our employees, our former employees. That is what we absolutely want. That's what it's all about all the time. When it comes to aftercare for chromium-6, former employees have also been asked what they still need, what it means. We will continue to do so. That has nothing to do with purchasing equipment. This is not a discussion about money, because we care about our aftercare when it comes to reintegration. Whether it's for veterans or for our employees, that's what it's all about. I see that Mrs Karabulut may want to create a false contradiction that is not there. On the contrary, we want to ensure that there is good care. I have also indicated that, when it comes to the employees who worked with chromium-6 at the POMS sites, together with the power stations and RIVM, we have looked into the possibility of designing a scheme that meets the research, but also what is the practice in the Netherlands in this type of scheme. There is no need to fight the judge, because almost no case in this matter comes before the courts."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-07-tweedekamer-3.u148", "speech text": "I'll take this case with me. I have just mentioned this to Mrs Karabulut. It's the spirit we have. I've just indicated that it's about compensating for one's own risk. In addition, we ask RIVM what we can do for employees who are not yet sick, but who may be worried. Is there anything you can think of that you could do in terms of research? Those are all things that are aimed at that. So I'd like to hear from this case, so we can write it down to see what's going on there and see if there's a solution. The general line from us is to look at aftercare as much as possible, where it is always a search what it means wider. I will come back to that. Mr President, I would like to go to equipment, if I may. Yes, you're nodding. It is good to take you into our material projects and what is being done in them. The Minister has already, in a general sense, addressed what has happened and done in the past period. I think it's good to give you some figures on where we come from. In 2016, we had a 16% investment quota. In 2019 it will be 23%. In 2016, we had a liability position, i.e. the amount of contracts and the value of those contracts in that year, of 2.6 billion. In 2019, that was 5.9 billion. The fact that extra investment has been made, not just the 1.5 billion, but all the work to ensure that that train gets on steam, is all about that. This does not mean that all projects are going well. Things can always come up in there. But the fact that we have gone from 2.6 billion to 5.9 billion already indicates that the investment train, so to speak, has started to run. This may be less visible to you, because you will see in the Defence Project Overview the final result of the projects we are actually going to complete, but of course we are also doing a lot of things in the preparatory phase. To take you into account, the number of projects we have in preparation has doubled compared to 2016. We do that to our people from the Defense Material Organization. We do this at the front by making sure that we are prepared for the future, because we see very well that the future of Defence will change in a changing security environment and that, in addition to your staff, your equipment must also be prepared for it. But we're actually investing. For the past two years, I've given you 30 A letters. As I said, the figures speak for themselves. However, a number of projects are delayed. Mrs. Diks asked for that. That's right: a number of projects are delayed. Sometimes it's because that's what we want. One example is the large clothing projects. We have decided, also in the context of personnel care and ensuring that your people get the good stuff, that everyone gets a helmet and that the clothing package is also reinforced in terms of material and quantity. We're gonna keep on betting on that. We'll make sure there's a choice package for combat boots. In every possible way we try to strengthen the clothing. It'll slow it down. Sometimes it is delayed because the supplier has problems with the delivery. So it's different at once. If you look at all the overviews of the defence projects, we had 57 in the book in 2016. We've got 78 now. In 2016, 45% of the projects had been delayed. We're at 28% now. We still want to bring that down further, but it does show that we are working with man and power to get those projects done. I am proud that we are able to achieve this with each other in a market that attracts and in which not only we invest, but also other European countries do. You can see that the industry itself is struggling to handle all the questions in a good way and in good time. Then a number of questions were asked by Mr De Roon, Mr Voordewind and Mr Bosman on the replacement of submarines. That is one of our major projects, because they are one of our most important weapons systems. As you know, we've developed a defense industry strategy. We established it with the Chamber at the beginning of this year. As you know, we started this project in 2015. That was in the previous cabinet period, without a new DIS. We have established it on the basis of the coalition agreement. We considered it important to include these new DIS in an ongoing procurement procedure. This must be done with care and transparency. We're in the middle of that process. It's an ongoing procurement process. So you also have to make sure you know how to do it in a good way. That's what we're doing. I have indicated that further information from the CIS has been requested. In my letter of April to the Chamber, I also indicated that the mandate was given. I hope to be able to send this year's letter, the B letter, to discuss it with the Chamber and see what follow-up steps are needed and whether the Chamber will agree to it. As you know, it is important to deal with these matters in the CIS. We no longer have a self-creating industry for submarines in the Netherlands, but from the DIS we clearly look at what it means. I see questions. All of a sudden, three men are coming."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-07-tweedekamer-3.u170", "speech text": "That choice will then lie with us. So that means that the total amount... Imagine, in the end, the defense budget has to go to 16 billion a year; I'm just gonna call it a crazy number. That story will then be laid down, because those are the things that need to be done. Will that be submitted? Or is it presented: no, this is a budget of 11 billion that is growing a little, perhaps 12 billion, and we can fit it into that? That's my concern. Do not squash the security situation in the money we have, but determine that security situation and tell us how much money we need for that. That's my question."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-07-tweedekamer-9.u5", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. It's always good to start with history, as the minister did. We stand here the year we commemorate 75 years of freedom. That freedom does not come naturally and has value. How do we determine that value? How do we ensure that this freedom is actually maintained? Freedom is neither self-evident nor self-evident. I've been spokesperson Water for a while. People have no idea what we're doing to get that water out of the tap. Before the water comes out of the tap, it has to be removed from somewhere, it has to be purified and so on. And in the Netherlands we wash our car with it. People have no sense of the value of water, but they think it should be there. Why don't you take the water away for an hour? The questions of the House will come by themselves. The same applies to safety. We accept that there is, but we wonder how much we need to invest for it. That's why it's important that we keep having this conversation. We are members of NATO, but also of the European Union, which is becoming increasingly important. The investment for the defence of the European Union is a responsibility of its own. It is not so much that we are called upon to invest, but we have an intrinsic value to defend. We ourselves think we should have our defenses in order. As Mr Stoffer said, the Germans are working towards 1.5% in 2024 and then on to 2% around 2030, 2031. But those Germans are gonna take a lot more than that. They take cybersecurity as part of security, and rightly so. But they also take space in the context of security, and rightly so. We also discussed the space domain here in the Chamber. It is a rapidly growing domain, but we still have to take a step in that. Well, I'm glad the Minister's gonna say the same thing, but that story's not gonna happen until next year. Those are steps that are being taken too late. The odds are now. There's money in investment funds. This cabinet is committed to investment. I suppose this is part of those investments, both in space and in cyber. Let's take that into account in terms of security. I am very curious to know what the Minister thinks of that. Mr President, then the staff. It's one of the basic things we talked about. People are committed to peace and security wherever in the world. We talked about our liberators 75 years ago. Young people 17, 18 years old from the American Midwest. They had never heard of Europe, but they were here to free us. Military personnel step in without a problem to go somewhere to bring peace and security. That staff is worth gold. I welcome the added money, including through the Spring paper, for working conditions, but these steps need to be taken. Mr. Chairman. You won't be surprised that I'm looking forward to the results of the flexible staffing system. But the words that have been spoken do me good, let me put it this way. The equipment. The minister already mentioned that we once had 211 F-16s. But I say, in 1955, we had a thousand planes in the Royal Air Force. A thousand! We are now going to 46 F-35s, but I assume that this number will grow even further, given what the NATO letter has been written and because it is such a force multiplier towards the future. Mr. Chairman. It's time to dedicate material and not to outsource it. It's time to move on. I understand the whole procedure with the DMP and the importance of care and I therefore welcome the Minister's answers. Mr President, I have a motion on the equipment. [[Motion]] [[The Chamber,]] [[heard the debate,]] [[Whereas the MQ-9 Reaper is still unarmed;]] [[calls on the Government to inform the Chamber of the need to adapt in order to arm the Reaper,]] [[and goes to the order of the day.]] [[This motion was tabled by Mr Bosman, Mr Van Helvert, Mr Voordewind and Mr Stoffer. It seems to me that their submission is sufficiently supported.]] [[She's getting No. kst-35300-X-23]]"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-07-tweedekamer-9.u40", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. This is the third day we've talked about defense. This room doesn't seem to get enough of it. I very much welcome the commitments and the follow-up to D66's important questions. Of course, the same applies to those of my colleagues, but I cannot necessarily be personally happy about that. I think that this budget is a good start to doing nice things for the armed forces and doing good things for the staff. I wish the Secretary of State and the Minister every success in giving substance to this budget in the coming year. Finally, I have one motion. [[Motion]] [[The Chamber,]] [[heard the debate,]] [[whereas interpreters who have worked for the Dutch armed forces have a special position and therefore deserve recognition and, if necessary, protection;]] [[Notes that persons engaged in international military missions in Afghanistan, in particular interpreters and guards, are classified in the update of the EASO Country Guidance on Afghanistan as systematically persecuted group and Taliban target;]] [[calls on the Government to align the interpretation protection policy with the EASO Country Guidance on Afghanistan and to consider them systematically prosecuted, and when it is necessary for Defence to prefer interpreting in future military missions, to work with interpreters who have a contract with the Dutch State and to state that they deserve protection when they are in direct and personal danger,]] [[and goes to the order of the day.]] [[This motion was tabled by Mr Belhaj and Mr Voordewind. It seems to me that their submission is sufficiently supported.]] [[She's getting No. kst-35300-X-32]]"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-07-tweedekamer-9.u109", "speech text": "Then there is a motion from Mr Kerstens, on item No. 37. I'm going to dissuade him with the explanation that there's no money left, just to put it down like that. The RIVM investigation is still ongoing. We have, of course, initially conducted the investigations at the POMS locations. To this end, we had the coulance scheme and now we have the benefit scheme that we have established together with the trade unions. But the investigation into CARC and the investigation into the other defense sites is still ongoing. This arrangement is open to former employees and employees. In that sense, there is no money left. That's why I'm dissuading the motion."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-12-eerstekamer-10.u222", "speech text": "What strikes me is that the Minister again puts words in my mouth that I do not take in my mouth. That is also a bit why I have just made this remark. The Minister is addressing the Chamber with a number of concerns which at least my party has about the possibility that it could get out of hand with the external hire, either in the amount of the external hire, or in the amount of what is paid for it. Surely the Minister could have said that he understands that this concern lives with our party and that he will try to monitor that it will not come to that? But he immediately fired into the defense in a certain way, which I wonder whether that reassures me or not. That's exactly why I just made the point that I didn't make it better when it comes to how positive I am about this bill."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-13-tweedekamer-4.u72", "speech text": "I have just spoken very clearly and very critically about Turkey's wrongdoings. I think it is rare for Mrs Karabulut and I to really agree. However, we agree on the criticism of Turkey's illegal actions. Let's just say that for once. NATO is essential to keep us safe. It is the strongest alliance in world history. It's what gives us protection from outside threats. We must not weaken NATO as the Socialist Party always wishes, or perhaps it wants us to leave it. I don't know what the current position is. We must cherish NATO, and we must strengthen it. If there are problems there, and there are problems, I have just appointed them myself, then we have to deal with them. We shouldn't, as the SP keeps saying, cut defense, run away and be critical of everything. No, you have to deal with it, you have to do things."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-13-tweedekamer-4.u181", "speech text": "The answer is yes. Perhaps the best example is the first point that Mr Koopmans mentioned, namely peace and security. As you may imagine, I have been with you for some time in GroenLinks and also in the parties that formed GroenLinks. If something has changed within GroenLinks over the years, it is thinking in terms of peace and security, the importance of peace operations and the importance of defence spending. We were a party that always cut billions on defense if you look at the passing on of our election program. Mr Koopmans will have noticed that this is no longer the case. So we also believe that there are a number of areas where you need to invest in defence. That was for my party a very big move we've made in the last ten years. I grant the VVD that they make such a move, perhaps occasionally the other way. Only, at the VVD I see a movement in a direction that I find very undesirable on a number of points. So the answer is yes. The answer is also yes where migration deals are concerned. We have always said that we are not against migration deals, provided they meet a number of conditions. I note that no migration deal has been concluded in recent years, despite what the government agreement says about it. If such a deal is made, we will look into whether it meets the conditions. We are not, in principle, opposed to concluding migration deals. We never were."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-13-tweedekamer-4.u188", "speech text": "No, that was about investing in defense."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-13-tweedekamer-4.u189", "speech text": "Investing in defense, yes."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-13-tweedekamer-4.u190", "speech text": "Does GroenLinks now positively want more money to go to defense?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-13-tweedekamer-4.u308", "speech text": "I have said that Israel always has the right to defend itself, but that it cannot be that it shoots people in the back from afar. That can't be part of the defense, and that's not right. The Minister has said that there will be an investigation. We'll wait and see how we deal with it. So a fair question to the Minister is: what about the investigation and what reaction does the government have to this? I'm really looking forward to that."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-14-tweedekamer-24.u97", "speech text": "Indeed, the Minister remains in the position where he stood with the defense that Assad has done terrible things. We agree on that. I do not think that was the point of discussion either. What the Minister does say, and I do not think that is right, is that Mr Van Helvert suggests that we should accept it. That suggestion was not made and I did not say it. What I have said is that we must acknowledge that we have not succeeded in getting him out of there. You can say that you are not going to accept that either, but at the moment when we are not prepared to do anything about it, when the United States moves away, we will have to acknowledge that he is there for the time being. Then the Minister says 'if the Netherlands should take the lead', but I never suggested that either. I said, can we make a small opening? In fact, that leadership has already taken on someone else: Denmark, the Czech Republic, Poland, and France. The French Minister has also said that it is no longer possible to speak. So those suggestions weren't made. Does the Minister recognise that if Assad stays where he is and we don't scare him away, he will have a role in future stability in that region? That's my question."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-20-tweedekamer-2.u14", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I would like to begin my speech with an urgent matter. I hope Minister Grapperhaus will listen carefully. It is about the threats and the fatwas that my group chairman has been receiving for 15 years. My party political story will come soon, but this goes beyond party political importance. You remember, Minister Grapperhaus, that my group leader, Mr Wilders, in August last year, in the run-up to the Mohammed cartoon competition, was proclaimed a fatwa by the influential Pakistani spiritual Khadim Hussein Rizvi. The fatwa about Mr Wilders was as follows: everyone who has acquaintances in the Netherlands must approach them and tell them to kill that blasphemist, the blasphemer. Every Muslim living in the Netherlands must go to the blasphemer's house and kill him, says Khadim Hussein Rizvi about Mr Wilders. The day before yesterday, Mr Wilders was informed by the prosecution and the police that that Pakistani Islamic preacher repeated his fatwa against Mr Wilders, after having a video translated from Urdu. This showed that Rizvi, after being released from prison in May of this year, after a six-month detention for resisting the acquittal of the Christian Asia Bibi in Pakistan, once again threatens Mr Wilders with death in front of a large crowd. His call to decapitate Wilders was enthusiastically received by a crowd of Muslims who then all shouted slogans to decapitate Wilders, slit his throat. We know that followers of Islamic preachers actually follow fatwas. It's a death sentence being pronounced. There are over one and a half billion Muslims in the world, a quarter of the world's population. Some of them, even quite a percentage, follow this Islamic preacher and thus follow his fatwa. So is Yunaid I. Last year the same imam called for the murder of Geert Wilders. Several Pakistani have then tried to take action and travelled to the Netherlands to slaughter Geert Wilders in his home or in the Lower House. Luckily, one of these guys got caught. Fortunately, the judges were so wise to give this terrorist nearly twice as much jail time as the prosecutor demanded. Salute for these judges, but this shows that Islamic preacher Rizvi must be taken very seriously. And a year after the first fatwa, he does it again. Today, now, Mr. Wilders is reporting this man again. I know that police and prosecutors and the services have been aware of this since the end of October, but my appeal to the minister is: do more, defend our democracy, defend our parliamentarians, stand for freedom of expression and never accept threats or violence! Bring your Pakistani fellow minister in, force him to pick up this life-threatening Rizvi, who has also said that an atomic bomb must be thrown into the Netherlands. What are you going to do now, Minister Grapperhaus? This is a Dutch Member of Parliament, a group chairman of the second party of the Netherlands, an opposition leader who is threatened for the second time with a fatwa and more than that. Has the Pakistani ambassador been summoned since the end of October? Is Rizvi's arrest demanded? Have you called the Dutch ambassador back yet? Have you discussed with your colleague, Mr Blok, what actions can the Netherlands take towards Pakistan? As is well known, after the first fatwa against Mr Wilders, the State requested legal aid from Pakistan to persuade the authorities there to question Rizvi as a suspect of threat and sedition, as did the national cricket player Latif who had put a 3 million Pakistani rupee premium on Wilders' head. Are you going to take more firm steps now? I'd like to hear from you what you've done and what you're going to do. What is the situation after this second fatwa with the safety of Mr Wilders, who has lost his freedom for more than fifteen years because of threats and fatwas and who now has to fear again that idiots will visit him at home or in the Second Chamber to slit his throat? What is the situation with that, I ask the Minister. Is the security secure enough? The Justice and Security budget. It should be about numbers. How much do we spend and is it enough? Is it enough to make the Dutch rule of law robust and to make the Netherlands safe? As long as the ministry is rotten, as long as it acts as only mob gangs act, it doesn't make much sense to look at the numbers. 'Cause it's not nothing. Julio Poch was thrown by Minister Hirsch Ballin, the CDA predecessor of Grapperhaus for the Argentine lions: Barbertje had to hang to serve a higher state interest. All exculpatory documents concerning Poch and all documents that could demonstrate the reprehensible behaviour of Hirsch Ballin and the officials of this ministry and the prosecution have disappeared. A few years later, the VVD Minister of Justice and Security Opstelten ordered Geert Wilders to finish politically, \u00e0 la Pim Fortuyn, only through the Minister's Public Prosecutor's Office. Grapperhaus and all the state's attorneys are anxiously withholding essential information from this case. No one can know how corrupt this ministry is. They are doing everything they can to hide how they and their predecessors and top officials have trampled on the foundations of the rule of law. North Korea is jealous of the way in which this Ministry and this OM deal with the group leader of the second party of the Netherlands, a critical MP and opposition leader. And North Korea is jealous of the way successive ministers and officials get away with this behavior. Who are happy with this ministry? Those are the paedophiles of the Netherlands. They barely get caught. If they get caught, they rarely get real punishment. If they are caught and turned out to be members of the caste of Grapperhaus, if they turn out to be employees of Grapperhaus, if they are former board members of the youth association of the VVD, the party of Minister Dekker, if they are chief prosecutor, then they will be beaten by their friends. Those pedophiles, who commit crimes against young defenseless victims, then escape the dance. The Mafia is tough, but takes good care of its own people and now it has turned out to be also for its own paedophiles. The Ministry is cheating and messing around. They cover it up when asylum seekers commit serious crimes. The Netherlands should not know that: that would only be in the hands of the PVV."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-20-tweedekamer-7.u150", "speech text": "That's what it's meant to be. Please don't leave. I'll look more in that direction, too. In any case, I say to you: if I read that statement, then every day on the floor of the Ministry of Justice the sun rises; one goes whistling to his work, one works for the good, it is a meaningful daily use. On the work floor, as I understand from the pleading, it goes hand in hand. That's what you get to hear. Everything that is viewed, all processes: everything is inclusive. One always works proactively, without exception. Every once in a while, that word comes out. Proactive! People are also very satisfied with the working relationship between them. At the back of the pleading are enthusiastic employee reports. Without exception, they inspire each other there that it has a nature. It's really expensive to read all this. However, the krona is still very proud of the particular degree of transparency that is being exercised on this ministry day in and day out. I've tried to tarnish how often that word occurs. It's \"transparent\" here and \"transparent\" there. It goes from somewhere to nowhere, but when the word \"transparent\" falls, it seems to fall into good ground. That word passes through in the midst of all this woeful policy jargon so often, you'd think it had to cover something up. Perhaps a lack of transparency, because nowhere in these reports do you find that openness in this ministry has been forced to do so because of the WOB and because of the threat of interim measures. That's what opened the doors. The past year was not characterised by spontaneous transparent behaviour and the expression of frankness, also towards this house, on the part of this ministry. But in any case, transparency is a priority. However, I would like to give some clarification on this transparency. I think it's time for a state-of-the-art moment. We must also look at the situation with regard to the rule of law in the Netherlands, especially where politics can be held responsible for certain matters. I call it the Wilders Process. I'd like to have an update on that from the D.A.'s office. Because the Ministry's involvement in the course of that process has proved to be rather obvious, and that is something that the government and the Minister of Justice have to look at. I'd say it's time to get rid of some dirt. This has proved to be a political process. It deserves our attention in this house. We must be able to confront the Minister with the course of this matter, as it is now taking place. There's still time, because the trial's still going on. This has clearly proved to be a political process. This is the biggest miscarriage, one of the biggest miscarriages, you can say, in the modern Dutch criminal history. It is unworthy of a defenceable rule of law. I'm giving an update on my side. The declarations had already been set up and facilitated by the public authorities. The parade: in columns. Rulers first, wallowing in self-esteem. Declaration offices were open until late hours. Pre-printed declaration paper ashes were already ready. The ordinary citizen who wants to go to the police station with his broken car window looks out his eyes when he reads this report. The desks were open until extra late in the evening. Well, why don't you get over that? It was lacking that Claudia de Breij accompanied the parades musically. The choice of persecution has also proved to be clearly political. The PvdA politicians of any stature Spekman and Samsom have escaped the dance. While Wilders merely demographically expressed a wish, \"less, less,\" \"more, more,\" it was Mr Spekman who said that you should humiliate Moroccans, because that would be the only thing that helps in that particular, Moroccan, environment. Mr. Samsom made it even furier. He said that the Moroccans by their genes, their genetic build-up, are simply destined to end up higher on the crime ladder. That's a big deal. Those are really racist insulting remarks. That's a lot different than \"more, more\" and \"less, less.\" This is why I would remind you that the Ministry of Justice has indeed acted as a driving force in this prosecution. That M.O. didn't come out. This has not come out in the way of spontaneous transparency. RTL documents were responsible for this. What happened from the Ministry? That's for sure now. It's just... it's just... it's just... it's If you now look back on that ongoing process from the point of view of the situation, you have to include this. Those documents contain a document dated 16 September 2014. In it, ministry officials discuss the conduct of the process. They're discussing the possible defense defense defense defense defenses. Then one official says to another: I will pass on the points you mention to the colleague of the prosecution. Straight from the Ministry to the D.A.'s office. Then Minister Opstelten receives a notice of office from the D.A. which also mentions the names Spekman and Samsom. For they already see the mood hanging: if Samsom or Spekman is called from the side of the defense, that is not pleasant. In that draft notice from the D.A.'s office, those names do appear. And then what happens? Those names are brushed away after consultation of Bolhaar and an official of the Ministry. The official doesn't think it's useful to leave it in there, because that's what the defense is up to. Well, what else do you want? Then it goes on with ministry officials e-mailing each other. And what do they say? They say they'd like to see the officer's requisition in the Wilders trial in advance. They'd like it in advance. Because, they say, \"then you and X can\" \"that will also be an official; you don't know \"fleetmen and where useful comments pass\" to the state attorney, of course. How do you want it? I know the trial's still going on. The judge can do anything with it. But what I would be so happy about is if this minister, with this information, with which he can work, and with the understanding that he can obtain this data, could come to the understanding that it can no longer be done and that he must do something about it. I'll make an appeal to the Minister. He's got clean hands. He has nothing to do with this conspiracy, to put it that way. They're his predecessors. He can be dragged into it if there is a lot to cover up again.You never know that and then he has become responsible. But with the conspiracy I'm talking about, this minister has nothing to do with it. I'd say brush away this shame stain. This persecution does not serve any purpose, is totally inappropriate. So what can the Minister do? That's the question. Now to the D.A., to his D.A., to the attorney general in question, say, \"Stop this. Pray your own inadmissibility. Then we will see what the judge does with it, but at least an act of satisfaction has been made from this government: the matter as it was at the time does not deserve a beauty prize.\""}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-20-tweedekamer-8.u285", "speech text": "That's why I also said \"generalizing\" and \"without the good ones.\" I know a lot of good Chinese too. Those are decent people, and they will never mistreat an animal or a human being. But that's not the point. We're not here to compliment you. We're here to take care of the bastards. If I have to compliment myself, hundreds of hours of speaking time are not enough. It's about the bastards. Often that is a minority, but they do need to be dealt with. I want the Secretary of State to send a signal from her department, too. You shouldn't always throw everything off at the State Department. Trade missions are being carried out and this Secretary of State is also involved. That's where it has to be said: boys, cut it out. I say that as an animal ambassador. It's awful how they deal with animals there. That's too scandalous for words. You don't treat the biggest criminal like that, let alone a defenseless animal. It's unlikely you can do that at all. But I want those signals sent out."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-21-tweedekamer-11.u103", "speech text": "They weren't old; they were young. And as a group of hyenas, they went off on a defenseless victim. Terrible images. I don't want to wait for a debate. We'll have the Justice and Security budget after this. We too have a lot of questions about this. I would really like to have the debate today. So no support for a separate debate, because we are going to talk about it in half an hour."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-21-tweedekamer-12.u118", "speech text": "Then there's a question. The minister praises cybersecurity. I think this is justified. The Dutch cybersecurity is so celebrated that I only read in a book that the Dutch simply manage to watch daily with a security camera from one of the most secure locations of the Russian secret service. Chapeau before that. Of course, cybersecurity must not become a political cover in order to stop talking about terrorism here in the Chamber during the budgetary procedure, because that is what we have now achieved with the handfulness of the Minister. That's why I'm asking. The first line of defence is always: it's individual cases. The second line of defense is that it's under the judge. So the third is: the cover-up under cyber security. This is done in order not to talk about terrorism, the terror and the jihad that flood us. Isn't the fact that the day before yesterday, those two people should be called Dutch? Women with two children have arrived in the Netherlands. They were put on a plane by Erdogan, escorted by the police and ended up here. This cabinet continues to exacerbate the terrorist threat and threatens the security of the Netherlands. I made this clear in my first term and explained it clearly. Why doesn't the Minister send these women back to Erdogan and ensure that none of these collaborators get into the Netherlands anymore? That is the question that bothers the Netherlands when it comes to safety. Cyber security is fine, but it's about the next question. Why does the Minister allow people on Dutch soil, sent by Erdogan, to destroy security here?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-21-tweedekamer-12.u496", "speech text": "Mr. Chairman. Normally, you thank the Minister for answering the questions, but I'm not gonna do that. The Minister began with a long introduction in which the subject of bullying was raised rather than the repeated cry of the four police unions this morning. Then the minister turned around to say that he had spoken with the chief of police, the unions and the mayors, suggesting that they agree with his policy and denying that they are faced with a fact: the limited police capacity. Then came the defense I'm not going over that, but then come up with a separate team, which even demands, following the murder of attorney Wiersum. The bottom line was hiding behind the budgetary rules. For the first time, as a Chamber, we heard the demand for structural money for the police as an answer that this can only be done in the spring. Mr. Chairman. I thought it was shocking. Such a minister would give you a week's work at Bureau Burgwallen, but without support and without knowing whether your colleague is still here tomorrow, or whether he or she has succumbed under the pressure of work and is sick at home. Or as an agent told me: \"I'm on more than 300 leave hours, but I already know that I can't take leave on Christmas and the New Year's Eve. By 2020, all engagements were withdrawn because of the many events, including the song festival. Mr. Chairman. Who can or wants to work like this? Cops never give up, but now they and masse say they're down below crepe strength. Not through the ice, but under the crepe strength. The absenteeism is unprecedented. That is what we, the politicians, are responsible for. We have to solve that, too. As long as my party doesn't have 76 seats, I have to appeal to the Minister for that. That's what I did with the question: what tasks are going to be taken off? Answer: no tasks will go off. I wonder whether the Minister will continue to do so until the union ultimatum expires on 1 January 2020. Mr. Chairman. I asked for structural money for the police. That's not gonna happen, except for 25 million for vice detectives and the Alien Police, Identification and Trafficking. I asked for appreciation for the police officers. In that context, I asked for two things. Firstly, the purchase of long-term PTSS files, which were clear that the agents would no longer return to the workplace. I didn't get an answer to that, except the killer that PTSS is a terrible disease. Secondly, I asked the Minister to bring the police officers under the workings of the Veterans Act, as the much-needed knowledge, skills and expertise are already clearly regulated. I have motivated that extensively, but the answer was unfortunately: \"There is currently no reason to bring police officers under the Veterans' Act. Then my question is: when? In advance of that, I will file the next motion. [[Motion]] [[The Chamber,]] [[heard the debate,]] [[believes that police officers at risk for their own lives are ensuring safety in the Netherlands, with their work becoming increasingly difficult due to the increasing social threat and workload;]] [[considers that they are entitled to comparable care and rights as laid down for the military in the Veterans Act;]] [[calls on the Government to amend the Veterans Act in such a way that police officers are also covered by that Act,]] [[and goes to the order of the day.]] [[This motion has been proposed by Mr Helder. It seems to me that their submission is sufficiently supported.]] [[She's getting No. kst-35300-VI-26]]"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-26-tweedekamer-24.u209", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. It is good to take stock after two years of Rutte III. Also with this minister, because this minister, together with the coalition parties and the Chamber, has, of course, had some challenges and also set some priorities when it comes to tackling the root causes of migration. This Minister, with the support of the coalition, has freed up a great many millions more. The Minister also pays a great deal of attention to fair trade. Admittedly, the policy has been pursued by the previous Minister for Development Cooperation with her covenant policy, but this Minister has done it well. Progress has been made on the issue of these covenants. The third point that this Minister is paying attention to is to stand up for girls and women. I can only summarize it; she can, of course, put it much better herself. Mr. Chairman. Those three spearheads have always embraced my party. It's not for nothing that they also come from the coalition agreement. I will therefore focus on these three points. I shall begin by saying that development cooperation with trade has perhaps never been so important. We are dealing with the gap between rich and poor, as Mrs Van den Hul pointed out. We're dealing with connections between continents. People no longer needlessly wait for what their future looks like, but take steps to see if they can work on a better future, triggering migration. All this shows the need to better support people in the region themselves and to work fully on the trade agenda. Mr. Chairman. The policy paper is also called Investing in Perspectives for a reason. It is therefore also good to look not only at how we can control migration to Europe, but also at how we can offer people prospects, especially the prospect of a decent life. That is why we need that help and that trade. That is why I will support what my colleagues Kuik and Bouali have said. In addition to the trade agenda, we must also be able to invest in development cooperation, especially at this time. The 0.7 remains the ambition of the Christian Union, and I understand that of the CDA and D66. A resolution on this was adopted at the CDA Congress. We're gonna keep pushing that 0.7 hard. But I also ask the Minister what she could do to take an extra step, for example in the spring note, to make an extra investment for those who need it so badly, as her colleague in the defence sector. Mr. Chairman. Of course, we are not here with this help, because it must also be accompanied by the commitment of our Dutch industry, the business community there. We set up the DGGF a few years ago to see if we could stimulate our business, the business community there. Four years ago, we set up projects for the Addressing Root Causes in the migration countries, the so-called ARC programme. I have a question about that right away. The ARC programme will expire in 2021. What are the Minister's plans after 2021? Is ARC coming back in another form, or are we actually getting the challenge fund for that? I am talking about a challenge fund that also seeks the combination of both business and NGOs and science. This is about how we can tackle the causes of migration in the countries of migration. It is also about how to give young people, in particular, perspective and job opportunities. The CDA and the Christian Union have tabled a motion on how we could possibly give that challenge fund direction. I have the following questions about that. To what extent is this fund really going to reach those migrantable young people? How can we give them perspective and job opportunities, for example through market-relevant training, entrepreneurship training and micro-business? I'd like a response. How attractive will it be for companies to step in, given the obligation to put their own resources in for two thirds? This applies to business and, I believe, to NGOs as well. Isn't that bar a little too high? Of course we are looking for the combination between audience and private, but this seems to me to be a big threshold. When will the Minister provide the first concrete results from the challenge fund in Uganda? It has yet to start, but I am very curious to see what these first developments are like. Then with regard to imvo. We have just discussed it with our colleagues. The IOB recommends that we be informed about the legislative initiatives in other countries in Europe and that we see whether there are legislative pathways too. France is at the forefront of this and in England they are also at the forefront of what we could take on elements of. The aim should not be to undo agreements with industry, but to see if we can come to legislation on soil in relation to business, a kind of level playing field. How does the Minister see this IOB advice when it comes to making legislation complementary to the covenants for corporate social responsibility? I'd like to hear her response on that point. Mr. Chairman. I come to the most vulnerable. I shall be the first to mention the refugees. The flow of refugees and the number of refugees over 70 million people have never been so high. It hurts me that we have EUR 70 million, and I believe that Mrs Van den Hul has already mentioned this, going to EUR 60 million for the Dutch Relief Alliance, the collaboration of Dutch organisations working for emergency aid and for refugees. Does the Minister see any chance of adding to that amount of 70 million, which was already exhausted three weeks ago? Mr. Chairman. When it comes to child prostitution, my heart breaks. I think sexual abuse is the worst thing that can happen to a child. When it comes to how and in what form I am not going to mention the examples of this, these defenseless children are the victims of sometimes even their own father and mother, who sell them to brothels and bets for webcam sex, they can't get worse. 3 million children suffer from this every year. I would urge the Minister to press ahead with the most successful programme to date, Down to Zero, which was launched four years ago, so as not to undermine the results that have now been achieved in these vulnerable children and to ensure that they are followed up. I'm considering a motion on that point. Mr. Chairman. Then when it comes to the most vulnerable: the refugees. I already mentioned them. I'm thinking about Lesbos again. We have once again seen the images of the appalling situation there and we have seen how new plans are on the way to transform the shelter camps into closed camps. What influence will that have on people's living conditions? Winter's coming. We have previously adopted a motion, namely the Groothuizen/Voordewind motion, to see what we can do. I know the standard answers that Brussels has already given enough money and that it is mainly stuck in Athens, but what can this Minister do to carry out that motion and to do something for the winter programme for these people? Mr. Chairman. Then there are two or three small elements, because I see that my time is fast. The terrorist bonus. I am pleased that the Minister is carrying out the motion tabled last year by Mr Van Haga and myself. However, I would ask her to press on with other European countries if they would take the same step as the Netherlands to ensure that there really is a push from Europe towards the Palestinian Authority to stop doing so. Mr. Chairman. Finally, the reconciliation projects. Is the Minister prepared to continue to develop the peace of the bottom up of these successful reconciliation projects? The coalition agreement also points to this. That's it, Mr. Chairman. Thank you."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-27-tweedekamer-10.u8", "speech text": "I see that the coalition, through the VVD colleague, has prepared the defense well. There is now a reference to the fact that research has been carried out and that this has been shared with the Chamber. Yeah, we're aware of that. But I'm referring to something completely different. This information came a long way after the decision was taken to extend this mission. This was about the outcome of the D.A.'s investigation. I'm talking about information that was available to the Cabinet about 70 to 170 deaths that would have occurred in Hawija daily before this mission was extended. That's when we were here at the Interrupt Microphone? No, we weren't here then, because we didn't have that information."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-27-tweedekamer-10.u40", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. \"So that we will never forget\": it stands on numerous Dutch war monuments and it is the motto of countless commemorations of the horrors of war. War is always horrible: for the people who are sent by government and cabinet to do difficult and traumatic work in which their own lives are at stake, and for the people who can become victims of it. For civilian casualties, too. But \"so that we will never forget\" does not seem to apply to the Prime Minister. Try to imagine, visualize it. The minister's predecessor informs the Prime Minister in a \"non-alarming tone\" of the possibility of civilian deaths in a bombing by the Dutch F-16 on Hawija. So \"non-alarming\" that it goes in one ear and out the other ear. Foreign media talked about dozens of civilian deaths, but the Foreign Ministers and the Prime Minister were apparently not interested in an area where the Netherlands flew fighters. Without context, the message might have been easier to digest, because the truth is always the first victim in a war. There are things we shouldn't forget. One day after the attack on an IS bomb factory, foreign media reported dozens of victims. The U.S. Supreme Command found it \"believable\" that civilian casualties had occurred. But the reality of the Hague was that the minister of defense's predecessor in the debate with the House of Representatives said that \"we had to establish that there was no collateral damage,\" and that the Prime Minister was informed by former Minister Hennis, but \"not alarming.\" In which universe is hearing the word \"citizens\" in relation to your own mission, which you have tried to sell in this Chamber as necessary and necessary to protect citizens \"non-alarming,\" I ask the Prime Minister. I ask the VVD, who, in the previous debate, wondered out loud how well the political antenna was tuned to the Ministry of Defence, how well the political antenna of her own Prime Minister is set, if you do not take the opportunity of civilian deaths as a result of a mission that you yourself have proposed and commissioned. Mr. Chairman. Another truth we should not forget is that the bombing has left a ruin. Dozens of people have been killed or lost everything: their family, their home and their stuff. In The Hague it is called: no procedural mistakes have been made. And so neither the D.A. saw any reason to start a follow-up investigation. Apparently, the right button was pressed at the right time: a bombardment by the book. However, this does not relieve the cabinet of the obligation to start independent research. Why didn't that happen right away, and why still not? Mr. Chairman. Another painful truth we must not forget is that people have been injured. A man is wounded in the bombing of Hawija. His house and shop are being destroyed. He now lives in the Netherlands with his son, who became half blind during the attack, but his old house is still in ruins. The reality of the Hague is that, to this day, no penny has been paid to the victims and no immediate thought has been given to whether or not a bell has ringed, that if we are responsible for this, we must get the hell out of our way to help these people. Mr. Chairman. The events surrounding this bombing mainly show that the cabinet has lived in its own reality. There is no excuse for not fully informing the Chamber and there is no excuse for not compensating the victims and not conducting an investigation. Only after the press has gotten this case out, the Secretary of Defense is starting to think about compensation. It's too late. \"So that we will never forget\" seems to have become a motto for this cabinet that means \"we never want to take any real responsibility.\" As far as the Party for Animals is concerned, there is no excuse for that."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-27-tweedekamer-10.u547", "speech text": "No, no, no, no, no. I'm not getting everything mixed up here. This is about one and the same case. The Prime Minister can't take no for an answer, but this is about the attack on Hawija. This is about the civilian casualties that fell there. Subsequently, there have been various forms of involvement of directors. Coincidentally, all those rulers have no memory of what happened there. This is a line of defense. This might just save you today and keep the support of the coalition and perhaps even part of the opposition. But it's not credible. I'll stick with that."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-11-28-tweedekamer-10.u130", "speech text": "That standard defense line of \"shaving people in one place\" doesn't cover the load and doesn't work anymore. That's not the point. What matters is that all those people who experience insecurity, who experience insecurity as a result of mass immigration and thus diversity. I said last week in the WHO that it is not SGP young people who practice pool terror. We know where they came from. We know what the backgrounds are. We also know from prison psychology, from Mr Sennels from Copenhagen, that this has a link with Islamic education. We see in Gorinchem where that leads. I am not saying that all Turkish people in Gorinchem are bad, but I am saying that the concentration is not good, that it is too much for the Dutch and that there is racist violence towards native Dutch people as a result of the diversity policy and its promotion. That's a fact of life. That's the fact of life. The Minister says that we want to conduct policies and deal with them well. Then I say: protect our leitkultur, said in Dutch, and talk to the victim of the week. But then I don't hear the Minister. No, but if there's anything else going on, he's first in the mosque."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-02-eerstekamer-3.u104", "speech text": "Your question was why we chose this as a defense at all. In return, I indicated why we decided in 2012 that Nieuw-Miligen is not really a suitable location. That really had to do with radar coverage. What then happened in the process is that the energy agreement was added in the course of the previous cabinet. Then, per province, we looked at where we can make windmills on land and at sea; although the discussion per province was mainly about windmills on land. This argument was also relevant. If the radar were to remain in New Mills, the wind farms in Flevoland would no longer be able to operate because of the disruption of the radar. Speaking of Defense, that's what I'm standing for and what you've been asking me about. This was the primary reason and reason. In addition, all the plans in the last period of time have, of course, become an explicit argument, because we now have to take this into account. Plans and agreements have been made with Flevoland and there is now a lot of work to be done to implement them. This is also a fact now. Only that wasn't the primary reason to say: we're leaving New Mills. I think it is important to emphasise that. That was added later to the Energy Agreement. Mr. Ganzevoort asked why the search area is so small. So that has something to do with the deed. It's still happening now. It's all calculated. It really works through a funnel. We have first established the policy frameworks and then we will continue to calculate them. I have just indicated to you that high-rise buildings, windmills and such like can have a disruptive effect. It's always about calculating whether it's acceptable, yes or no. That is always the balance that is being made. Mr Koole asked for Zeeland and Mr Ganzevoort asked for Limburg. It is not possible to fully cover the Netherlands with two radars. You have to go 400 kilometers up and 180 kilometers above the North Sea. If you would like to cover the Netherlands completely, you should have a few more radars. In view of the fact that we are having this discussion, I do not have the idea that the Netherlands can't wait if I come up with the request to place some more radars. That means we have to take care of it differently. At high altitude we have cover, but the vulnerability remains in those areas that you yourself have seen. That is where we are more vulnerable, and we are trying with our neighbouring countries to give substance to Belgium and Germany. But in that we depend on their cooperation. If they say \"we don't feel like it for a while and turn off our own radar,\" then we have to deal with it."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-03-eerstekamer-3.u67", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Thank you also for the contribution to the second term. This time, in view of the confusion last night, I will also pronounce Mrs Teunissen's name correctly. I see that Mr Nicola\u00ef is here. It does indicate how well the Group of the Party of Animals is working together, if everyone can be spokesperson on this dossier. Perhaps it is right to point out that in your contributions, both last night and this morning, you have all indicated how important you think it is to be careful and sound in the investigations that are being carried out. Mr Van Dijk spoke about guarantees, Mr Koole asked for them again, as did Mr Ganzevoort. Actually, you all said that's important. I believe that the discussion last night focused on the need for the national coordination system. I thought Mr Rietkerk put it well in relation to the Spatial Planning Act. The question now before the First Chamber is whether, on the basis of an appeal to the national interest, I may declare the national coordination system applicable. I've reported to you why that is. Mr Van Dijk asked how it could have come to this. About the state of defense and about what it takes to get the DOD back in order, we can set up a whole tree with each other; I think we'll still be at it tonight. But that is why we call on the state coordination scheme, also because the municipality of West Betuwe has indicated that we no longer want to start a zoning procedure. The question remains as to whether, as a cabinet, we still believe that Herwijnen is the right location. We have replied yes to that, and that is why we have set up the national coordination system. There are concerns. The municipality of West Betuwe has written me a clear letter containing two concerns, namely health and cumulative effects, and research into alternatives. Mrs Moonen asked for a reflection on this. I think we treated this with each other last night, too. I have indicated to you that some things in the process could have been better. Why not investigate alternatives directly on 1 January? This also has to do with the reclassification of the municipality. You can all form your opinion on this afterwards, but sometimes things run the way they do. The meeting with the municipality of Lingewaal was held in December last year. Then it was time for a new municipal board to form a college and the like. It took a while. But there was also some delay on our part. I agree with you that it might have been possible to do so more quickly. Then I will deal with the specific questions that have been asked. Mr Dessing was clear about the conditions set by the Forum for Democracy Group, including sound and careful investigations. Mr Janssen expressed his opinion on this matter on behalf of the SP Group. He specifically asked what TNO takes into account. We talked about that last night. In principle, TNO validated the first Thale report in 2012. You can also find that online. Following his own radar on his own site in Hengelo, Thales has again made measurements to see if the manufacturing data corresponds to the practice. The latest data will be used. Mr Koole or anyone else, I believe Mr Dessing asked yesterday whether the measurement data in Wier could be included. Not at the moment, because the radar station in Wier still has to be built. Also in Herwijnen, when the radar is placed there, measurements will be made to see if the radiation meets the existing standards. If there are new data from the Thale report that can be validated by TNO, then of course I will also look into it. You have found Thales' latest validation this year. TNO will involve them in the investigation of cumulative effects."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-03-tweedekamer-58.u114", "speech text": "I think that's an excellent suggestion. So I'd like to take it with me. I am going to make it even more beautiful: I would also like to say to Mr Bruins and to all the Members who have asked questions on this subject that, of course, this also lends itself to an evaluation. This is also terra incognita. We must therefore look back at some point and see what has happened on this particular and sensitive subject. Mr. Chairman. Mr Ronnes asked if I would be prepared to make clear what registers exist and what information is collected in them. I'd be happy to. Moreover, in all new sources of information, the starting point is that the different interests are well balanced, and I would like to stress once again the privacy aspects. Then Mr Ronnes asked how long the remark \"in research\" will remain in the register when a return notification is made. That depends a little on the nature of the callback. This includes, for example, whether additional information should be requested. But a simple feedback can of course also be processed very quickly. Mr. Chairman. Mr Alkaya asked whether there was also a duty for tax advisers and what is the situation. Tax advisors are also Wwft institutions. In this context, they are obliged to conduct customer research and also to establish the UBO. This also means that they are obliged to report back if they discover discrepancies. Mr Alkaya also asked whether the 25% limit should not be lowered. That question was actually somewhat along the lines of what Mr Nijboer said. My first line of defense would be next. We have now applied this 25% limit in all the Member States. That also makes sense from an international point of view. But I understand the questioners quite frankly, because I am also afraid of cutting on such a subject. So I would like to stick to that border now, but I would like to agree with the Chamber right now that we will take this right away in the evaluation or, if we have signals earlier that there will be a cut, we will follow Mr Alkaya's suggestion and Mr Nijboer's suggestion and then we will simply make an adjustment. Because I think they are quite right to say: this is one of those cat-and-mouse possibilities that you may have to close up again."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-03-tweedekamer-59.u114", "speech text": "I think that's an excellent suggestion. So I'd like to take it with me. I am going to make it even more beautiful: I would also like to say to Mr Bruins and to all the Members who have asked questions on this subject that, of course, this also lends itself to an evaluation. This is also terra incognita. We must therefore look back at some point and see what has happened on this particular and sensitive subject. Mr. Chairman. Mr Ronnes asked if I would be prepared to make clear what registers exist and what information is collected in them. I'd be happy to. Moreover, in all new sources of information, the starting point is that the different interests are well balanced, and I would like to stress once again the privacy aspects. Then Mr Ronnes asked how long the remark \"in research\" will remain in the register when a return notification is made. That depends a little on the nature of the callback. This includes, for example, whether additional information should be requested. But a simple feedback can of course also be processed very quickly. Mr. Chairman. Mr Alkaya asked whether there was also a duty for tax advisers and what is the situation. Tax advisors are also Wwft institutions. In this context, they are obliged to conduct customer research and also to establish the UBO. This also means that they are obliged to report back if they discover discrepancies. Mr Alkaya also asked whether the 25% limit should not be lowered. That question was actually somewhat along the lines of what Mr Nijboer said. My first line of defense would be next. We have now applied this 25% limit in all the Member States. That also makes sense from an international point of view. But I understand the questioners quite frankly, because I am also afraid of cutting on such a subject. So I would like to stick to that border now, but I would like to agree with the Chamber right now that we will take this right away in the evaluation or, if we have signals earlier that there will be a cut, we will follow Mr Alkaya's suggestion and Mr Nijboer's suggestion and then we will simply make an adjustment. Because I think they are quite right to say: this is one of those cat-and-mouse possibilities that you may have to close up again."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-04-tweedekamer-3.u144", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. Lives have been ruined, destroyed, without explanation. Without a fair chance of defense, childcare allowances were suddenly discontinued and recovered up to years. Parents were thrown into deep misery. On average, they had to repay thousands of euros, but also tens of thousands of euros. I talked to a lot of duped this morning. They are also sitting in the gallery today. Someone even had to pay back over a ton. That's inhumane. They were labeled and labeled as fraud without being able to defend themselves properly and provide evidence of their innocence. These parents were all these years, until today, completely without a chance against the powerful Tax Administration. Their salary has been and is being taken away today, it is being seized, jobs have been cancelled, houses have been emptied, marriages and relationships have been disrupted. Children who suffer terribly from their parents' stress and financial problems, no holidays, no presents, sometimes no food. From a small point of view, they know nothing but that there is poverty in the family, shame, distress. No money to go to the hospital. I spoke to a mother this morning, a gentle woman who was in tears. A lot of MPs didn't keep it dry and I certainly didn't. She's a kidney patient, waiting for a donor kidney. She had to cancel the appointment because she didn't have the money to go to the hospital. A strong woman, fighting to get her life back, fighting for her child. But no matter how hard people fight, IRS seems to be omnipotent. The IRS decides on people's lives. People's lives that stand still for years. People have completely lost confidence in government, politics and, in some cases, even in people in general, because of officials and this Secretary of State. What's it supposed to feel like if you're being thrown away by a government agency as a fraud, but you don't know why? That you have to prove your own innocence and drag the government back to see how you struggle? That you are being ethnically profiled, is the presumption, because the gut feeling of politics has its impact on the humanity of the civil servants? Institutional bias. Strict, tighter, tighter. Mr. Chairman. As Mr Omtzigt, Mrs Leijten and Mr Azarkan, passionate colleagues have been pulling everything out of the box for years. They show true representatives of the people. A lot of respect for that. I therefore wholeheartedly support their argument. I am not here as a financial expert, I am not a member of the Finance Committee, but I am here as a Member of Parliament, representing all the people who are watching this debate today and wondering whether there is still a sense of responsibility. Last week the news came out that a coalition partner wants to investigate the possibilities of a criminal investigation. A parliamentary interrogation is also suggested. I will wholeheartedly support all the initiatives in this direction, because all these people deserve, in addition to excuses and generous compensation, real justice at last. Thank you, Mr President."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-04-tweedekamer-6.u337", "speech text": "Quite a bit happened earlier, Mr. Chairman. The Secretary of State thought he'd come up with a solution: you can call the Tax Phone. Those parents have been doing that for three weeks for their file. They started laughing like hell. The Secretary of State didn't even realize what was happening. The gap between policies, intentions, and what is felt, was visible and palpable here. It was embarrassing. Mr. Chairman. We are talking about a government that, for years, wrongly gives people the stamp \"frauder,\" which leaves people in bitter misery for years and does not protect people, but makes them defenseless. We're not talking about a commercial company that wants to make a profit; no, we're talking about a government. This is enough to assume political responsibility. There has been political failure in recent years. There have been several times when it has been found to be disproportionate, but no political steps have been taken. Much suffering could have been avoided. Today, in the debate, it appeared that there had been a solution earlier if the Secretary of State had asked in September last year or in March this year when he answered Mr Omtzigt's questions and wanted to know what had happened. Today I still do not have sufficient information on the size of the families affected. I have no idea today of the solution to carry out the controlling task I have and to assess whether what the Secretary of State is proposing is enough and meets the great injustice that is taking place here. Mr. Chairman. The worst thing I think is that I had begun to think that this important day was not used for a solution for the people who sit here and follow it at home. Which means there's nothing I can do but file the next motion. [[Motion]] [[The Chamber,]] [[heard the debate,]] [[declares confidence in the Secretary of State,]] [[and goes to the order of the day.]] [[This motion was tabled by Mr Leijten, Mr Azarkan and Mr Van Kooten-Arissen. It seems to me that their submission is sufficiently supported.]] [[She's getting No. kst-31066-553]]"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-10-tweedekamer-32.u185", "speech text": "D66 gives the Prime Minister an inadequate policy today and also says that he has a stupid strategy, especially on how much modernisation you are achieving. My question to the Prime Minister would be: is this, in his view, sufficient modernisation? Then you can say that it is a general view of D66, but it was not a general view; it was a view in this debate. If there's no better defense, I'm inclined to think D66's right. If this is the whole ambition, then that budget will be... Yes, there is modernisation in the Finnish proposal, but we want more from the Netherlands, don't we?"}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-12-tweedekamer-17.u46", "speech text": "In defense of the Minister. One of my amendments is on this subject, so I can also imagine that it will be dealt with."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-16-eerstekamer-5.u3", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr President. I would like to begin by congratulating Mrs Kluit and Mr Van Pareren for their wonderful maiden speeches and, in advance, wishing Mrs Nanninga, who will be making her maiden speech, all the best. Mr. Chairman. Good thing we can still provide input to the defense budget from our home. There is a lack of sense of urgency, both in the cabinet and in the Lower House. As you know, I've been up close with the cuts in Defense over the past three decades. Up close, I've seen the catastrophic effect of it. Unfortunately, in this beautiful house we talk about that very minimally, but the state of Defense is downright lousy. Despite a great deal of internal criticism, there has been uncompromising cuts and, as she herself says, the organization has failed through her hooves. It takes years and years and requires a lot of sacrifices, before this can be restored and the Netherlands takes back its responsibility in the field of security. For decades, there has been roofing on staff, equipment, practice, infrastructure, ICT, logistics and so on. Mr President, I shall be brief. Of course, our NATO partners have not escaped the image of our Defence Organisation. We're regularly reminded of it. In 2008, NATO typified our military as \"an anorexia patient\" and since 2012 the characterization \"paria\" has been used. A rich country that does not fulfil its obligations and neglects its own defence organization: something of that is found, in all kinds of fora, but also within our society. Also within the Defence Department there are also employees who leave early. Despite reasonable recruitment results, there are almost 8,500 vacancies. And this figure is getting up. It's often not the worst that leaves. A few hundred vacancies are filled per military unit by people who have long been retired. The loyalty of those people to the Defense Department is so great that after 30, 40 years they still want to help their parate colleagues. An unspeakable image has emerged of an organization that has to radiate force, youthful enthusiasm and confidence in itself. One of the austerity measures still continuing with the Defence Department is the RVU fine, which has been designated as a pre-pension scheme by the functional retirement from the Military Civil Service Act under pressure from the austerity measures for several years. But it's not. It happened when people involved had no choice at the time. They had to leave and the organization had to pay, and still has to pay, an annual fine. A feeble objection is not enough for the Forum for Democracy, as Defense now does after the Kerstens motion. The Ministry of Finance makes a budget for Defense free by one hand. That amount sounds very tough. But with the other hand simply takes back the money and the fine. Of course, our allies can see that, too. This has to stop. In fact, this has to be repaired in the forthcoming Spring Note and with retroactive effect. The House of Representatives recently discussed this in the budget debate. The Christmas Movement of the PvdA has been held: again neither meat nor fish, or sense of urgency. My group may therefore table a motion for a resolution on this matter in the second term. As a Chamber, let us be absolutely clear about this and say to ourselves: Defence has respected the law and has now adapted the RVU regime. What remains and what remains for us as a Chamber is to repair this injustice about the interim phase with retroactive effect and to do what we promised in Wales. The restitution of this unjustly levied fine will help the Defence Department in particular to resolve the major personnel problems. There are still many cases to be resolved, such as the new pay house and the corresponding allowance system. From this house, we can help the minister, in this case the stasis, in a relatively simple way. There are still many billions on the shelf of overdue infrastructure maintenance, ICT, combat support and many other areas. Finally, Mr President. This puts an end to a needlessly pumping around of money and making it shady about how much money is actually being spent on Defense. Moreover, the Dutch contribution to his own security and that of his allies is increasing. We are all responsible for this. Thank you, Mr President."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-16-eerstekamer-5.u5", "speech text": "Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Thank you also to Mr Beuker, who also speaks from his previous position from a close commitment. I don't think you're the only one in this room who knows an involvement in Defense, whether it's because of a direct job in the past or because of friends or family working for Defense. In addition, you will see people here on a daily basis who will ensure that you can do your job safely here. We do this 24/7, every day of the year, not only in the Netherlands but everywhere in the world. I fully endorse the appreciation you have just expressed for the military. You're right to point out that Defense has to come a long way and that over the last few years, it's been cut down a lot. I think I can speak on behalf of the entire Defence Organization. But we also see that with the start of this cabinet, the first prospects have also emerged, by investing extra money. The Minister and I always say that the 1.5 billion is a good first step, but it is not enough yet. Fortunately, we have been given extra structural money in the Spring paper. We continue to work to ensure that Defense grows to the agreements we have made, especially from the perspective that the organization so needs it, and not because someone else says it. It is about the real estate, so that the army buildings are in order, about the combat suits or the necessary equipment, but also about the renewal of personnel policy. We now have a wage building dating from 1917. A state committee set that up at the time. He said, the older you get, the more expenses you have, so you earn more salary. That no longer fits in with the principles that we now know and what generations want, namely that you are rewarded for what you do and for the responsibilities you have. We are therefore facing a major challenge. Mr. Chairman. I have some doubts about what Mr Beuker has just said. Mr Beuker argued that we should focus on an adaptation of the Wage Tax Act, because applying the RVU tax is a tax measure. I think you spoke with my colleague, the Secretary of State for Finance, this morning. This is about who it applies to. I don't recognize that there's no urgency in the House of Representatives. Not only Mr Kerstens, but also former CDA member Mrs Bruins Slot and Mr Bosman have tabled a motion on the RVU levy. It was just adopted by the Chamber, too. Unfortunately, last week, the tax inspector gave me the decision on objections. It's been rejected. This means that the tax authorities say that this is indeed covered by early retirement. You saw that I didn't object for nothing. I'm going to see what the tax inspector's verdict is and consider what this means. I'm gonna see what follow-up steps are still possible. I recognize what Mr Beuker said, that more is needed for the defense. I have also indicated to you that this cabinet is investing extra and that we are continuing our efforts to ensure that the defense is put in order. But that will go in steps. We cannot do that at once, but we are preparing for the next steps to improve everything that needs to be done within the Defense Department. That's pretty big."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-16-eerstekamer-5.u8", "speech text": "It's not a defense bill. That's what I told you. It's the Pay Tax Act. You just discussed it here in your room. It is a consequence of social affairs legislation. We in the Defence Department have indicated that the legislation on military matters is still from the 1960s. At that time, the legislator indicated that military workers were obliged to retire earlier because of the exercise of their duties. We have also submitted this to the tax inspector, to see what that means. It has now returned something to us and indicates that it does not agree with our reasoning. I've just informed you that I'm going to think about that. What does this mean? What steps can the Department of Defense possibly take? But if you want the legislation to be amended, I would like to call on you to have this discussion together with the colleagues in the Finance and Social Affairs Committee, because that is what the legislation, the RVU tax, is based on."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-18-tweedekamer-16.u122", "speech text": "When you hear the minister, it looks like I've been chanting for more defense expenses. My question was a different one after all. It seems that there are occasional resources going to the Defense Department and that they are being used for structural matters, such as software licences and the replenishment of stocks. On the contrary, I would like to avoid the occasional increase in money being made to Defence because it is now being used to undertake multiannual commitments. I ask the Minister if he agrees with me."}, {"speech id": "ParlaMint-NL_2019-12-19-tweedekamer-44.u10", "speech text": "I'm not going to hold the motion because the motion calls for an investigation. It may well be that the Minister is going to consult with his colleague in the defense and that he says \"it can't be\" with the arguments that the VVD just mentioned. But everyone is calling for solutions to be devised to solve the problem in the police. Then this is also a solution that needs to be looked at. If it turns out it can't, I'll be the last to want something that can't. But it's a research motion. The second motion has to do with fireworks. [[Motion]] [[The Chamber,]] [[heard the debate,]] [[Whereas, in accordance with the criminal procedure directives of the Office, the possession of a firearm is punishable by imprisonment, but the possession of one or more shells or cobras is subject to community service;]] [[Considering that heavy-duty fireworks are life-threatening and justifies the arrest of suspects, but that the current Directive constitutes a barrier to this;]] [[calls on the Government to enter into talks with the Public Prosecutor with a view to adapting the Fireworks Directive in such a way that it does not prevent the application of pre-trial detention so that the owners of heavy illegal fireworks can be detained at the end of the year,]] [[and goes to the order of the day.]] [[This motion has been proposed by Mr Van Dam. It seems to me that their submission is sufficiently supported.]] [[She's getting No. kst-29628-924]]"}]